A baby can heal broken hearts. -Tyler Perry
A birth-date is a reminder to celebrate the life as well as to update the life. -Amit Kalantri
A bit of luck a lot of perseverance and sustained fortitude we can overcome any impediment that life may present to us. -Archibald Gumiro
A borrower who doesn't returns is a beggar. -Amit Kalantri
A certain way to have financial security in life is not enough savings, but enough ability. -Amit Kalantri
A champion is someone ho gets up,  een when he can't -Jack Dempsey
A charming girl gets more proposals than a beautiful girl. -Amit Kalantri
A childhood filled with adventures, happiness and unabated love. If only I could remember ... -Lynda Fisher
A civilization must be judged by its standards not by its expenditure. -Amit Kalantri
A clown on a throne is still a clown. A king in rags is still a king. -C. JoyBell C.
A Controlled Mind Can Create All That It Words...! -Sujit Lalwani
A critical point: Is an inter-phase between crisis and normalcy, life and death, danger and safety, failure and success -Ikechukwu Joseph
A daughter you were, a mother you will be, the things you've done, are the things you will see. -Alysha Millet
A dream is an idea involving a sense of possibilities rather than probabilities, of potential rather than limits.  A dream is the wellspring of passion, giving us direction and pointing us to lofty heights.  It is an expression of optimism, hope and values lofty enough to capture the imagination and engage the spirit.  Dreams grab us and move us.  They are capable of lifting us to new heights and overcoming self-imposed limitations. -Robert Kriegel
A drop of water shall be returned with a burst of spring. -Pat Cher
A escolha entre livros e pessoas sempre lhe fora fácil. Mil vezes enterrada em palavras do que em sentimentos. -Sara Farinha
A FLOWER THAT SMILES TODAY , TOMORROW DIES. ALL THAT WE WISH TO STAY, TEMPTS AND THEN FILES -Thomas Gray
A focused Mind is a result Of a little Effort To tell Your Distractions To sleep for A couple of hours While you are at WORK. -Sujit Lalwani
A fool's mind is at the mercy of his tongue and a wise man's tongue is under the control of his mind. -Hazrat Ali ibn Abu-Talib
A footstool is only needed when you need to get higher. Let your enemy lift you. -Tyler Perry
A friend is someone who can brighten your day with a simple smile, when others try to do it with a thousand words. -Beth Nimmo
A genius is simply one who has taken full possession of his own mind and directed it toward objectives of his own choosing, without permitting outside influences to discourage or mislead him. -Napoleon Hill
A Good Man. Every night, like a question-and-answer prayer, my son and I recite...What are you going to be? And he says...An honest man.  A fair man. A courageous man.  And a good man. That's the most important thing, Papa. And my job is finally done. For the night. -Carew Papritz
A good response beats a bad reaction any day. Be encouraged -Kerry E. Wagner
A healer's power stems not from any special ability, but from maintaining the courage and awareness to embody and express the universal healing power that every human being naturally possesses. -Eric Micha'el Leventhal
A healthy attitude is contagious; let others catch it. -Charles F. Glassman
A heart of gold is where the rainbow begins. -Tammy L. Kubasko
a hero is just somebody who does the right thing when it would be far, far easier to do nothing.” -Cedric Diggory- -G. Norman Lippert
A hero is not know by the number of battles he has won, but rather by the kind of battles he chooses to fight. -Tonny K. Brown
A journey of a million miles, always begins with a single step -Melissa Mercer
A knowledgeable manager can lend to the success of an organization "almost" as much as a poorly trained manager can damage it. -Mark W. Boyer
A lot of kneeling will keep you in good standing. -Mhalyn Campos Anonuevo
A lot of pieces I have written have to do with courage. As a result, people think that I am naturally brave. But what people don't know, is that I grew up with phobias and many fears. I was scared of everything. So, I write of courage not because I have not known fear, but I write of courage because I have walked with fear but I have made the choice not to fear it. -C. JoyBell C.
A loving soul was always more beautiful over the long haul, but actual prettiness was fleeting. -Ann Brashares
A man can build a home but it needs a woman to run a home. -Amit Kalantri
A man is only as rich as the people around him -Brian A. Leslie
A man who stands for nothing will fall for everything. -Malcolm X
A matter, as the famous book intoned, of finding the shade of the parachute that best complemented you. But really: With no parachute at all you'd hit the pavement so hard it probably wouldn't even hurt, and you'd unleash a whole new color palate-bone, blood, muscle-in the process. -Elisa Albert
A mother's love is stronger than distance, more powerful than time and can transcend the grave. -Tyler Perry
A necessidade de calor humano leva-nos a procurar companhia nos sítios mais estranhos e, por vezes, nos menos adequados. -Sara Farinha
A painting shouldn't be just a picture, it should be a philosophy. -Amit Kalantri
A person can put up any kind of protective wall, but love and truth always find a way around it. -Molly Friedenfeld
A person creating a space in his life for something that he doesn’t deserve at all gets readily someone whom he doesn’t desire in all. -Anuj Somany
A person knows whom to trust the most,when he clearly knows who puts the trust on him in time of his wealth lost. -Anuj Somany
A person of good deeds is always a leader for he requires no pontification or justification or clarification to prove his point and position. -Anuj Somany
A person who never made a mistake never tried anything new. – Albert Einstein
A persons limitations are only measured by their drive to succeed -Brian A. Leslie
A person’s words reflect the image of his character and the amount of truth and lies in it is always visible to the human heart than ordinary eyes. -Anuj Somany
A photograph shouldn't be just a picture, it should be a philosophy. -Amit Kalantri
A poet is simply an artist whose medium is human emotions.  A poet chisels away at our own sensibilities, shaping our vision while molding our hearts.  A poet wraps words around our own feelings and presents them as fresh gifts to humanity. -Richelle E. Goodrich
A purposeful act or extension of kindness to another is never wasted, for it always resides in the hearts of all involved in a chain of love. -Molly Friedenfeld
A real businessman value his partners like friends and his partnership like friendship. -Amit Kalantri
A real decision is measured by the fact that you've taken a new action. If there's no action, you haven't truly decided. -Tony Robbins
A real talent has a spark that shines bright when it’s dark to ignite knowledge and awaken minds, but to differentiate the illumination of this wisdom light from the electricity light a person should have an ample vision in his eyesight. -Anuj Somany
A reawakening to a new world. Tendered with immense prospects Concealed in the unknown -Priscilla Koranteng
A scar does not form on the dying. A scar means, I survived. Chris Cleave (Author)
A scientist is proud of his intelligence, an artist is proud of his imagination. -Amit Kalantri
A sense of the divine presence and indwelling bears the soul towards heaven as upon the wings of eagles. -Charles H. Spurgeon
A simple truth delivered in kindness may be the impetus that ignites a passionate fire in another’s soul and goes on to become the source of motivation for positive change. -Molly Friedenfeld
A simple wisdom can change your complex life -Deepika Muthusamy
A single man is minority, a leader is the majority. -Amit Kalantri
A story should be like a river, flowing and never stopping, your readers passengers on a boat, whirling downstream through constantly refreshing and changing scemery. -Ray Bradbury
A true hero make people feel like he is part of their family. -Amit Kalantri
A true Leader does not point fingers A true Leader does not assign blame A true Leader does not celebrate the mistakes of others A true Leader points you in the right direction A true Leader assigns praise however meager the task A true Leader celebrates the accomplishments of his team I true Leader Leads. -Mark W. Boyer
A truly rich man is one whose children run into his arms when his hands are empty. –Unknown
A Warrior of Light values a child's eyes because they are able to look at the world without bitterness. When he wants to find out if the person beside him is worthy of his trust, he tries to see him as a child would -Paulo Coelho
A whetstone, though it cannot cut, may sharpen a knife that will. -Charles H. Spurgeon
A wise man first thinks and then speaks and a fool speaks first and then thinks. -Hazrat Ali ibn Abu-Talib
A woman who writes has power, and a woman with power is feared. -Gloria E. Anzaldúa
A yummy mummy is a dedicated and loving mom who embodies a healthy lifestyle while retaining a sense of the person she was before having kids. -Marina Delio
Ability and talent never loose the value, because demand for it highly exceeds the supply of it. -Amit Kalantri
Ability does catches my attention, but its a politeness in the person that I remember. -Amit Kalantri
Ability, experience and books have solution for all the problems. -Amit Kalantri
About Solitude:   I can keep busy, work hard to keep solitude at bay.   There comes a time, however, when I am alone with myself.  When I feel the presence of God, I let my thoughts wander into shadowy crevices, unafraid, and I learn much that I did not know before.  I experience truths such as, “Fear has been a fact of my life.”  Felt as a fact, it no longer seeps into every facet of my existence, and I am no longer its victim. Without solitude, I would not have seen that truth.  Without the company of God, I could not venture into solitude, a place devoid of distraction, where I am face to face with myself. -For Today Overeaters Anonymous 4 24
Above all, never think you're not good enough. Never think that. In life people will take you at your own reckoning. -Isaac Asimov
Accept from those who have and share with those who do not -Mark W. Boyer
Accept the ego of extraordinary people as they have achieved something but don't accept the ego of ordinary people. -Amit Kalantri
Accept the good, however big or small, with no strings attached. -Charles F. Glassman
Accept you are a work in progress, that there are things which you cannot change, others which take time to change and some which will be a shame to change. -Carol Vorvain
Accidents will occur in the best regulated families. -Charles Dickens
Act as if what you do makes a difference.  It does. -William James
Action, not philosophy will get you going. Pick yourself up and move forward. That is the only way you can still enjoy life while you are blessed to be living it. -Charles F. Glassman
Actions without a dream serve you no purpose, Dreams without action merely pass the time, however, a Dream set into motion….the future has no boundaries. -Mark W. Boyer
Ada banyak hal tampak yang bisa kita tertawakan. Tapi sungguh lebih berbilang hal tak kasat yang selayaknya kita tangisi. -Salim Akhukum Fillah
Ada diajarkan oleh kaum Brahmana, orang kaya terkesan pongah di mata si miskin, orang bijaksana terkesan angkuh di mata si dungu, orang gagah berani terkesan dewa di mata si pengecut. Juga sebaliknya, Kakanda. Orang miskin tak berkesan apa-apa pada si kaya, orang dungu terkesan mengibakan pada si bijaksana, orang pengecut terkesan hina pada si gagah berani. Tetapi semua kesan itu salah. Orang harus mengenal mereka lebih dahulu. -Pramoedya Ananta Toer
Added pressure and responsibility should not change one's leadership style, it should merely expose that which already exists. -Mark W. Boyer
Adversity sure does gives you trouble, but it keeps you humble. -Amit Kalantri
Afinal de contas há coisas que, por mais que se tente usar uma voz agradável e umas palavras dóceis, são inalteráveis. A verdade é o que é! E há verdades que não podem ser adoçadas. -Sara Farinha
Afinal, o que seriam mais umas horas sem a admissão de culpa do homem? Uma gota no oceano. -Sara Farinha
After a dark night don't wait for the shinning day but be like a star which shines even in the dark night -Abhinav Gaur
After Every Storm There Is A Rainbow -April Lovett-Bradford
After I leave the earth my work is anyway going to belong to the world for centuries but till that time I want to work freely. -Amit Kalantri
Age is an issue of mind over matter, If you don't mind, it doesn't matter. -Mark Twain
Ah, yes, choice. I chose to let my ghosts stay in past. Past is history you know. Living is now. I sat. I breathed. I let past go. I let future go. I am. That is all. -Natalie Wright
Aku datang menghadap Mu, Tuhanku tuk menyerah dan mohon penyelamatan Aku mohon Kau maafkan salah dan dosa masa laluku yang setia mengejar tuk menggigitku dari belakang Penyesalan ini membadai di hatiku dan melemahkan niat hidupku Kini aku jiwa yang lebih baik yang lebih patuh kepada Mu Jangan Kau biarkan aku lama bersedih Aku sangat menghamba kepada Mu Tuhan, sayangilah aku -Mario Teguh
Aku hanya orang biasa, tetapi aku bekerja lebih keras daripada orang biasa. -Ahmad Fuadi
aku harus memelihra harapan-harapanku,barangkali akan tiba waktunya ketika aku akan mampu mewujudkannya... nurul arofah
Al margen de lo que la vida le depare a cada uno, era estupendo tener un buen amigo. -Nicolas Barreau
All good teachers help EVERY student earn A's Dr. Will Dungy
All have dreams, live for them,  They add meaning to LIFE.The only thing that  differentiates us from other beings is the fact that us can DREAM!!! -Sujit Lalwani
All my problems bow before my stubbornness. -Amit Kalantri
All one can really leave one's children is what's inside their heads.  Education, in other words, and not earthly possessions, is the ultimate legacy, the only thing that cannot be taken away. -Wernher von Braun
All sorrows in life stem from the lack of cake. If you had your own cake, you wouldn't bother trying to take away the other person's cake! And, if the cake you had were beautiful enough, you wouldn't bother trying to melt the icing on that other person's cake! And if you always had a very beautiful cake that was always beautiful enough, then you would have a smile on your face all the time and wouldn't even care if other people were enjoying their own cakes! Because you'd be enjoying yours, too! Therefore, I hereby decree that all sorrows can be fixed by many beautiful cakes! Bake a cake! -C. JoyBell C.
All that we behold is full of blessings. -William Wordsworth
All the sleepers in a night of delution beholding so many dreams. In this world of darkness, only those who sever themselves from the meterial world, become absorbed in the contemplation of the supreme. None can be regarded as really woken up from sleep till they have renounced all sensuous delights". -Tulasidas.
All the successful personalities had one common element, they all liked reading books. -Amit Kalantri
All things are possible if you believe... -Candace C. Bowen
All who have accomplished great things have had a great aim, have fixed their gaze on a goal which was high, one which sometimes seemed impossible. -Orison Swett Marden
All women have the same value. Every woman could have been born to different circumstances, in a different country, to different parents, to a different government... prostitutes are not "special kinds" of women, nor are they "lower kinds of women." All women are women and we are born into different circumstances in life, we go through different things in life, and we turn out differently. The prostitute that a man so easily dismisses as someone to be "used and forgotten" is a woman who's circumstances have put her there, no matter what those circumstances are. Any baby girl could have been born into those very same circumstances. Everything is all a matter of chance. So do I find it fundamentally immoral for men to classify women into "worthy" and "unworthy"? Yes, I do. But what I find to be worse than that, is the fact that we are all of the same value and yet we are all born unequally. But no man should ever take advantage of that. Prostitution shouldn't ever have to be an option, it shouldn't even exist. -C. JoyBell C.
All you have is the now to live the life you imagine! -Tambré Bryant - Strategic Intervention Life Business Coach
Allow the beauty of all that we love be reflected in who we are and in our actions. -Mark W. Boyer
Although to our automatic brain, change always means potential danger. In order to calm that brain, it means embracing change so to turn on the light in our mind and open the door to our true potential. -Charles F. Glassman
Always aim for right and avoid doing wrong at all costs. -Tyler Perry
Always be good to all, you'll become the best among all. -Halcyon
Always do the best that you can, do not do to do just enough to get by. -Shailesh Bhokare
Always do what makes YOU happy, it doesn’t matter what other people say, the only exception is when you cause other people to be unhappy -Maurice Mol
always find the bright side of a dark thing -Avery Spurling
Always go with your passions. Never ask yourself if it's realistic or not. -Deepak Chopra
Always have something to look forward to -Vici Howard
Always remember that the most important things in this life are not things. Stay safe, stay strong and stay together. -Comic Strip Mama
Always remember, animals can intimidate men with their strength but men cannot intimidate animals with their intelligence. -Amit Kalantri
Always Remember: He Can Do! She Can Do! Why Not Me?! -Tae Yun Kim
Always set small, realistic goals that you know you can achieve first. But don't give up on the bigger ones that may seem too far from your reach. -W.D. Lady
Am I getting braver, or just getting accustomed to being terrified? -Randy Alcorn
Am no saint, am just trying to be good. -FRANCHESTER IFILL
Amid the thousands of shrill voices screaming for our attention, there is but on Voice we need to hear. The voice of the Lord Jesus Christ. -David Jeremiah
An abolitionist is, as I have developed that notion, one who (1) maintains that we cannot justify animal use, however “humane” it may be; (2) rejects welfare campaigns that seek more “humane” exploitation, or single-issue campaigns that seek to portray one form of animal exploitation as morally worse than other forms of animal exploitation (e.g., a campaign that seeks to distinguish fur from wool or leather); and (3) regards veganism, or the complete rejection of the consumption or use of any animal products, as a moral baseline. An abolitionist regards creative, nonviolent vegan education as the primary form of activism, because she understands that the paradigm will not shift until we address demand and educate people to stop thinking of animals as things we eat, wear, or use as our resources. -Gary L. Francione
An act of charity by the citizens questions the worthiness of the government. -Amit Kalantri
An act of kindness may take only a moment of our time, but when captured in the heart the memory lives forever. -Molly Friedenfeld
An anarchist government somehow creates an impression in the hearts of citizens that no one cares. -Amit Kalantri
An applause is not just the recognition of good performance, but its proof of being different than the crowd. -Amit Kalantri
An attitude of gratitude -Missy Carter
An enthusiasm is to keep doing something to never let own mind to feel tired and the passion is to let the heart keep doing something own to never feel hired. -Anuj Somany
An eye for nothing can first make you blind, whatever may be fate of the world in future, you won't see it. -Sipendr
An idealist is someone who helps other people to be prosperous -Ford Henry Ford
An innovative idea is special because only a certain few get to have it -Scott E Roy
An insightful book possesses the ability to speak to you -I.R. Shankar
An item is only worth what someone is willing to pay for it -Bianca Baker
An ordinary man gets arrogant with beauty, conceited with knowledge and ruthless with power. -Amit Kalantri
An unexamined life is not worth living. –Socrates
Anak muda adalah kegelisahan derap langkahnya adalah perubahan. -E.S. Ito
And even when success comes, as I am sure it will, bear in mind that there are more quiet and enviable joys than to be among the most sought after women at a ball... -Blanche Wiesen Cook
And I know, when things look the worst is when something new and wonderful is about to happen, if we can just hold on. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
And I told him, I said: "One day you're going to miss the subway because it's not going to come. One of these days, it's going to break down and it's not going to come around and everyone else will just wait for the next one or will take the bus, or walk, or run to the next station: they will go on with their lives. And you're not going to be able to go on with your life! You'll be standing there, in the subway station, staring at the tube. Why? Because you think that everything has to happen perfectly and on time and when you think it's going to happen! Well guess what! That's not how things happen! And you'll be the only one who's not going to be able to go on with life, just because your subway broke down. So you know what, you've got to let go, you've got to know that things don't happen the way you think they're going to happen, but that's okay, because there's always the bus, there's always the next station...you can always take a cab. -C. JoyBell C.
And it's the funniest thing: as soon as I see it, the whistling in my ears stops and the feeling of terror drains away, and I realize this whole time I haven't been falling at all.  I've been floating. -Lauren Oliver
And so people ask God for signs and wonders. Yet when signs are given and wonders are performed, most can't even see them! I therefore believe that it's not signs people should be asking God for; but you should be asking God for Sight! -C. JoyBell C.
And that's when I heard the whisper in my heart's ear: "It's not about your childhood. It's about who you are! -C. JoyBell C.
And the day came when the risk to remain tight in a bud was more painful than the risk it took to bloom. -Anaïs Nin
And then I decided to be pro me. Be pro you to the end. No more cutting up myself and serving up myself like pieces of a pie for everyone's tasteless palates. And that doesn't mean you don't know how to say sorry; because being pro you means being pro growth and pro improvement. When I'm wrong, I know I'm wrong and I say that I'm wrong. And that's how I know I'm right! -C. JoyBell C.
And, if you improve on the present, what comes later will also be better. -Paulo Coelho
Angels of highest light and love,   Angels that radiate beams of pure energy from the heavens above. Please join us and be with us on this very night,  As the soul of our beloved joins you in flight. We pray that you send this soul embraced in your lovely wings,  During his journey may he hear harps, and trumpets and strings. -Molly Friedenfeld
Angels walk among us,  Sometimes the only thing we may not see are the wings upon their backs. -Molly Friedenfeld
Anger is a dual fire; it burns not only the one who recieves it but also the one who delivers it. -Rvm
Anger is an essential part of being human. People are taught to deny themselves anger, and in this, they are actually opening themselves up to hate. The more you deny yourself the freedom to be angry, the more you will hate. Let yourself be angry, and hate will disintegrate, and when hate disintegrates, forgiveness prevails! The more you deny that you are angry, in attempts to be "holy" the more inhuman you will become, and the more inhuman you will become, the harder it will be to forgive. -C. JoyBell C.
Anger is energy waiting to be transformed. You can never imagine how quickly you grow beating all odds when you know how to use it right -Uma Maheswari Anandane
Anger is like flowing water; there's nothing wrong with it as long as you let it flow. Hate is like stagnant water; anger that you denied yourself the freedom to feel, the freedom to flow; water that you gathered in one place and left to forget. Stagnant water becomes dirty, stinky, disease-ridden, poisonous, deadly; that is your hate. On flowing water travels little paper boats; paper boats of forgiveness. Allow yourself to feel anger, allow your waters to flow, along with all the paper boats of forgiveness. Be human. -C. JoyBell C.
Anger is the most effective inspiration. -Amit Kalantri
Animals are not only beholders of great beauty,  but they are also beholders of ancient wisdom. -Molly Friedenfeld
Animals are property. There are laws that supposedly protect animal interests in being treated “humanely,” but that term is interpreted in large part to mean that we cannot impose “unnecessary” harm on animals, and that is measured by what treatment is considered as necessary within particular industries, and according to customs of use, to exploit animals. The bottom line is that animals do not have any respect-based rights in the way that humans have, because we do not regard animals as having any moral value. They have only economic value. We value their interests economically, and we ignore their interests when it is economically beneficial for us to do so. At this point in time, it makes no sense to focus on the law, because as long as we regard animals as things, as a moral matter, the laws will necessarily reflect that absence of moral value and continue to do nothing to protect animals. We need to change social and moral thinking about animals before the law is going to do anything more. -Gary L. Francione
Anlıyorsun değil mi, ateşli mektuplarım, ateşli çağrılarım, ateşli tutkularım, yanmış ellerimle kağıda döktüğüm bütün bir yangın -en çok korktuğum şey, bütün bunların bir parça yanmış kağıda dönüşebilme olasılığı. Dünyadaki tüm kağıtlar sonunda ya kömürleşmiştir ya da  suda yumuşamıştır, çünkü ateşin üstüne hep suları püskürtür. Malina: Eskiler, aptal biri için, onun kalbi yoktur, derlerdi. Aklın ve zekanın bulunduğu yer diye kalbi göstermişlerdi. Kalbini her şeye açmak, tüm söylevlerini ve mektuplarını ateşe boğmak zorunda değilsin. Ama ne kadar çok insanın yalnızca kafası var ve kafasından çok hiçbir şeyi yok, bir bilsen! Ve onların kalpleri yok. -Ingeborg Bachmann
Anxiety and depression, and the physical symptoms they cause, are merely distractions and smokescreens to “protect” you from dangers, which are usually, imaginary. -Charles F. Glassman
Any serious social, political, and economic change must include veganism. -Gary L. Francione
Any time a stipulation on love is present, unconditional love is not. -Molly Friedenfeld
Any work is always improvable, you cannot really finish the work, you can only abandon it out of tiredness or incompetence. -Amit Kalantri
Anybody can make the simple complecated. Creativity is making the complecated simple. -Charles Mingus
Anybody who tries to change society without first examining the family, is trying to push a shadow without moving a statue. -Stefan Molyneux
Anyone who can say and do anything better than that already done or said anytime, anywhere and considered then the best, then it is good to state for him that he has a brilliant brain in his head. -Anuj Somany
Anything that you learn becomes your wealth, a wealth that cannot be taken away from you; whether you learn it in a building called school or in the school of life. To learn something new is a timeless pleasure and a valuable treasure. And not all things that you learn are taught to you, but many things that you learn you realize you have taught yourself. -C. JoyBell C.
Anyway, the trick is simply this: No matter what happens, keep your heart open. Wide open. The heart is made of love, and love is indestructible, and only the arrogance of ego would presume that it requires protection. To open your heart is to reduce your ego, and this is the only magic that is ever required to experience the naked truth. -Tony Vigorito
Apabila dalam diri seseorang masih ada rasa malu dan takut untuk berbuat suatu kebaikan, maka jaminan bagi orang tersebut adalah tidak akan bertemunya ia dengan kemajuan selangkah pun -Sukarno
Apart from the economic value, money does have high moral value. -Amit Kalantri
Appreciate every little beautiful moment in every day of your life. Give it a try and you'll see the world from another perspective. -Thea Kristine May
Are you a dreamer or a doer?  Hopefully you are both because a dream with no action is just a dream and a plan with no  ending goal is senseless direction. Follow and accomplish your dreams with a plan of action! -Augusta DeJuan  Hathaway
Armed with my positive attitude and inherent stubborn nature, I keep my mind focused and my life moving forward. I stop to rest, pout and even cry sometimes, but always, I get back up. Life is giving me this challenge and I will plow through it, out of breath with my heart racing if I have to. -Amy B. Scher
As a general man I tried watching movies, playing sports, going to picnics and other entertainments but I still got bored, then I tried heroism and now I am hero, and I never get bored. -Amit Kalantri
As a spectator I witnessed the applause given to the performer, so I decided to be the performer. -Amit Kalantri
As far as I can remember, I have always wanted everything from life, everything it can possibly give me. This desire separates me from people who are willing to settle for less. I cannot even comprehend how people's desires can be small, ambitions narrow and limited, when the possibilities are endless -Deborah Feldman
As for methods of prayer, all are good, as long as they are sincere. -Victor Hugo
As I look back on my own life, I recognize this simple truth: The greatest opportunities were the scariest lions.  Part of me has wanted to play it safe, but I’ve learned that taking no risks is the greatest risk of all. -Mark Batterson
As I see, 90%+ (and not less than that) of people go about their lives living 90%+ (and not less) of a lie. choose a different way and live the least truth you might be. -Mphezulu Xetho Dainamyk
As long as you do things for God, you are a Hall of Famer in heaven's list. -Rick Warren
As long you are still living, you can achieve far more than you could ever imagined -Benjamin Suulola
As the earth dies your spirit will bloom; as the world fades your soul will rise and glisten. Amongst the dehydrated crevices of a desert earth you will stumble upon your diamonds; in between the dry skulls and cracked bones you will find your sapphires. -C. JoyBell C.
As we smile at Life,  Life smiles back at us. -Renee Rentmeester
As women, we are always taught never to let a man know of our affections towards him, lest he laugh, run away, or think that we are psycho. But what if that's not true? Have you ever stopped to think that? What if it's like there's a beautiful little bird in our hearts and we're too afraid to let anyone see it in there? What's wrong with letting anyone know that there's a bird in your chest? Maybe there are lots of wrong ones, but maybe there's one that's just for you— the one who won't laugh or run away when he sees that little bird. After all, it’s just a pretty bird! -C. JoyBell C.
As you fulfill your own dreams, you make a difference in the world around you. When you become a master of life, you have the power to affect the lives of others inn unimaginable ways! -Brian Klemmer
As you go about your daily life, you will encounter many lemons. Sour expressions, sour attitudes, sour auras! The good thing is that if you don't want to be a lemon, you don't have to be! Just don't let those lemons rub themselves all over you! And you don't even have to save them! Let lemons be lemons! One of the most important things that I have ever learned, is that I don't have to save people. -C. JoyBell C.
As you grow old, if you don't earn some money or inspiration out of your hobby, you will stop pursuing your hobby. -Amit Kalantri
Ask and expect an answer. -Lailah Gifty Akita
Ask and it will be given to you; search, and you will find; knock and the door will be opened for you. –Jesus
Ask Gandhi, and eye for an eye makes us both blind.....ask an engineer, and the numbers don't lie - the first to strike wins. -Steven Ivy - Attorney Entrepreneur
Aspire to inspire! -Lyra Parish
Así que supongo que somos quienes somos por un montón de razones. Y quizá nunca conozcamos la mayoría de ellas. Pero aunque no tengamos el poder de elegir de donde venimos, todavía podemos elegir adónde vamos desde ahí. Todavía podemos hacer cosas. Y podemos intentar sentirnos bien con ellas."- Charlie. -Stephen Chbosky
At home I am a man, at work I am a machine. -Amit Kalantri
At last I have find a person to solve all my problems, Thanks my dear mirror! -AR Bharaty
At the end of the day, it's not about what you have or even what you've accomplished. It's about what you've done with those accomplishments. Its about who you've lifted up, who you've made better. It about what you've given back" (23). -Denzel Washington
At times, it can feel like the loneliest place on Earth, because it’s just us. Alone with our unanswered prayers -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
Attraction is so much more than a pretty face. It’s face is passion, attitude, kindness, &amp; faith. -Charles F. Glassman
Audience can live without a movie but a movie cannot live without an audience. -Amit Kalantri
Authentic love is soft, smooth, easy, it's laughter to the soul, it's communication, it's respect, it's an unconditional love without envy or malice. -Colishia S. Benjamin
Autism is Treatable -Angela Williamson
Avenues with no obstacles seldom lead anywhere, yet paths to serenity are everywhere. -Sandra Hookham
Awak HEBAT! Buktikan &amp; tonjolkan KEHEBATAN Awak .. =) -Cikgu Syadida Zakaria (UPSI)
Awareness of your weakness is the first step for correction -Nasser Musliyar
Aww, the sound of waves crashing along the ocean side and spraying back up to touch the wind only for a moment, then to fall back down becoming the ocean once more... -Melanie Kilsby
Baca dalam hening. Tulis dengan bening -Rantau Anggun
Bagiku ada sesuatu yang paling berharga dan hakiki dalam kehidupan: 'dapat mencintai, dapat iba hati, dapat merasai kedukaan'. Tanpa itu semua maka kita tidak lebih dari benda. Berbahagialah orang yang masih mempunyai rasa cinta, yang belum sampai kehilangan benda yang paling bernilai itu. Kalau kita telah kehilangan itu maka absurdlah hidup kita -Soe Hok Gie
Bagiku ada sesuatu yang paling berharga dan hakiki dalam kehidupan: 'dapat mencintai, dapat iba hati, dapat merasai kedukaan'. Tanpa itu semua maka kita tidak lebih dari benda. Berbahagialah orang yang masih mempunyai rasa cinta, yang belum sampai kehilangan benda yang paling bernilai itu. Kalau kita telah kehilangan itu maka absurdlah hidup kita. -Soe Hok Gie
bahkan terkadang kita rela  mengorbankan suara hati kita demi meraih persetujuan orang lain -Irfan AmaLee
Balance is Beautiful -Jessica Chalas
Be aware of the darkness but your focus should always be the light. -Tyler Perry
Be bold, don't be boring. -Amit Kalantri
Be brave enough to live creatively. The creative is the place where no one else has ever been. You have to leave the city of your comfort and go into the wilderness of your intuition. You cannot get there by bus, only by hard work, risking and by not quite knowing what you are doing. What you will discover will be wonderful; yourself. -Alan Alda
Be brave, follow dreams, say fuck you to everybody and fight for what you believe in. -Jared Leto
Be careful is better than never wrong. -Kaw Moo
Be careful what you look for and expect in life, because you will either find it or create it. -Christopher Babson
Be careful what you say, life and death truly are in your own words. -Tyler Perry
Be careful what's in your heart because it will affect the heart of God. -Aaron Doss
Be certain of all the words you speak for once delivered they are as free as the wind. -John Dunn
Be grateful with what you have,  So you will live your life without regret. -Juliana Azmi
Be humble to see your mistakes, courageous to admit them, and wise enough to correct them. -Amine A. Ayad
Be in the World, Not of the World—Kind of like Lucky Charms cereal: there are lots of pretty marshmallows in with the cereal, but they’re not the same. So live with the cereal, but remember: you’re a pretty marshmallow. -Laura Jensen Walker
Be natural at heart and new in mind. -Amit Kalantri
Be nice to people whether you mean it or not. You never know when a kind word can make a difference in another person’s day – or maybe even his or her life. -Cassandra King
Be patient. Some accomplishments and successes will ONLY come over time. -Miranda A. Uyeh
Be patient. Your skin took a while to deteriorate. Give it some time to reflect a calmer inner state. As one of my friends states on his Facebook profile: "The true Losers in Life, are not those who Try and Fail, but those who Fail to Try. -Jess C. Scott
Be prepared for the worst my love, for it lives next door to the best. -Melina Marchetta
Be proud of being humane, not human! -Vinita Kinra
Be proud of who you are because there are more people who wish to look like you. -Benjamin ndayishimiye
Be resilient until you complete a task. Challenge yourself and never limit yourself. Stay humble, hopeful, patient, but never quit! -Winsome Campbell-Green
Be strong within ones self, but never forget where ones true strength comes from. -Jean Williams
Be the change you want to see in the world -Ghandi
Be the change you want to see in the world -Muhammad Gandhi
Be the Light you seek so desperately in your life and chase away that darkness. -Solange nicole
Be the love of your love, not the slave of your love. -Amit Kalantri
Be yourself. Everyone else is already taken. -Oscar Wilde
Be yourself. Everyone else is taken. Nicole Barutha
Beauty derives from truth not perfection. -Thomas Davis Jr.
Beauty exists not in what is seen and remembered, but in what is felt and never forgotten. -Johnathan Jena
Beauty is more popular than virtues because it is more visible than virtues. -Amit Kalantri
Because even when there is no hope, somehow you can still find a place to pin inside the things that you need. -Chris   Howard
Because I don't live in either my past or my future.I'm interested only in the present". -Paulo Coelho
Because I lay with him… I’ve caught a glimpse of heaven. Or I understand what I need. Or I have the courage to be myself. -K.Z. Snow
Because of the lingering discrimination, many women still lack confidence. They live in fear of stepping beyond what they feel is acceptable 'female' behavior. I can remember feeling that I wasn't 'normal' because I was aggressive, had dreams and goals, and wanted do do great things...I am glad now that I found courage to do something radical and chase my dreams. -Joyce Meyer
Because Of You, My Heart Exploded Into Stars -Tirumalai S. Srivatsan
Because she looks to the sky so often, people think that her life is sweet, that her eyes are dotted with dreamy stars. But quite the opposite is true and I wish they could see— she looks up so much because all around her it's hard to see without breaking her heart. She once saw in a movie a window sign that said "We're all in the gutter; but some of us are looking at the stars." From that movie onwards, she decided to look up! Doesn't mean her life is sweet, doesn't mean her eyes are dotted with dreamy stars. -C. JoyBell C.
Because...” he used to cradle his daughter in his arms every morning and often they would exchange soft nuances “...if you can dream it, if you can see it in your visions at night, if you can feel it in your soul, it’s yours! And it never really belonged to anyone else, in the first place! It was always yours!” Viera returned her scroll to the drawer and closed it, she kissed the compass around her neck and climbed into her bed under the warm quilts, the candle flame crackled and the memories of her father’s arms around her embraced her there in bed and his deep, hoarse voice resounded in her ears; “... and if you chance upon a treasure that is yours and it happens to be in the possession of someone else, it’s not very wrong to take what is yours, to take what you dreamed, what you saw in your visions at night, what you felt visit you in your spirit! Sure, it’s not lawful, but aye aye my little one, listen to me when I tell you that the best things in life are not under the laws of any sort! For which law created love? Which law created courage? The best things, the real things, are the things that are not measured by any man’s laws! Fear is the only thing that any law has ever created! And what kind of pirates would we all be if we were afraid of any of our fears, even a little! -C. JoyBell C.
Before I can become an expert on anything, I must first become an expert on me. -Charles F. Glassman
Before this generation lose the wisdom, one advice - read books. -Amit Kalantri
Before you can see the Light, you have to deal with the darkness. -Dan Millman
Before you find your soul mate, you must first discover your soul. -Charles F. Glassman
Before you get bored of yourself try creativity in your life. -Amit Kalantri
Before, I wanted to say: "I found love!" But now, I want to say: "I found a person. And he belongs to me and I belong to him. -C. JoyBell C.
Begin doing what you want to do now. We are not living in eternity. We have only this moment, sparkling like a star in our hand and melting like a snowflake. -Francis Bacon
Beginning in itself has no value, it is an end which makes beginning meaningful, we must end what we begun. -Amit Kalantri
Behind every dark cloud is a silver lining (photo taken by me yesterday afternoon). Just like a cloud is a free spirit ... allow your dreams to be the same and you will become the master of all you desire... -Stephen Richards
Being a good father to our children requires a few goals: 1. Be an example of personal responsibility 2. Display self-respect 3. Be an example of personal growth, passion, and perseverance 4. Recognize and accept your child’s particular gifts and nurture them, not wish they had others 5. Love and respect your wife -Charles F. Glassman
Being a late bloomer gives you a second chance at life. -Rhyme Devereux
Being able to write becomes a kind of shield, a way of hiding, a way of too instantly transforming pain into honey. -John Updike
Being alone doesn't necessarily mean that you're lonely. -Tyler Perry
Being an American is more than a birthright. It is something we must prove worthy everyday, failure to do so insults those who have sacrificed all on our behalf. -Mark W. Boyer
Being an extraordinary person means giving something extra and better than the ordinary people, however if anyone advocating others to be extraordinary says and does nothing unusual and unique but just all common; then an ordinary question is raised by any person and often many people against his leadership style, standard and status. -Anuj Somany
Being confident and believing in your own self-worth is necessary to achieving your potential. -Sheryl Sandberg
Being ready is everything. -Caroline Gerardo
Being the best is rarely within our reach. Doing our best is always within our reach. -Charles F. Glassman
Being vegan is easy. Are there social pressures that encourage you to continue to eat, wear, and use animal products? Of course there are. But in a patriarchal, racist, homophobic, and ableist society, there are social pressures to participate and engage in sexism, racism, homophobia, and ableism. At some point, you have to decide who you are and what matters morally to you. And once you decide that you regard victimizing vulnerable nonhumans is not morally acceptable, it is easy to go and stay vegan -Gary L. Francione
Being yourself really isn't that bad; It's rather great actually... -Kayla C
Belief can convert the mundane into the miraculous. -Charles F. Glassman
Belief is intellectual, it involves thinking, and it is a learned conditioning from the outside world: Fear arises out of beliefs.     Trust is created by conscious knowing of truth from within. Trust  does not involve thinking as it only needs ones awareness. It is the innocence of a baby who trusts its mother without any doubt: Love arises out of trust. -Premlatha Rajkumar
Belief is unprovable, but it is a stepping-stone to truth. Faith is unshakable. It is neither belief nor truth but lights the way between them. Truth is undeniable. It is both the intention and the end of belief, and the reward of faith. -Ken Dickson
Beliefs are not some special category of idea sitting at a higher station of truth than our ordinary, everyday mortal thoughts. Beliefs are not neccesarily "the truth" at all. (Remember, there was a time everyone believed the earth was flat) -John Assaraf
Beliefs are stronger than mere ideas, thoughts and notions, be careful about what you believe. -Amit Kalantri
Believe in your got feel. -Glenda Radores
Believe you can and you're halfway there. –Theodore Roosevelt
Believing in negative thoughts is the single greatest obstruction to success. -Charles F. Glassman
Believing in yourself when no one else does is lonely. Surround yourself with people who believe in you. The alternative is eventual insanity. -Penfist
Berjaga malam kerana mencari ilmu lebih nikmat bagiku daripada kekayaan ....Suara goresan pena di atas kertasku lebih merdu daripada alunan lagu kesamaran, lebih indah daripada tabuhan rebana remaja puteri, sedangkan lembaran tulisanku menebarkan butiran pasir hikmah...  -Az-Zamakhsyari -Aidh bin Abdullah al-Qarni
Bersikap adillah sejak dalam pikiran. Jangan menjadi hakim bila kau belum tahu duduk perkara yang sebenarnya. -Pramoedya Ananta Toer
Between natural ability and education choose natural ability, as it will keep you happy and will fetch you the glory sooner. -Amit Kalantri
Bitterness is as toxic as stage 4 cancer. -Tyler Perry
Boats are safe in a dock, but boats aren't meant for that. -Chris Bradford
Born to be a blessing! -D.D. Jewell
Both the mind and "presence" can work beautifully together, in the absence of ego. -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
Bravery is not the trait of a fearless person, lest the reckless actions of a fool be considered brave. Bravery is the quality that allows us to overcome our fears and succeed. -Gerard de Marigny
breathing in and breathing out, those two things we must never forget about. -Lydia Rubi suazo
Bring up the past only if it will help to build the future, otherwise its best to be left to sleep -Tahir M Khan
Buat apa saya menghabiskan waktu membaca hal-hal yang tidak penting untuk dikonsumsi oleh otak, mendingan saya menghabiskan waktu, duduk santai, minum kopi untuk membaca bertumpuk-tumpuk buku fiksi. -Finchu Harefa
Build a beautiful attitude,you build a world beautifully. -dadang subarna
Build your own dreams, or someone else will hire you to build theirs. –Farrah Gray
But even if we don't have the power to choose where we come from we can still choose where we go from there. We can still do things. -Stephen Chbosky
But even if we don't have the power to choose where we come from, we can still choose where we go from there -Stephen Chbosky
But hell, you've gotta work with what you've got. -Haruki Murakami
But I, being poor, have only my dreams; I have spread my dreams under your feet; Tread softly because you tread on my dreams. William Butler Yeats
But if you can’t love your-self, you can never love others. And if you never overcome your lack of self- love, you will carry that problem into all your relationships. Plagued by rejection, you will experience conflict with others, you will struggle to set meaningful goals, and you will feel a vague uncertainty about what truly matters. -Ken Freeman
But if you in your pain call birth an affliction and the support of the flesh a curse written upon your brow, then I answer that naught but the sweat of your brow shall wash away that which is written. Gibran Khalil Gibran
But just remember: a woman's like a rose; if you treat her right, she'll bloom, if you don't, she'll wilt. -Fireproof
But men and women are different in the way that they feel loved. Men like to be admired for what they do, for their integrity and their accomplishments, whether it’s at work or at the gym or mowing the lawn, because it makes them feel manly. When a woman tells a man that she is proud of him, or she tells him that he did a good job, he’ll about bend over backwards to take care of her and love her.”   “But women like attention from men, because it makes them feel feminine and adored. That’s why they’re always fixin’ themselves up, doing their hair, wearing pretty clothes and makeup and jewelry and perfume. It’s all to attract your attention, you know.” (Thelma Jenkins) -Carol  McCormick
But miracles do happen, every shining now and then.  If not now, if not now, tell me when.   From "If Not Now -Carrie Newcomer
But nothing will ever change if we keep pretend. People 'live out loud', as you say, not merely for themselves but for a more honest future. -Jax Garren
By choosing recovery and risking to be real, we set the healthy boundaries that say, "I am in charge of my recovery and my life, and no one else on this Earth is. -Charles L. Whitfield
By doing ordinary actions efficiently you will become the best among ordinary, but you will not be an extraordinary. -Amit Kalantri
By loving you more, you love the person you are caring for more. -Peggi Speers
By recalling God’s past provision, we can reassure ourselves that what He has done in the past, He will do again in the future. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
By the power of Greyskull! He-Man
Cake is happiness! If you know the way of the cake, you know the way of happiness! If you have a cake in front of you, you should not look any further for joy! -C. JoyBell C.
Calliope feathers on the wings of my hopes and my dreams,  To some day fly high in the lavender sky. A warm wind caresses my face, And my heart overflows with grace. The dawn breaks to herald a dazzling new day, As I hover, zip, zoom The Hummingbird Way. -Sherri Lynea Gerek
Can't, almost always means won't. -Ed Gawrys jr
Capability can handle challenges, it doesn't accept charity. -Amit Kalantri
Caring for someone that doesn't care for you doesn't get you any where, take all the love and care you have for them and give it to someone that actually cares about you, but until you find that person... invest it in yourself. -Jaz Mehat
cash in or cash out your choice -MR-S
Celebrate Life. Unless you celebrate each day of Life, you are not truly Living. Let each day be a Festival of Joy. - RVM -Rvm
Certain things catch your eye, but pursue only those that capture the heart. – Ancient Indian Proverb
Chakravyuh mein ghusne se pehle, Before entering the circle of deceit, kaun tha mein aur kaisa tha,     who I was, and what I was, yeh mujhe yaad hi na rahega.     I would not remember. Chakravyuh mein ghusne ke baad,   After entering the circle of deceit, mere aur chakravyuh ke beech,  (there was) between me and the circle, sirf ek jaanleva nikat’ta thi,   only a deathly intimacy iska mujhe pata hi na chalega.  that I never realised. -Dilip Chitre
Challenges are what make life interesting and overcoming them is what makes life meaningful. –Joshua J. Marine
Change and everything will change for you. -Jim Rohn
Change is neither good or bad; it simply is. [Written by Matthew Weiner] -Don Draper from 'Mad Men'
Change is possible if you allow it to happen. Nothing in life is constant; it's always evolving and that's how life happens for me. Through my adversities I can reach new heights. -Chimnese Davids
Change is the only universal law in nature. People resist the universal law of nature. As if they can resist it. And they suffer. People suffer because of their own resistance and rigidness. Otherwise, life if so simple and straight-forward. -His Holiness Divas
Change should be gradual. Without spring and fall, summer and winter would be too harsh; without dawn and dusk, day and night would be too abrupt. -Vinita Kinra
Change the change when it is malchanged. -Vinita Kinra
Change your thoughts and you change your world. –Norman Vincent Peale
Chaos is another name for opportunity -I-Ching
Cheat your landlord if you can and must, but do not try to shortchange the Muse. It cannot be done. You can't fake quality any more than you can fake a good meal. -William S. Burroughs
Check the history, more people died for freedom than love, people need freedom before they need love. -Amit Kalantri
Children must be taught that they are worth being heard, being saved and being loved. -C. JoyBell C.
Childrens' laughter is like medicine to sadness. -Tyler Perry
Chill The Fuck Out (CTFO) -Jeroen Saey
Choice is the doorway to our creative power. To unleash this power, we must begin from the state of beingness. -Ilchi Lee
Circumstances won't define me, I will define my circumstances. -Beate Chelette
common sense is embedded in common things -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Como acalmar a fúria, apaziguar a angústia e explicar o inexplicável? -Sara Farinha
Compassion isn't just about feeling the pain of others; it's about bringing them in toward yourself. If we love what God loves, then, in compassion, margins get erased. 'Be compassionate as God is compassionate,' means the dismantling of barriers that exclude. -Gregory Boyle
Compassionate Intelligence is when love guides reason to the definite realization of our holographic and supportive universe. It’s the origin of this loving wisdom which characterized all of the great masters. These Masters learned to live in the world like visiting foreign diplomats,  since they acknowledged that their heart always dwell in their country of origin, the Kingdom of God. -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
Complexity looks at simplicity and laughs at it for being too simple. But this is stupidity. Which is more valuable? The drop of pure rose oil or the cologne that mixes that one drop with many other things in order to make it affordable enough? It takes 60,000 roses to make a single ounce of rose oil. In simplicity there is value, there is meaning. Complexity is what happens when value and meaning are watered down. Don’t play games with pure-hearted people; they don’t need your rubbish. And don’t try to water them down so you can afford them. -C. JoyBell C.
Compromise brings harmony to both, happiness to none. -Amit Kalantri
Conscious humility is the decision to live from our hearts. -Molly Friedenfeld
Conscious positive wording assists us in maintaining our joy and a positive outlook on life. It allows us to make the choice to be consciously joyful and consciously grateful for all life experiences. -Molly Friedenfeld
Consistency is good, but progress is better. -Amit Kalantri
Consistency simplifies the problem more than hard work of one time because no problem cannot possibly beat you everyday. -Amit Kalantri
Consult your memory to know what matters most in your life. -Amit Kalantri
Controlling unwanted thoughts is not the problem. Believing, thrusting, and taking direction from them is. -Charles F. Glassman
Courage is living by the free will that one creates for themselves, not the life of monotony determined by another. -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
Courage to believe builds confidence to succeed -Rodger Halston
Creating something new is easy, creating something that lasts is the challenge. -Adam Braun
Creative minds doesn't follow rules, they follow will. -Amit Kalantri
Creative minds doesn't get tired. -Amit Kalantri
Creative people neither like to be possessive nor like to be possessed. -Amit Kalantri
Creativity is admired only if it solves the problem. -Amit Kalantri
Creativity is just an attraction to the second rate minds but simplification to the first rate minds. -Amit Kalantri
Creativity means bringing simplicity to the existing. -Amit Kalantri
Crowd is just a bunch of heads, it is their leader who is the mind. -Amit Kalantri
Curiosity can only be called "fear of the unknown" only when you are in your comfort zone. -Jury Nel
Curiosity is the most powerful thing you own. -James Cameron
Customers loves certainty, make sure you give it to them. -Amit Kalantri
Cut not the wings of your dreams, for they are the heartbeat and the freedom of your soul. -Flavia
Dance was her style, dance was her fashion. -Amit Kalantri
Dare to be brave today, and trust that when you extend your wings, you will fly. -Mary DeMuth
Dare to be Remarkable! -Jane Gentry
Dare to believe that you make a significant difference in our world. -Dana Arcuri
Dare to desire, dare to do. -Amit Kalantri
Dare to dream, for in the daring there is defiance to live beyond your circumstances -Su Williams
Dare to love yourself as if you were a rainbow with gold at both ends. -Aberjhani
Dare to share and in doing so you multiply your results without even trying... -Stephen Richards
Darkness cannot survive in light, but a light can shine in the dark! -Odille Rault
Daun yang jatuh tak pernah membenci angin, dia membiarkan dirinya jatuh begitu saja. Tak melawan, mengikhlaskan semuanya. Bahwa hidup harus menerima, penerimaan yang indah. Bahwa hidup harus mengerti, pengertian yang benar. Bahwa hidup harus memahami, pemahaman yang tulus. Tak peduli lewat apa penerimaan, pengertian, pemahaman itu datang. Tak masalah meski lewat kejadian yang sedih dan menyakitkan. Biarkan dia jatuh sebagaimana mestinya. Biarkan angin merengkuhnya, membawa pergi entah kemana. -Tere Liye
Deal with your past so that it won't affect your future. -The Prolific Penman
Deception can only live in the darkness and shadows. There is no place for it to hide once it is illuminated. -Molly Friedenfeld
Decide what you want to do, believe you can do it, put action behind it and you will do it. -David Gyimah Boadi
decision is of the mind not of the mouth also determination is of the heart not of the head- Golden Life Foundation -Chris C Nwakanma
Deep in my heart politeness impresses me more than competence. -Amit Kalantri
Definiteness of purpose is the starting point of all achievement. –W. Clement Stone
Defy reason. -Adrienne Austermann
Degree lets you to the chair of interview, but it cannot provide you job -Pawan Mehra
Denying yourself a life of personal freedom is denying yourself of a life worth living. -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
Despair can only destroy you...if you allow it to. Don't allow it to destroy you! www.bullyingben.com -Timothy Pina
Destiny is real. And she's not mild-mannered. She will come around and hit you in the face and knock you over and before you know what hit you, you're naked- stripped of everything you thought you knew and everything you thought you didn't know- and there you are! A bloody nose, bruises all over you, and naked. And it's the most beautiful thing. -C. JoyBell C.
deuces to the old year,peace to the bullshit and hello to change -nikkisha fevrier
Diamonds are made under pressure - Lilly Parker -L.P. Lovell
Dice un proverbio chino que el destino es como un temporal de vientos que, provenientes de todos los rincones, azotan nuestras vidas y nos empujan por las sendas del tiempo; quienes posean fuerza de voluntad, lucharán contra la tormenta y podrán escoger su propio camino, mientras que los débiles acabarán allá adonde los lleve la tempestad. -Jean Kwok
Dicen que con llorar nada se arregla pero eso no es verdad. Llorar es hacer algo aunque ese algo no sirva más que para quitarnos la sensacion insoportable de no hacer nada. -Xavier Velasco
Did you know that the center of a Protostar (the star in the middle of a nebula) is called a Nuclear Furnace? So you can call that the star's "heart." The heart of a star is a furnace. Not much unlike the human heart. -C. JoyBell C.
Dining with the King; your attire, attitude and mentality must change. -Jaachynma N.E. Agu
Do I Love You" I stand in the night and stare up at a lone star, wondering what love means.  You whisper your desire—do I love you?  I dare say yes.  But my eyes drift back to that solitary star; my mind is plagued with intimate uncertainty.   What art thou, Love?  Tell me. I contemplate what I know—the qualities that love doth not possess.  Love lifts no cruel or unkind hand, for it seeketh no harm.  It shirks from constraints and demands, for tyranny is not love.  A boisterous voice never crosses love's lips, for to speak with thunder chases its very presence from the heart.  Love inflicts no pain, no fear, no misery, but conquers all such foes.  It is said that love is not selfish, yet it does not guilt those who are.  On a heart unwillingly given it stakes no claim.  Love is nothing from Pandora's box; it is no evil, sin, or sorrow unleashed on this world.   My eyes glimmer as the star I gaze upon twinkles with brightness that I do not possess.  I recognize my smallness—my ignorance of the One whose hands placed that star in the heavens for me. He is love.  By His own mouth He proclaimed it. Again the whispered question hits my ear—do I love you?  I dare say yes.  But my eyes squint tight, wishing on a lonely star, wondering what love means. -Richelle E. Goodrich
Do not blame your parents for not working hard enough to birth you with silver spoon in your mouth because tomorrow you will be a parent and your children will in turn blame you for not giving birth to them with the desired silver spoon. -Jaachynma N.E. Agu
Do not do what you cannot continue to deliver. For, remember, the world wants to see a continuity of delivery of  set standards...! -Sujit Lalwani
Do not fear mistakes, there are none. -Miles Davis
Do not fear weakness. Lean on God who will be your strength through every dark storm. -Dana Arcuri
Do not let the hero in your soul perish... -Ayn Rand
Do not limit yourself to your own preconceptions of yourself, but throw yourself out onto a blank page that you haven't written on yet, and see what you find out about you, see what story unfolds, see what happens! I always do this, and sometimes it can be very frightening! To very often have a blank page with nothing written on it yet! I feel as though I am a soul with a single covering–my body of skin– and that's the only thing between me on the inside and the rest of the world! It's quite frightening to begin each day on a blank page, forgetting your own preconceptions of yourself and allowing your mind to embrace the new! It is like meeting yourself for the first time, over and over again! -C. JoyBell C.
Do not presume that richness or poorness will bring you happiness. -Santosh Kalwar
Do not waste your life waiting for wings. Trust that you can already fly. -Audrey Gene
Do not worry about avoiding temptation. As you grow older it will avoid you. -Cosmos Bright Yeboah Cosby
Do not yearn to be popular; be exquisite. Do not desire to be famous; be loved. Do not take pride in being expected; be palpable, unmistakable. -C. JoyBell C.
Do the best you can and God will give you credit for the rest.  He's a pretty smart guy. -Michelle Rathore
Do the impossible, for by doing so you just might change the world. -Prophet AJ Lovett
Do we follow the road  life’s placed before us?  Or do we dare step up and forge an exceptional path.  A path fraught with struggle and sacrifice,  Yet one whose outcome places us in destiny’s arms. -Christopher Babson
Do what makes YOU happy. Focus on what brings YOU joy. Appreciate and do more things that make YOU smile. Live your life for yourself. You matter! You count! You’re deserving of true happiness! This is YOUR life. Live it to the fullest! Live life with no regrets. -Stephanie Lahart
Do what you can, where you are, with what you have. –Teddy Roosevelt
Do what you can, with what you have, with where you are”  ~Theodore Roosevelt -Frances Ann Lebowitz
Do what you love or die a slow death doing what you hate -Sonya Watson
Do whatever you want, whenever you want, to live the life that you want. -Lana Tannous
Do you believe that there are no coincidences in life? Everything happens for a reason. Every person we meet have a roll in our life, either it is big or small. Some will hurt, betray and make us cry. Some will teach us lesson, not to change us, but to make us to be a better person. -Cynthia Rusli
Do you have a leather jacket? One for a ten-year-old boy?" I asked the man selling leather jackets and gloves in Covent Garden, London. "Yes, I have one right here!" And the man dug out a fine leather jacket that looked styled and tailored for a young boy. "I'm buying this for my son" I said to him. "I love this jacket, it's perfect, I think I will just come back for it tomorrow, though! I'll be back tomorrow, okay?" And the man reached his arms above his head, and said with a big smile upon his face "You only have one life to live! What is the difference if you do something today, or if you do it tomorrow?" I thought about the man's words. And I bought the jacket. He was right, there is no difference, really, between doing something today and doing something tomorrow, when you only have one life to live! Afterall, tomorrow may never come! All you really have is today! -C. JoyBell C.
Do you have faith in your faith? -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
Do you know why I believe in the Lord Jesus and what He says? Because He has proved to me that He has my best interests at heart. What could He do that He did not do? He already gave His life for us (Romans 5:8-10; 8:32) -David Jeremiah
Do you really believe in destiny?" "How can I not believe in destiny, when there is no difference between my memories and my dreams at night? There's no difference between their reality. And if I dream something first, I remember it later when I am actually walking in the place or looking at the person I first dreamed of. Days later. Or years later. Destiny~ she walks with me. -C. JoyBell C.
Do you want to be crazy, radical, insanely different than everybody else and do something few people have the courage to do? Then try being yourself and walk a mile or two in your own shoes. Stop trying to be something you are not. Stop trying to emulate someone else. Trust me....they are probably just copying another person they think is cool. No one else will ever be able to duplicate how perfectly you personify yourself. Here is your chance to amaze the world with how different you can be. -H.L.  Stephens
Do Your Best, Let God Do The Rest -Dr. Norman Vincent Peale
Doa yang lemah, bisa diperbaiki dengan doa yang lebih kuat. Doa yang buruk, bisa diganti dengan doa yang baik. Lalu engkau bertanya, mengapakah doa-doa terbaik yang kau naikkan belum juga terjawab? Pertama, ikhlaskanlah pengertianmu agar lebih mudah bagimu untuk bersyukur. Kedua, ketahuilah bahwa doa yang sudah sangat baik, hanya bisa diperbaiki dengan meningkatkan akhlaq dari pribadi yang berdoa. -Mario Teguh
Doing better is creativity, doing faster is creativity, doing smarter is creativity, doing right is creativity. -Amit Kalantri
Doing what I like to do, the way I like to do it ... makes me happy. -Nakia R. Laushaul
Doing what is right to GOD gives you peace not regret -Rudzani Ralph
Don't allow him/her to have supremacy over you. People like them come and go, so never concede on finding the ideal soul-mate. -Naeem Hartley
Don't be afraid of your fears. They're not there to scare you. They're there to let you know that something is worth it. -C. JoyBell C.
don't be sad if Allah separated you from something or someone you love. if only we knew what His plans were for us, our hearts would melt with the warmth of His love -Noname
don't be so good in this bad world, don't be so shy in pointing the wrong one. life is given to us once, just clean all the shit of this world. -kshitij gaur
Don't be so humble, you're not that great -Golda Meir
Don't be the slave for the society, be the entrepreneur for yourself. -Ade Santi
Don't become the one people expect you to be, become who you really are! -Axel N.
Don't behave like your heart and mind are strangers to you; they are yours, don't depend on others to understand them, you got to understand them. -Amit Kalantri
Don't cheat when you got the most beautiful woman by your side -MG
Don't compete with your friends to win a date with few beautiful girls, but compete to win few beautiful goals. -Amit Kalantri
Don't cope with problems; fix them. -Amine A. Ayad A. Ayad
Don't dwell on the PAST as it is a memory... But dream for the Future as it is a hope -Blake Hahn
Don't ever let anyone bring you down, define who you are or destroy your AWESOMENESS. -Comic Strip Mama
Don't expect people to understand your purpose when God didn't give them your vision. -Turcois Ominek
Don't fear the world and you will conquer it, fear it and it conquers you - rjs -rassool jibraeel snyman
Don't feel bad if your youth cannot be joyful, but at least make it useful. -Amit Kalantri
Don't fight against what you don't want, instead stand for the spiritual qualities you would like to manifest in your life and watch how the universe rushes to flesh out your intentions as new life experiences. -Chaz Day
Don't get motivation confused with inspiration; you are the only one that can motivate you -Sonya Withrow
Don't get tied up in something merely religious in search of something that is is Christian -Charles   Lyons
Don't go digging for silver in somebody else's backyard when you've got gold in your own. -Lattis R. Richards
Don't have an opinion about a person until you know them. And then when you do know the person, know him or her in such a way that you won't even think of having any opinions about them! Because you know them enough to believe that your opinions wouldn't matter, anyway. Because the importance of your opinions dim in the light of their meaningful souls. This is how to love humanity. -C. JoyBell C.
Don't judge the gentle; their gentleness is stronger than your fears and angers. Don't judge those who have lost their gentleness; you haven't lived their lives. In all people, hope for the gentleness to return and see gentleness for the beauty that it is. -C. JoyBell C.
Don't judge your success by what people think of you. You are your own success.Your determination and  perserverence is what matters. -Abigal Muchecheti
don't just listen to people crying, hear the reasons why they cry -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Don't just spend your life, live your life becoz life is really awesome. -Raaz Ojha
Don't let fear outweigh what you feel. -Samantha Leahy
Don't let impatience, and frustration ruin your passion for writing. Leah Johnson
Don't let people change who you are just be who you are with someone else. -Tyler Perry
Don't let something like the simple word "No" stop you from doing anything! -Wendy Noriega-Quintana
Don't let the cruel world seize you, you know you are different-a jewel in the crowd, let your work do the talking for you -Vedang Sati
Don't let the regret of the past take the better part of you,because you are a precious child of God.And our God needs you to stop living in the shadows of the past and be whole again with Him. -Rhodalyne Doku
Don't let your life be a tape recorder of the misery of the past. You can do nothing about the past.-RVM -Rvm
Don't let your old ways stop you from making new ones. -Jean Williams
Don't life someone life when you are just an option in some one's life. -Moaz Masood Butt
Don't live your life like an attempt, because if you fail there is no second attempt. -Amit Kalantri
Don't make such decisions whose bad results make you look like you are your own enemy. -Amit Kalantri
Don't overestimate your emotions and underestimate your intelligence. -Amit Kalantri
Don't overestimate your emotions because emotional injuries can disturb you but it can not defeat you. -Amit Kalantri
Don't pass to other your bad experience in life it is for you to learn not for them to experience -Bamba F
Don't sail through life, without an anchor, a captain and a compass -Sonya Withrow
Don't save your good wine/perfume/cutlery for a special moment.  That moment is already here. -Kendall Talbot
Don't share your dreams with everyone and don't be angry with non-dreamers. -Tyler Perry
Don't step backward toward nothing, step forward toward something, better awkward steps forward, than coward steps backward. -Victoria Addino
Don't tawch meh matherfawker! -Tommy Wiseau
Don't think about making life better for other people who don't even deserve you, rather, focus on making your life the best, for yourself and those who love you. -C. JoyBell C.
Don't think or judge, just listen. -Sarah Dessen
Don't try to comfort others try  be comfortable with yourself ;) -Akshay Dubey
Don't underestimate the power of humor and the ability to laugh at yourself to deliver peace and serenity. -Charles F. Glassman
Don't wait for the law of attraction to happen to you; make it happen for you, by taking action. Once you do this, you will experience the law of revelation. -Charles F. Glassman
Don't worry about the negative people may say about you. Learn from it and move on. -Amanda Penland
Don`t be afraid to take a big step when one is indicated. You can`t cross a chasm in two small steps. -David Lloyd George
Donald Watson, who founded The Vegan Society in 1944 and who lived a healthy, active life until passing on in 2005, maintained that dairy products, such as milk, eggs, and cheese, were every bit as cruel and exploitive of sentient animal life as was slaughtering animals for their flesh: “The unquestionable cruelty associated with the production of dairy produce has made it clear that lactovegetarianism is but a half-way house between flesh-eating and a truly humane, civilised diet, and we think, therefore, that during our life on earth we should try to evolve sufficiently to make the ‘full journey.’” He also avoided wearing leather, wool or silk and used a fork, rather than a spade in his gardening to avoid killing worms. Let us instil in others the reverence or life that Donald Watson had and that he passed on to us. -Gary L. Francione
dont aom for success if u want it just do what u love n believe in and it wil come naturaly. -David Frost
Don’t be a slave of 3 S’s: Salt, Sugar and Sex. -Vinita Kinra
Don’t be consumed by the fire of jealousy, use that fire to chart your own path to success. -Vinita Kinra
Don’t believe what your eyes are telling you. All they show is limitation. Look with your understanding. -Richard Bach
Don’t let anyone set restrictions on your life...You chart the course of your own future, not anyone else.  Don’t let people have such a power over you.  Because if you’re always racing against their standards, then what’s the point of reaching a useless finish line? -K.M. Parr
Don’t try to change the world; just change yourself. Why? Because the whole world is only relative to the eyes that are looking at it. Your world actually only exists for as long as you exist and with the death of you, includes the death of your world. Therefore, if there is no peace in your heart; you will find no peace in this world, if there is no happiness in your life; you will find no happiness anywhere around you, if you have no love in your heart; you will not find love anywhere and if you do not fly around freely inside your own soul like a bird with perfectly formed wings; then there will never be any freedom for you regardless if you are on a mountaintop removed from all attachments to all of mankind! Even the mountaintop cannot give you freedom if it is not already flying around there inside your own soul! So I say, change yourself. Not the world. -C. JoyBell C.
DRAMA: Be careful about being baited into the personal battles and confusion of others. If you want to help someone out emotionally, be certain he or she has made a commitment to the sacrifice before you intervene for his or her success. If you don’t, you’re likely to be drained of all your healthy energy with his or her selfish petty, pitiful pretending and negotiating. Be encouraged but more importantly if you can’t make it better, whatever you do don’t make it worse, for them and especially yourself -Kerry E. Wagner
Dream and act HUGE my friends; for to do less is to deny who you are. And live with BOLD conviction – as you move forcefully into the certainty of your great success! -Christopher Babson
Dream as if you'll live for ever, live as if you'll die today -James Deam
Dream big and dare to fail. –Norman Vaughan
dream big and let God do the rest -Abie Sigauke
Dream big and never give up on those dreams.  Who knows where they'll take you? -Amy McGuire
Dream big dreams for they eventually come true. -Letícia Watanabe
Dream big, because really... what's stopping you? Envision the end result and then reach out and get it! -Tracee Ford
Dream is like a butterfly. You have to chase it to discover worlds you never knew existed. -Vinita Kinra
Dream Lies In Your Eyes. -non else
Dream me a dream so high and mighty that its fall will achieve the same as its success. -Brooke Barenfanger
Dreamers are risk takers, they go where the most people couldn't go. They break grounds, they take no prisoners. -Euginia Herlihy
Dreaming big is better than wasting time achieving perfection -Me xD
Dreaming is good. But working to make those dreams come true is even better. -Joel L.
Dreaming is the poetry of Life, and we must be forgiven if we indulge in it a little. -John Galsworthy
Dreaming, after all, is a form of planning. –Gloria Steinem
Dreams are not those which comes while we are sleeping, but dreams are those when u don't sleep before fulfilling them. -A.P.J. Abdul Kalam
DREAMS are not those which comes while we are sleeping, but dreams are those when u dont sleep before fulfilling them. A P J ABDUL KALAM
Dreams are what keep us growing. They are what keep us alive. To give up, is to let our dreams die. -Phil Mitchell
Dreams can only be seen with open eyes, what you see while you asleep are nightmares. -Amit Kalantri
Dreams don’t get done until they are due. -Richie Norton
During the crash and burn, I began to burn from cranial crown to flat sole, for meaning and understanding. Every concept, psychological perceptions with hardened pathways, everything that registered as inherited from the communal was starting to dissolve into meaninglessness. The foundational tenets, the pre-established belief systems, instilled sustenance systems tended by both family and extended communal began to dissolve, first as trivial, and then as untenable to my being without validation from me. If my life was worth anything, I choose to live the best life for me.  So I entered what I call The Blank State. -Dew Platt
Dwell in peace in the home of your own being, and the Messenger of Death will not be able to touch you -Guru Nanak
Each day is a gift To embrace and welcome -Karen Hackel
Each day of our life is a new chapter of its own. -Abdulazeez Henry Musa
Each day of our life is a new chapter on its own. -Abdulazeez Henry Musa
Each of us has a vulnerability like Edmund's that Satan is eager to exploit.  It may be something addictive like drugs or alcohol, or it may be something seemingly harmless and perhaps even good like food, friendship, or work. -Discovery House Publishers
Each of us have a winner within. Tap into your potential and gain unlimited success! The only one who can stop you is yourself. Think Positive!  Be Optimistic! Don't be fooled into thinking it can't be done.  Look around amazing things are accomplished everyday. New inventions,  discoveries are happening all the time. If you can get one foot in the door, you can make it happen. -Amaka Imani Nkosazana
Each person you meet is an aspect of yourself, clamoring for love. -Eric Micha'el Leventhal
Each star is a mirror reflecting the truth inside you. -Aberjhani
Early to bed and early to work might get you a success, but late to bed and early to work will get you a glory. -Amit Kalantri
Earth's crammed with heaven, And every common bush afire with God. -Elizabeth Barrett Browning
Eccentricity of a creative mind may not be pleasing for the people around it, but it is important for the progress. -Amit Kalantri
Edine meje v tvojem življenju so tiste, ki si jih postaviš sam. -Robin S. Sharma
Education costs money.  But then so does ignorance. –Sir Claus Moser
Eighty percent of success is showing up. –Woody Allen
Either write something worth reading or do something worth writing. –Benjamin Franklin
Either you run the day, or the day runs you. –Jim Rohn
El amor no esta en la mente ni en el corazón, no esta en un lugar físico, sino en uno invisible, que no se ve, que no se puede palpar o tocar, que solo se puede sentir, como si hubiera llenado un espacio que antes estaba vacío, hueco, pero que ahora al sentirlo es como si se hubiera colmado de sensaciones lindas, hermosas, como cuando alguien planta una flor en un jardín, y este espacio queda lleno de alegría y color y da sentido a su existencia. -F.J. Vizcarra
Elegance is a glowing inner peace. Grace is an ability to give as well as to receive and be thankful. Mystery is a hidden laugh always ready to surface! Glamour only radiates if there is a sublime courage &amp; bravery within: glamour is like the moon; it only shines because the sun is there. -C. JoyBell C.
Eliminate blame, guilt, and worry from your diet and watch your health improve. -Charles F. Glassman
Elles étaient en touffes avec des racines d'or, épanouies, enfoncées dans les ténèbres et qui soulevaient des mottes luisantes de nuit. (à propos des étoiles) -Jean Giono
Embedded from dots and darkness everything in the universe is tangled, twisted and formed. The colors we see are creation of consciousness with light and profound/deep understanding of life. The more we are awake, the more we integrate within the universe.”  Katia M.S. -Katia M. S.
embrace the life that you were given becky tsap
Emerge; don’t cower. Endure; don’t run. Nurture; don’t abandon -Raji Lukkoor
Emotional pain, physical damage, financial weakness are the reasons to stop for a while and not forever. -Amit Kalantri
Emotions manipulates the man more than habits do. -Amit Kalantri
En este mundo hay gente que a pesar de estar dotados de un talento excepcional son incapaces de realizar el esfuerzo necesario para sistematizarlo, y su talento se acaba malogrando. He visto a varias personas a quienes les sucedío esto. Al principio, uno piensa son genios. Uno se siente abrumado, piensa que no les llegas a la suela del zapato. Pero eso es todo. No son capaces de ir un paso más allá. ¿Por qué? Porque no se esfuerzan. Porque jamás les han inculcado el sentido de la disciplina. Porque los han estropeado. Desde niños, han tenido tanto talento que han conseguido hacer las cosas sin esforzarse, y la gente los ha ido alabando por ello, diciendoles lo extraordinarios que son. Y acaban concibiendo el tesón como una estupidez. Ningún profesor los ha enseñado a disciplinarse y en consecuencia pierden un elemento necesario en la formación del ser humano... Están acostumbrados a recibir elogios desde pequeños y no los aprecian. Basta con una alabanza justa en el momento preciso y en no presionarlos. -Haruki Murakami
Encourage the enthusiastic. -The Rebbe
Endless invention, endless experiment, Brings knowledge of motion, but not of stillness... Where is the Life we have lost in living? Where is the wisdom we have lost in knowledge? -T.S. Eliot
Ends are not bad things, they just mean that something else is about to begin. And there are many things that don't really end, anyway, they just begin again in a new way. Ends are not bad and many ends aren't really an ending; some things are never-ending. -C. JoyBell C.
Enjoy every day and make each day great -Ron Law
Enjoy your dreams and empower others to live theirs. -Joseph Ash
Enjoy, smile... wild... peace. -C. JoyBell C.
Entertainment is temporary happiness, but the real happiness is permanent entertainment. -Amit Kalantri
Entrepreneurs are different beasts. Beasts who don’t give a damn, who kick ass when required, who stand up to a challenge, and who rise time and again with utter disregard to fear or failure. These are the beasts who run the world. -Vishwas Mudagal
Envision in your mind what you expect from life, focus on your plan... whether good or bad you can anticipate its arrival. The choice is then yours to accept it. -Mark W. Boyer
Estou procurando um lugar que precise de muitas reformas e consertos, mas que tenha fundações sólidas. Estou disposto a demolir paredes, construir pontes e acender fogueiras. Tenho uma grande experiência, um monte de energia, um pouco dessa coisa de ‘visão’ e não tenho medo de começar do zero. - Steve Jobs -Leander Kahney
Ethical veganism represents a commitment to nonviolence. -Gary L. Francione
Ethical veganism results in a profound revolution within the individual; a complete rejection of the paradigm of oppression and violence that she has been taught from childhood to accept as the natural order. It changes her life and the lives of those with whom she shares this vision of nonviolence. Ethical veganism is anything but passive; on the contrary, it is the active refusal to cooperate with injustice -Gary L. Francione
Even English Language doesn't provide you with the Synonyms of the word Success. -Kshitij Shringi
Even if jobless we should never be effortless. -Kenan Crnkić
Even if you have achieved everything, there is Perfection, still left to be achieved. -Amit Kalantri
Even in darkness, there’s light. You just need to look for it. -J.M. Northup
Even the smallest changes in our daily routine can create incredible ripple effects that expand our vision of what is possible. -Charles F. Glassman
Even though the ship may go down, the journey goes on. -Margaret Mead
Even though your life is Rainy and  muggy you can fight through it just  Make sure you know what is happening  And make sure you don't take to much  pressure on it just shake it off! -Skye Daphne
Even when muddy your wings sparkle bright wonders that heal broken worlds. -Aberjhani
Every child is an artist.  The problem is how to remain an artist once he grows up. –Pablo Picasso
Every comforting word is a command from a man of action... While every word of command is commotion from a man of just words... -Sujit Lalwani
Every day is a new beginning, the building of a habit. Every action is a step in some direction. There is no pause in living. -Anna White
Every day, there is a golden opportunity just waiting to be discovered. -Tammy L. Kubasko
Every dream, every vision is a masterpiece canvas on the wall of our minds. So as artists we should  make an effort to bring the artwork to the the exhibition. -Euginia Herlihy
Every end is the beginning of something else. -M L Stedman
Every great accomplishment begins with a dream, never forget that within us all is the fortitude, patience and passion to change destiny. -Mark W. Boyer
Every great movement of God can be traced to a kneeling figure. -D.L. Moody
Every journey has its own traveler. Every dream has its own dreamer. We are all belong to a specific journey and dream. Some people are currently looking for it, some people are just figuring it out, some people are still lost, and to some they have finally found it. -Happy Positivity
Every known thief pretends to be a gentleman at first! -Dhruv Gandhi
Every man is architect of his own fortune. Appius Claudius Caecus
Every man needs a women, when his life in a trouble. just like a game of chess, queen protect the king -Anuj Kr. Thakur
Every man reaches his destination, if he just keeps walking -Philen Naidu
Every morning most of the people wake up alive than dead, so I do have a faith there is still some goodness left in the man. -Amit Kalantri
Every morning, whether I've slept or not, whether I've made it through the day without crying or given in and sobbed in the shower, where no one can hear me― the sun comes up, and I make my choice. -Robin York
Every night before I go to sleep I say out loud three things that I am grateful for, all the significant, insignificant, extraordinary, ordinary stuff of my life.  It is s small practice and humble, and yet, I find I sleep better holding what lightens and softens my life every so briefly at the end of the day. -Carrie Newcomer
Every once In while we are blessed with love and we realize what matters most...it's love and spreading love. -Rodger Halston
Every one has there own way to expresss there selves if you have a problem don't tell them. They don't care its not your life you don't have to live with that decision so next time you want to tell someone there pericing is ugly or there makeup looks bad think about the the way you express yourself not everybody may like it but it is your decision knowbody elses. Be glad you are you. -Noel Thielen
Every penny that has always been earned with integrity by a person to lead life with a real simplicity has only perhaps helped to serve Almighty &amp; protect and preserve humanity in the society. -Anuj Somany
Every person has a revolution beating within his or her chest -Adam Braun
Every person is a project, God's project, I want to be the most profitable one. -Amit Kalantri
Every problems and every trials are just ingredients of life mix them with faith and hope and finally cover them with prayers. Life is not perfect but if we find the right proportion in mixing our ingredients we could finally say... Lord! I love this gift of life. yanelle
Every puppy should have a boy. -Erma Bombeck
Every Star is a Sun... If near its planet... Likewise every individual is an Achiever if he/she works in their Stream. -Mayank Sharma
Every strike brings me closer to the next home run. –Babe Ruth
Everyday is a gift, thats why they call it the present. blank space
Everyone takes part in the mosque for one reason; to have a prayer answered. -Shujoy Chowdhury
Everyone who got to where they are had to begin where they were. -Richard Paul Evans
Everything can be expressed so long as it's presented properly. Even the harshest reprimand can be made without humiliating or poisoning the soul. -Gabeiela Miatral
everything happen for a reason but never forget who you are .... -Emmanuel Amieghemhen
Everything happens for a reason,even though we don`t know what the reason is. Shelby Jordan
Everything has beauty, but not everyone can see. –Confucius
Everything is acheivable in this world,but to acheive this you have to make an ACHEVIMENT -Pankaj Sharma
Everything is Easy ... If you believe it is ! -yashness
Everything is going to be fine now because heroes are here. -Amit Kalantri
Everything is possible. You once told me not too long ago we should always have hope and I do. -T.S. Krupa
Everything occurs for good, in everything there is good and in everything there is beauty... -Radostin Chernev
Everything we encounter can have a positive influence in shaping our life when we adopt a lens of Gratitude. -The Letters Of Gratitude
Everything you've ever wanted is on the other side of fear. –George Addair
Everywhere we shine death and life burn into something new… -Aberjhani
Excellence does not come easy for quickly- An Excellent education does not, a successful mission does not, a strong, loving marriage does not, rewarding personal relationships do not. It is simply a truism that nothing very valuable can come without significant sacrifice, effort, and patience on our part. -Jeffery R Holland
Exhale the remnants/Of wounds that steal your freedom./No more prisons. Breathe. -Staci Backauskas
Există o limită a rezistenţei în fiecare. Când e atinsă, nu mai ai poftă să te justifici. -Octavian Paler
Expectation levels set can be directly correlated to the quality of the training provided. -Mark W. Boyer
Extending gratitude to another says, “I see what you’ve done and I thank you for the energy you put forth. -Molly Friedenfeld
Eyes like streams of melting snow, Cold with the things she does not know, Heaven above and Hell benieth, Liquid flames to hold her grief,  Death,Death, Death  with no release -Kierston White
Facts? What are facts? I only know imagination! -C. JoyBell C.
Failing to meet your true destiny is a tragic act of free will. -Anthon St. Maarten
Failure is when you give up. A real winner is someone that doesn't give up, even when it feels like they are losing. -Joshua Hartzell
Fairies with gossamer wings,  Bring forth beauty, grace and joyful things.  Fairies of the earth are caretakers of our soil, water and trees, They watch over beautiful creatures such as bears, bunnies and bees. Fairies ask that you breathe in and appreciate the vantage point from which you stand, Then trod carefully and respectfully with each intentional step you make across this beautiful land. -Molly Friedenfeld
Faith and belief are not measured by the size of the miracle but the integrity of our soul. -Charles F. Glassman
Faith is 10% talk and 90% work. -The Prolific Penman
Faith is blind, if you don’t open your eyes to see the blessings. -Charles F. Glassman
Faith is the courage to live your life as if everything that happens does so for your highest good and learning. Like it or not. -Dan Millman
Faith moves mountains, love transforms hearts. -John Paul Warren
Faith often comes from patience and remembering that sometimes patience is taking a deep breath and listening to that little voice on the inside saying, 'Don't worry, everything is going to be all right. -Charles F. Glassman
Fall seven times and stand up eight. –Japanese Proverb
Far greater than all the material possessions that I possess, is my Freedom to Choose, my Freedom to Live, and my Freedom to be Happy.-RVM -Rvm
Father sat down on the edge of the narrow bed.  "Corrie,"  he began gently,  "when you and I go to Amsterdam-when do I give you your ticket?"      I sniffed a few times, considering this.      "Why, just before we get on the train."      "Exactly.  And our wise Father in heaven knows when we're going to need things, too.  Don't run out ahead of Him, Corrie.  When the time comes that some of us will have to die, you will look into your heart and find the strength you need-just in time. -Corrie ten Boom
Fear and anxiety many times indicates that we are moving in a positive direction, out of the safe confines of our comfort zone, and in the direction of our true purpose. -Charles F. Glassman
Fear can keep you up all night, but faith makes one fine pillow. -Philip Gulley
Fear doesn't shut you down, it wake you up -Veronica Roth
Fear doesn't shut you down, it wakes you up. -Veronica Roth
Fear has no place in the lives of those who choose to be victorious. -Molly Friedenfeld
Fear is a beautiful mirror reflecting the reality of great things with false illussions. After all, images in the mirror ain't real at all, they're just virtual. So, keep ballin' without checkin mirrors coz u may see an image that proves it's hard -- ya, u never know it's hard till u've done it!!! -Mphezulu Xetho Dainamyk
Fear is a probability by its own cause of actions, if we live by it we lose all the possibilities of endurance -Saleem Durrani
Fear is a sprit that really can stop you from living. -Tyler Perry
Fear is an aid to the warrior. It is a small fire burning. It heats the muscles, making us stronger. Panic comes when the fire is out of control, consuming all courage and pride. -David Gemmell
Feed your self-esteem; not your ego! -Deborah Brodie
Feeling guilty does not set us free.  Being equipped sets us free. -Thom Hunter
Feelings Are the Compass to Your Soul. -Sophie Winters
Feet sandaled with dreams tread paths of vision leading to wisdom’s sharp peaks. -Aberjhani
Few moments are so special that they should be recognized by special expressions. -Amit Kalantri
Few people when meet first time they feel that meeting each other was the purpose of their life. -Amit Kalantri
Few teams sometimes fails miserably because team members wish to work in the team but they want to be recognized individualy. -Amit Kalantri
Few things can help an individual more than to place responsibility on him, and to let him know that you trust him.  –Booker T. Washington
Fiction is written with reality and reality is written with fiction. We can write fiction because there is reality and we can write reality because there is fiction; everything we consider today to be myth and legend, our ancestors believed to be history and everything in our history includes myths and legends. Before the splendid modern-day mind was formed our cultures and civilizations were conceived in the wombs of,  and born of, what we identify today as "fiction, unreality, myth, legend, fantasy, folklore, imaginations, fabrications and tall tales." And in our suddenly realized glory of all our modern-day "advancements" we somehow fail to ask ourselves the question "Who designated myths and legends as unreality? " But I ask myself this question because who decided that he was spectacular enough to stand up and say to our ancestors "You were all stupid and disillusioned and imagining things" and then why did we all decide to believe this person? There are many realities not just one. There is a truth that goes far beyond what we are told today to believe in. And we find that truth when we are brave enough to break away from what keeps everybody else feeling comfortable. Your reality is what you believe in. And nobody should be able to tell you to believe otherwise. -C. JoyBell C.
Fiction reveals truths that reality obscures. -Jessamyne West
fight for what you believe in, for if you don't you will be forever fighting against yourself. -Keisha Keenleyside
Find in Jesus the power to defeat every foe. -Katy Kauffman
Find something you love to do, and you'll never work a day in your life -Harvey MacKay
Finding oneself and one's path is like waking up on a foggy day. Be patient, and presently the fog will clear and that which has always been there can be seen. The path is already there to follow -Rasheed Ogunlaru
Finish each day and be done with it. You have done what you could. Some blunders and absurdities have crept in; forget them as soon as you can. Tomorrow is a new day. You shall begin it serenely and with too high a spirit to be encumbered with your old nonsense. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
Finishing work makes you a man, finishing difficult work makes you a hero. -Amit Kalantri
First learn to dream big, then the possibilities will follow by itself. -Yuikan Shirik
First make your business itself a brand and then every product you create will be accepted as a brand. -Amit Kalantri
First time success is not the assurance for second time success. -Amit Kalantri
First you be a hero and then raise your child to be a hero. -Amit Kalantri
First, have a definite, clear practical ideal; a goal, an objective. Second, have the necessary means to achieve your ends; wisdom, money, materials, and methods. Third, adjust all your means to that end. –Aristotle
First, it is largely unknown just how the Holy Spirit interacted with the author of an original Biblical manuscript- 'passive' vs. 'active' (I contend that it was both/and). Secondly, it is also widely unknown just what the 'process' involved in 'canonization' was. Additionally, I see little evidence of the injection of personal bias if any by the Biblical authors. -R. Alan Woods
First, know where you want to go. Then, go where you want to go. You are your own pilot and you can choose your Destination. - RVM. -Rvm
Flowers were blooming, withered soon.. Rains kept falling, wasn't forever.. Dogs were barking, just for sometime.. Sun, moon &amp; stars were invisible at times, but they kept watching you.. Let them shine for you, before it’s too late.. -Heshan Udunuwara
Focus is the soul of success. -Sandeep Kakkar
Focus on making yourself better, not on thinking that you are better. -Bohdi Sanders
focus on the good things in life and blur the rest -anuj sardana
Folks look around, what do you see and what do you have in your hand or in your house? Don't you ever underestimate what is in your hand or in your house, it doesn't matter how little it is. -Euginia Herlihy
Follow your heart as long as you live...Bring your whole heart towards excellence...And no limit may be set to art. -The Instruction of Ptahhotop
follow your heart where your mind aint good enough but let your mind lead where the heart ain fast enough -King Rankwaila
Follow your own path, and you'll get lost. Follow His, and you won't. -Susan Gaddis
Food is food no matter what size, shape, or color. -Me
For a man to challenge the darkness he need only be armed with a single spark. -Mark W. Boyer
For every dilemma, find at least three or four possible solutions. The creative process leads to better results. -Marilyn Suttle
For every woman, there is that one man who could get her to go anywhere he wanted her to go, do anything he wanted her to do—reach into her soul and turn her whole world on its ear—challenge everything she thought she believed.   Highlighted by 24 Kindle users -Lenore Wolfe
For everything I have given I have received much more in return -Gordon McIlwraith
For everything in this journey of life we are on, there is a right wing and a left wing: for the wing of love there is anger; for the wing of destiny there is fear; for the wing of pain there is healing; for the wing of hurt there is forgiveness; for the wing of pride there is humility; for the wing of giving there is taking; for the wing of tears there is joy; for the wing of rejection there is acceptance; for the wing of judgment there is grace; for the wing of honor there is shame; for the wing of letting go there is the wing of keeping. We can only fly with two wings and two wings can only stay in the air if there is a balance. Two beautiful wings is perfection. There is a generation of people who idealize perfection as the existence of only one of these wings every time. But I see that a bird with one wing is imperfect. An angel with one wing is imperfect. A butterfly with one wing is dead. So this generation of people strive to always cut off the other wing in the hopes of embodying their ideal of perfection, and in doing so, have created a crippled race. -C. JoyBell C.
For happiness don't pursue satisfaction, but pursue heroism. -Amit Kalantri
For it is through the darkness of the evening that we are able to see the stars. Without this darkness, we would never get to experience the beauty of the cosmos, or understand the little bits of light in life that shine through the void. -Jennifer Sodini
For me, my targets are more important than my happiness and that is the secret of my happiness. -Amit Kalantri
For me, the most expensive thing in this world is the sentimental value. -Alon Calinao Dy
For my part I know nothing with any certainty, but the sight of the stars makes me want to dream. -Vincent van Gogh
For my success I am immensely grateful to God, my parents, my family, my friends, my teachers and to the books I read. -Amit Kalantri
For some people, “the point of no return” begins at the very moment their souls become aware of each others’ existence. -C. JoyBell C.
For something great,we have to sacrifice something greater -Renju Aravind
For success is for the ignorant  That is what makes it original -Priscilla Koranteng
For those who are not frightened by the solitude, everything will have a different taste. In solitude, they will discover the love that might otherwise arrive unnoticed.  In solitude, they will understand and respect the love that left them. In solitude, they will be able to decide whether it is worth asking that lost love to come back or if they should simply let it go and set off along a new path. In solitude, they will learn that saying ‘No’ does not always show a lack of generosity and that saying ‘Yes’ is not always a virtue. And those who are alone at this moment, need never be frightened by the words of the devil: ‘You’re wasting your time.’ Or by the chief demon’s even more potent words: ‘No one cares about you.’ The Divine Energy is listening to us when we speak to other people, but also when we are still and silent and able to accept solitude as a blessing. And when we achieve that harmony, we receive more than we asked for. -Paulo Coelho
Forget how vast darkness can be Focus on how powerful your light is… When you turn it on -Roxana Jones
Forgiveness is NOT forgetness. If you forgive, remember to be wise enough NOT to forget. -Widad Akrawi
Forgotten hero was never the real hero, real hero can not be forgotten. -Amit Kalantri
Free yourself from negative people. Spend time with nice people who are smart, driven and like-minded. Relationships should help you, not hurt you. Surround yourself with people who reflect the person you want to be. Choose friends who you are proud to know, people you admire, who love and respect you – people who make your day a little brighter simply by being in it. Life is too short to spend time with people who suck the happiness out of you. When you free yourself from negative people, you free yourself to be YOU – and being YOU is the only way to truly live. -Kevin Skeens
Freedom is a place, an area. It's a higher place. There are some other people that are here, and things that are here which are unseen. But you first have to set yourself free and believe in what you cannot see, believe that there is something more out there. In freedom can be found many devotions: a devotion to love, a desire to believe, a willingness to be happy, a perseverance to have peace. All these unseen things breathe and grow in the unseen soul. A free person is not an uncommitted person, but in a free person you will find a deep devotion, and a desire to be devoted to even more. -C. JoyBell C.
Freedom is an absolute state, there is no such thing as being half-free. -Daniel Delgado F
Freedom is in the Now -Arnaud Saint-Paul
Freedom is not the absence of commitment, and to be committed to something or to someone does not mean the loss of freedom. But freedom exists in the realm of the unbound and to be free is to be committed to that which is a part of the unbound realm. Whatever sets your soul to flight is freedom. If someone sets your soul to flight, to stay with that person is not to lose freedom but to stay with that person is to retain freedom. Together you have what is unbound. Whatever will swell your spirit and give you wings, is freedom, and it is a fault if you let go of that for the very reason that you are afraid of losing your freedom and in doing so you have in fact let go of what will keep you unbound. -C. JoyBell C.
Freedom is something that you give yourself and no one else can ever take away. -Angela Bushman
Freedom may be free but it has a price. -Jared Nyairo Onduso
Friends who love us know that motherhood is about transitioning--and adjusting, constantly, to those changes. We must become masters of change because that is what life demands of us. -Meg Meeker
Friends, Romans, countrymen, lend me your ears;  I come to bury Caesar, not to praise him;  The evil that men do lives after them,  The good is oft interred with their bones -William Shakespeare
Friendship is earned by those who accepted each other for what they are and for what they have. Trust and respect flows in each other to make it lasting. -John
Friendship is so important. The goal of a good friendship should be for life! To keep it for life! If you find a friendship, and it gives you a joy inside, a peace, and a freedom; keep that friendship for life. Through it all, you stay together. So many friendships are toxic, but the good ones are really good! I always tell my son this, I always say, a friend is for life! -C. JoyBell C.
From just one spark we can create one fire. And from one fire we can create one light. From that one light, we create vision and that vision is how we share just one spark. Inspire all those around you. -Josh Blatter
From nowhere we came; into nowhere we go. What is life? It is the flash of a firefly in the night. It is the breath of a buffalo in the wintertime. It is the little shadow which runs across the grass and loses itself in the sunset. -Crowfoot Blackfoot Warrior Chief 1890
From the darkest corner comes the sharpest light -Anindita
From the writer of "Age of Armageddon: The Spirit of Krynn" Once one feels justified, one is often bereft of conscience. -Ryan Tyler Palmer
Future will always remember the heroes, its because of them there exist a future. -Amit Kalantri
Gather the best you have to offer and create a heartfelt, prosperous life full of purpose. -Gail McMeekin
Gavin's Law: Live to start. Start to live. -Richie Norton
Generosity is to help a deserving person without his request, and if you help him after his request, then it is either out of self-respect or to avoid rebuke. -Hazrat Ali ibn Abu-Talib
Genius is the power of lighting one's own fire! -John Forster
Get close to someone and you're sure to see their weaknesses. Love them through it and you'll see their strengths. -Thomas Blevins
Give a girl the right shoes and she'll conquer the world. -Marilyn Monroe
Give as much as importance to your goal as you give it to your first girlfriend, with that much importance your girlfriend might still leave you but your goal will definitely come to you. -Amit Kalantri
Give me this gift, an understanding heart That I may comfort souls along the way. On wings of mercy, let my words convey Tidings that heal and bless when tear drops start. May this gift be of me so much a part That eloquence will brighten every day. (The inner knowing of just what to say And when to say it is a master art.) In all my striving let my heart discern When silence is the greater need, When just to listen while a soul is freed Of pent-up yearnings fosters hope's return. Words can best fill their embassy of peace After the burdened heart has found release. -Mirla Greenwood Thayne
Give people strength and encouragement, build them up with good words! -Robbie Thomas
Give us a world where half our homes are run by men, and half our institutions are run by women. I'm pretty sure that would be a better world. -Sheryl Sandberg
Go confidently in the direction of your dreams.  Live the life you have imagined. –Henry David Thoreau
Go for your goal, be ambitious. Do what you dream, unlock your wishes. -Aaron David
Go where your nose leads you -Patricia Griecci
Goals doesn't leave you like men, goals wait, they wait for their achievers. -Amit Kalantri
God always gives his best to those who leave the choice with him -Jim Elliot
God and Destiny are not against us, rather they are for us, they are the ones who never forget the things we have long forgotten, the ones who hear the desires of our heart that our own heads can't hear, and they are the ones who never forget who we really are, long after our minds have forgotten the images of who we are. We come from God and we belong to Destiny, yet for some reason of ignorance we think that to be the master of our own fates and the captain of our own souls means to write everything down on a paper and plan everything out on a grid! Such great things to be done, and we think they are accomplished by our primitive ways! No. We must only know what we want. And want what we want. And then fly high enough to see all that which we want that we couldn't yet see. -C. JoyBell C.
God blesses every one of us with certain unique talents and skills. Finding out what these are is a simple matter of discovering your uniqueness! -Thomas G. Eagan
God can turn the impossibile into possibilities. Possibilities become opportunities. Opportunities leads us one step closer to our dreams! -Anasia Nicole Hixon
God created each of us with different traits and characteristics, but regardless of what they may be, know that He made you perfect and has equipped you with every tool to accomplish your purpose  in life. Aim High and Dream Big! -Augusta DeJuan Hathaway
God does not give us everything we want, but He does fulfill His promises, leading us along the best and straightest paths to Himself.” - Dietrich Bonhoeffer -- Dietrich Bonhoeffer
God gave us ground we created a city, God gave us time we need to create a future. -Amit Kalantri
God gifted us only one life &amp; it is solely our choice to make it dull with one color, or beautiful with many colors! -Swati Jain
God has created you, not your future. -Amit Kalantri
God has not given us a spirit of fear. -Tyler Perry
God indeed created human with tears. So that people can learn to rise from the fall and the pain. -Mitamorfh
God is a man of his word, He always gives assurance  that every task or assignment will become a success. -Euginia Herlihy
God is a sound frequency, and we can all tune in if we just listen. Some find The Rhythm through different melodies, but it's all music. -Jennifer Sodini
God is as real as a station wagon. -Peggy Payne
God is available in your thinking, impulses, and impressions on your mind, so login -Ikechukwu Joseph
God is colourblind. But we are not God. God does not need to see colour and difference. God is far bigger than all of that. We are human. We are destined to grow and learn from each other and with each other and there is no growing, there is no learning, there is no wonder and no majesty in life if we were like God. We were meant to see colour and difference.To deny these is to lack respect. To blind ourselves to these is to fool one another. To shun these is to deny ourselves growth and knowledge. -C. JoyBell C.
God is funny. He had a funny day when he made me. A funny, thoughtful, crazy day. He gave me a physique by which I would be so easily and so quickly judged, then gave me a mind by which I would so deeply magnetize, He put within me a heart with small, fast wings that I can hardly, barely handle, and then gave me a voice that hides behind everything in whispers. Oh, and also put a pen in my hand which writes me into madness! How can anyone possibly understand me? But I don't think God cared about that thought, when He made me! How ridiculously unfair! -C. JoyBell C.
God is not a technician. God is an Artist. This is the God who made you. The same God who lives inside of you. He comes into us, then comes out of us, in a million little ways. That's why there's freedom, even in the blah. Hope, even in the dark. Love, even in the fear. Trust, even as we face our critics. And believe in the midst of all that? It feels like strength and depth and wildflower spinning; it feels risky and brave and underdog winning. It feels like redemption. It feels like art. -Emily P. Freeman
God is not just light, but also darkness; not just pleasure, but also pain; not just success but also the failures; not just life but also death. There is nothing that God is not. Shafin de Zane
God never created a pessimist man. The wrong ones is the man who possess optimist but already miss allocated it. S. IKom Afriani. L. S
God never leaves His children to wander alone. We are always surrounded with unconditional love. -Molly Friedenfeld
God used my year of waiting not to frustrate me, or abandon me, but to draw me into a closer relationship with Him. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
God uses people to help others. I only pray my faith is strong enough to get me through what I have to face. -Jennifer Hudson Taylor
God will never lead us down dark alleys, only lighted streets. -Kassi Pontious
God will prepare a table before you in the presence of your enemies so let them watch you eat. -Tyler Perry
God will really make your enemy your footstool -Tyler Perry
God would light the way. Faith would keep them on the right path. -Francine Rivers
God's image is more than flesh and bones. -Charles F. Glassman
God’s joy can fill our days with gladness until we receive the answer we are waiting for. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
Golden Rule Living is the great simplifier. It places us in another soul’s shoes, taking what can appear to be a com- plex decision that involves another and streamlining it to a one-step process of deciding, “If I wouldn’t like this done to me, then I shall not do it to another. -Molly Friedenfeld
Good job. -Blue Ivy Carter
Grace allows forgiveness and faith allows hope. -J.M. Northup
Grace is what picks me up and lifts my wings high above and I fly! Grace always conquers! Be graceful in everything; in anger, in sadness, in joy, in kindness, in unkindness, retain grace with you! -C. JoyBell C.
Gratitude is a quality similar to electricity; it must be produced and discharged and used up in order to exist at all. -William Faulkner
Gratitude is not just a word; it is a way a of life. -The Letters Of Gratitude
Gratitude opens the door to faith and faith opens the door to our relationship with God. -Charles F. Glassman
Great ambition without contribution is without significance.                 The Emperor's Club -Steve William Laible
Great ideas doesn't need approvals, they need application. -Amit Kalantri
Great is a person that can laugh at their troubles...for they have found an avenue to help them rise above their despair. -Timothy Pina
Great minds explore,Small minds learn. Learning is exploring,trying, experiencing  things ; Not reading. If you read and learn books,you will top the Indian education system. Knowledge is the key to  individual   achievement  and national  strength, Education is key to  individual   achievement  and national records. I never underestimate my enimies but they always do overestimate me. I know i am intligent,Because i know you are fool. If  Einstein  have worked according to the Indian education system,then we must don't have the photoelectric effect in our   syllabusss. We Indians are part of that  boundary on earth in which people follow the thoughts. For successful minds there is no next time. I don't think there is need to find right time for doing right things. Magic is in everyone but only few are magicians. One can not find wisdom in encyclopedia. If you can remember a lot,does not matter its write or wrong.You are the cbse topper. You are good politician if you can strike your enemies with  a single statement which is in your favor. You can be the next Gandhi or Bill Gates if you know how to lead and when to lead.  Your true friend is the one who does not know what  false friendship is. Why to work for land with fixed boundary when their are thousands of things to explore in this world. To be one and only is more then to be first. Knowledge is like a precious stone while your marks /scores are just like ordinary stone. Life teach better then teacher , So always learn from mistakes. If you are thinking something and you think that your thinking can make a difference then take a pen and paper and write it. Why to put the boundaries when religion is the strongest boundary which separates and divides the world.  For the limitless perfection we need confidence , ignorance and dedication. Always prepare for worst and hope for best. Stupidity is in thinking a failure stupid.  Your passion is the only thing which makes you winner.  You can laugh on someone's failure ; but one day he will laugh on your experiences.  No one leads on you if you lead on yourself. Life without discipline and uniformity is just like the Indian police job. The times when people remember god I'm self confident that is the reason why I'm my own god.  I am proud to be an EARTHEN more then proud to be an INDIAN.  Success is not what you desire but it is what you deserve.  Teen life is a chapter that is not to be learned but to be remembered.  Everyday is wonderful if we do not hope too much from it. It is so easy to give anyone pain but so difficult to make people laugh. The guns and the bombs, the rockets and the warships, are all symbols of human failure. But Still I love to have guns becuz success is my only option failure is not. To succeed, success should be the only option in our mind and failure is not. In India Development starts with promises and always ends with political war between parties and conditions remains same. -Abhinav Gaur
Great thinkers increase their self-esteem and mental capacity -Akubuiro Chidera
Greatness is never built on fear or doubt; believe in yourself for in you are seeds of greatness - rjs -rassool jibraeel snyman
Green strongly influences the heart and helps alleviate tension. Positive qualities associated with green are generosity, humility, and cooperation. Foods of the green vibration are all green fruits and green vegetables. -Tae Yun Kim
Gretel: Not the type of children I want to play with. Bruno: I could come over on a visit and no one would be any the wiser. -John Boyne
Growing age can kill the beauty, not the style. -Amit Kalantri
Growing up means learning what life is. When you're little, you have a set of ideals, standards, criteria, plans, outlooks, and you think that you have to sit around and wait for them to happen to you and then life will work. But life isn't like that, for anybody; you can't fall in love with a standard, you have to fall in love with a person. You can't live in a criteria, you have to live your life. You can't wait for your plans to materialize, because they may never materialize the way you think they will. You can't wait to watch your ideals and standards walk up to you, because you can't know what's yours until you have it. I always say, always take the first chance in case you never get a second one, but growing up takes that even one step further, growing up means that you have to hold on to what you have, when you have it, because what you have- that's yours- and all the ideals and criteria you have set in your head, those aren't yours, because those haven't happened to you. -C. JoyBell C.
Growth is achieved when truth is revealed. -Molly Friedenfeld
Growth or stagnation? There is no in-between. Life always seeks more of itself and death picks up the slack. -Christopher Babson
Guilt is to your health as a thief is to your wealth. -Charles F. Glassman
H is for Habit, winners make a habit of doing the things losers don't want to do. -Lucas Remmerswaal
Habits are good if you have the habit of the best. -Amit Kalantri
Hanya ketidakbahagiaan yang memiliki makna. Itulah sebab mengapa kita merasa terpaksa membicarakannya dan punya banyak kata untuk melukiskannya. Kebahagiaan tidak membutuhkan kata- kata. -Eric Weiner
Happiness and achieving our dreams is a matter of believing it is possible and having a positive frame of mind. -The Letters Of Gratitude
Happiness and struggles are in our lives treasure. Now its up to us which one we consider precious regardless of their amount.... -Fawad
Happiness cam be found even in the darkest of times if only one remembers to turn on the light. J.K Rowling
Happiness can be found, even in the darkest of times, if one only remembers to turn on the light. -Albus Dumbledore J.K. Rowling
Happiness is not something readymade.  It comes from your own actions. –Dalai Lama
Happiness surrounds those who are happy. -N.N. Light
Happy is the woman who has a man that shares the little things in life with her. -Jean Williams
Hard work is only a prison sentence when you lack motivation -Malcolm Gladwell
HARDWORKING is my GOAL to fulfill my DREAM with my own strength and power and fly high to inspire others..... -Angela Relato
Harus menjadi pemberani pada hidup yang dipilih, harus menjadi pejuang pada hidup yang di luar pilihan. -Ophan Bunjos
hating people is like a poisoned apple. The more you hated them , the faster the poisons spread. -Hihi
Hatred is a louder exhibition of inability. -Qaisar Iqbal Janjua
Hatred only tarnishes the soul that carries it. -D.B. Harrop
Hatred robs us of our soul. Brandon October
Have a courage to repulse those people who dare to affront you, because everyone has an Achilles' heel. Outshine them, and let your light hit on their damned faces, INTENSELY. -Maverick
Have a GOAL to keep the following 5-‘H’ OUT of your life H – Harass H – Hamper H – Hurt H – Harm H – Hinder To  Ensure H=Happiness Prevails forever! -Sujit Lalwani
Have no fear of perfection - you'll never reach it. - Salvador Dali -Salvador Dalí
Have peace in knowing, dear ones, that we are all composed of energy. Energy never dies. It is always changing and transforming. -Molly Friedenfeld
Having a vested interest in other souls unconditionally creates a ripple effect that produces miracles in the lives of those around us. -Molly Friedenfeld
Having the best doesn't make you the best but producing the best makes you the best -ejembi louis
He is foolish to blame the sea that is shipwrecked twice. -Publilius Syrus
He who fights is powerless, but he who loves is power itself. -Eric Micha'el Leventhal
He who hesitates is usually fucked! -Stephen King
He who is afraid to shake the dice will never throw a six -Chris Bradford
He who is not everyday conquering some fear has not learned the secret of life. Ralph Waldo Emerson. -Lorenz Font
He who speaks without modesty will find it difficult to make his words good. -Confucius
He won't listen to the music, and I can't turn it off. -V.C. Andrews
Healthy people sleep eight hours, Wealthy people sleep four hours. -Amit Kalantri
Heartbreak can make you hard! But don't let it make you bitter. -Tyler Perry
Hearts may break, but hearts are the toughest of muscles, able to pump for a lifetime, seventy times a minute, and scarcely falter along the way. Even dreams, the most delicate and intangible of things, can prove remarkably difficult to kill. -Neil Gaiman
Heavenly Father, my body cells are made of light, my fleshly cells are made of Thee. They are Spirit, for Thou art Spirit; they are immortal, for Thou art Life. -Paramahansa Yogananda
Hell in life indicates a state of suffering, of agony, of torture (by others, by circumstances, or by ourselves), and of insipid colors and little joy. Hell is a heavy vibration that drags us spiraling down from the highest to the lowest, darkest vibrations.. -Jacqueline Ripstein
Help each and every person who is in need, because you don't know at which moment you are in need! -Neeky Albert
Helping a friend is helping yourself. If you don’t help today, you will not be helped tomorrow. -Vinita Kinra
Hendaknya kita mengukur ilmu bukan dari tumpukan buku yang kita habiskan. Bukan dari tumpukan naskah yang kita hasilkan. Bukan juga dari penatnya mulut dalam diskusi tak putus yang kita jalani. Tapi…dari amal (action) yang keluar dari setiap desah nafas kita -Ibnul Qoyyim Al-Jauziyyah
Her magnificence is deeper than skin. -Delano Johnson Poet
Here is a universal law: that when it comes to negative and positive, you will always thrive more powerfully in the positive if you have first been immersed in, and have heroically overcome, the polar opposite negative of that thing. To abide in the positive existence of something, without having known and overcome it’s polar opposite— that is to be only a frame of the real structure. Easily toppled down and taken apart. True power is in the hands of the one who thrives in the positive, after having known and conquered the negative. Because when the demons come along, she will say to those demons: “I know you, I have owned you, but now you bow down to me. -C. JoyBell C.
Here, in this quiet place we own, worlds are born. -Cassandra Wilson Run the Voodoo Down
Herein lies the beauty of the flaw: that a shortcoming is a spiritual sign that says "Look! There is a perfect opportunity right here to grow and become better!" But instead of seeing those signs, people instead look and see something that is no longer worthy. Whether it be about themselves or about others. And so we have it that there are a great number of individuals who are missing out on great chances to improve themselves and to also believe in others. -C. JoyBell C.
Hero' is not an official status or designation, but if the world recognize you as a hero, it is the highest honor you will ever receive. -Amit Kalantri
Heroes are hero no matter if everybody is watching them or nobody watching them. -Amit Kalantri
Heroes are higher than their vulnerability that is why they are heroes. -Amit Kalantri
Heroes are the most wanted and most needed people in the world. -Amit Kalantri
Heroes don't have friends, they have fans. -Amit Kalantri
Heroes give hope. -Amit Kalantri
Heroes may die but they doesn't get tired. -Amit Kalantri
Heroism of your father doesn't make you a hero, heroism of you doesn't make your son a hero. -Amit Kalantri
Hi there. -J. Flores
Hidup harus terus berlanjut,tidak peduli seberapa menyakitkan atau membahagiakan, biar waktu yg menjadi obat -Tere Liye
Hidup tanpa harapan adalah hidup yang kosong -Pramoedya Ananta Toer
Hidup untuk lebih hidupnya kehidupan -Barry Perdana Putra
His emotions are not for men, they are for his vision. -Amit Kalantri
His life was gentle; and the elements So mixed in him, that Nature might stand up And say to all the world, THIS WAS A MAN! -William Shakespeare
His problem was the eternal question: What should he be? Inventor, scientist, artist—the energy he felt surging through him, an energy far more than physical and yet pervading the restlessness of his body, was a burden to him until he could find the path for its release. -Pearl S. Buck
History is a starting point to prepare for our future.... Brian Geza
Holding on to negative feelings and past circumstances is like placing a lock on your soul. -Charles F. Glassman
Home is the place where, when you have to go there, They have to take you in. -Robert Frost
Honour, in the Republic, had never been a goal in itself, only a means to an infinite end.  And what was true of her citizens, naturally, was also true of Rome herself.  For the generation that had lived through the civil wars, this was the consolation history gave them.  Out of calamity could come greatness.  Out of dispossession could come the renewal of a civilised order. -Tom Holland
Hope drowned in shadows emerges fiercely splendid–– boldly angelic. -Aberjhani
Hope is boss. -Ramon Williamson
Hope is the universal currency of a recession. Invest it wisely! -Paul Guildea
Horse have so much to teach us. -Camille Matthews
How could you love us being together?" he asked me "We are nothing alike and we are not meant for each other and we drive each other crazy, you love that? How can you love that?" So I told him "I know that we're not meant for each other, that we drive each other crazy, and that we are so different. But that's us. That's what we have; a wild nonsense. We are not good together, but together we are bad for each other. I love us together this way just like this. Because even if it's no good, it's what we have! It's us. -C. JoyBell C.
How do you let go of anger? How do you release a fury you’ve been standing on for so long, you would stumble were it yanked away? -Mitch Albom
How is it that from beauty I have derived a type of unloveliness? - from the covenant of peace, a simile of sorrow?  But as, in ethics, evil is a consequence of good, so, in fact, out of joy is sorrow born. -Edgar Allan Poe's &quot;Berenice&quot;
how many people never see how beautiful the sky is at night because they simply don’t take the time to look up? -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
How wonderful it is that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world. –Anne Frank
However mean your life is, meet it and live it; do not shun it and call it hard names. It is not so bad as you are. It looks poorest when you are richest. The fault-finder will find faults even in paradise. Love your life, poor as it is. You may perhaps have some pleasant, thrilling, glorious hours, even in a poor-house. The setting sun is reflected from the windows of the almshouse as brightly as from the rich man's abode. -Henry David Thoreau
Hug your customers but also offer handshake to your competitors. -Amit Kalantri
Human beings are members of a whole, in creation of one essence and soul. If one member is afflicted with pain, other members uneasy will remain. If you have no empathy for human pain, the name of human you cannot retain Saadi-Sufi mystic poem
Human Nature "One Looks Negativity to Improve Him/Her &amp; Other Looks Their Negativity To Proof That I am A Fool -Er Sachin Masand
Humanity does not suffer from the disease of wrong beliefs but humanity suffers from the contagious nature of the lack of belief. If you have no magic with you it is not because magic does not exist but it is because you do not believe in it. Even if the sun shines brightly upon your skin every day, if you do not believe in the sunlight, the sunlight for you does not exist. -C. JoyBell C.
Humble pie tastes horrible but is great for the digestive system. -Sissy Silva
humility must not be equated to mediocrity and cowardice -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
I account this world a tedious theater, For I do play a part in 't 'gainst my will. -John Webster
I admire the people in class who, even though they have been at this for a long time, are panting on the edge of passing out and dripping sweat mid-way through class.  They push themselves to their absolute breaking point.  They don’t care who’s watching, who’s judging, or even if they pass out or puke.  They are committed and they are going to give themselves a challenge no matter what.  I love being in class with this kind of student.  They inspire me and make me want to be my best too. -De Ruisseau Craig A.
I agree that sometimes it is difficult to choose between right and wrong, but not between right and stupid. -Amit Kalantri
I am a creator, writing like the wind, I carry the weight of a future world in the barrel of a pen, etching my characters into the paper with life giving ink so my dreams and reality might finally meet. -L.M. Fields
I am a flawed person. A brook with many stones, a clear blue sky with many blackbirds. I have many shortcomings. A rainbow that’s not long enough, a starry night with clouds. But I can only be thankful to the God who loves me just this way, and I can only be grateful to the people in my life who accept the clear blue sky with many blackbirds and who are patient with the rainbow that isn’t long enough. And because of this, I am taught love, because of this I love my God, and I love these people. -C. JoyBell C.
I am an extremely sincere individual. I am sincere, to a fault. One of the many things that I have come to realize, to learn, is that sincerity must be reserved and given only to those who deserve it. And one must save one's emotions, channeling them only to the people who are worthy of it. One must not throw one's pearls to the pigs. -C. JoyBell C.
I am chic, sleek, and so unique. -Charles F. Glassman
I am convinced that one should tell one's spiritual director if one has a great desire for Communion, for Our Lord does not come from Heaven every day to stay in a golden ciborium; He comes to find another heaven, the heaven of our soul in which He loves to dwell. -Thérèse de Lisieux
I am fortunate to be a resemblance, rather than a replication of who I was yesterday. -The Letters Of Gratitude
I am going to open myself up to all that is superior in the world and beyond and I am going to spend time trying to take delight in things! Not finding ruin in them! If the ruin of you is what you look for, the ruin of you is what you are going to find! -C. JoyBell C.
I Am In Love With Myself, With My Heart. -Nirav Sanchaniya
I am just a big girl with big dreams who believes that the impossible can happen each and every day.”-Kay Marie -Kay Marie
I am my own biggest critic. Before anyone else has criticized me, I have already criticized myself. But for the rest of my life, I am going to be with me and I don't want to spend my life with someone who is always critical. So I am going to stop being my own critic. It's high time that I accept all the great things about me. -C. JoyBell C.
I am never alone wherever I am. The air itself supplies me with a century of love. When I breathe in, I am breathing in the laughter, tears, victories, passions, thoughts, memories, existence, joys, moments, and the hues of the sunlight on many tones of skin; I am breathing in the same air that was exhaled by many before me. The air that bore them life. And so how can I ever say that I am alone? -C. JoyBell C.
I am not a extra-ordinary person, In the same way I am not a ordinary person. -AR Bharaty
I am not a little bit of many things; but I am the sufficient representation of many things. I am not an incompletion of all these races; but I am a masterpiece of the prolific. I am an entirety, I am not a lack of anything; rather I am a whole of many things. God did not see it needful to make me generic. He thinks I am better than that. -C. JoyBell C.
I am not a product of my circumstances. I am a product of my decisions. –Stephen Covey
I am not an optimist, but a great believer  of hope. -Nelson Mandela
I am not interested in having the world revolve around me; that's too boring of an idea. I would rather revolve around the world and try to leave my fingerprints, everywhere. My fingerprints mingled in with all the other fingerprints and all the laughter and all the beautiful things like gratitude, grace, faithfulness and flowers. -C. JoyBell C.
I am not stopping till my critics become my fans. -Amit Kalantri
I am not stopping till my enemies become my friends. -Amit Kalantri
I am opposed to animal welfare campaigns for two reasons. First, if animal use cannot be morally justified, then we ought to be clear about that, and advocate for no use. Although rape and child molestation are ubiquitous, we do not have campaigns for “humane” rape or “humane” child molestation. We condemn it all. We should do the same with respect to animal exploitation.  Second, animal welfare reform does not provide significant protection for animal interests. Animals are chattel property; they are economic commodities. Given this status and the reality of markets, the level of protection provided by animal welfare will generally be limited to what promotes efficient exploitation. That is, we will protect animal interests to the extent that it provides an economic benefit. -Gary L. Francione
I am reminded that the children we birth do not belong to us.  They belong to God.  We are simply the vessel through which they arrive on this earth.  We are appointed to care for and guide them; however, we must recognize when the time comes for them to govern their own lives. -Nancy B. Brewer
I am still not good enough. I am still not whole enough. I am still not pure enough. I am still weakness and sharp edges and broken, but He is good and pure and whole, all that I strive for but am not.  I wake up every morning and I sit in silence and I choose to believe. I may speak. I may not. I let Him wrap up all my broken in to His grace. He takes me imperfect. This is the great mystery I never knew. -Anna White
I am the best person in the universe. -Kendrick Nguyen
I am the only force strong enough to stop me. -Naya S. Wood
I am; I was. I want to be. -Joe Hill
I aspire to be whom I most desire~ -Deborah A. Carr
I attribute my success to this: I never gave or took any excuse. –Florence Nightingale
I believe God spoke to you at cliffs. Her hand came to rest on the top of my head. But perhaps you weren't truly listening -Jenny B. Jones
I believe in beauty. I believe in goodness. I believe in the power of turning: the other cheek, time, curve of the earth. -Anna White
I believe in going with the flow. I don't believe in fighting against the flow. You ride on your river and you go with the tides and the flow. But it has to be your river, not someone else's. Everyone has their own river, and you don't need to swim,float,sail on their's, but you need to be in your own river and you need to go with it. And I don't believe in fighting the wind. You go and you fly with your wind. Let everyone else catch their own gusts of wind and let them fly with their own gusts of wind, and you go and you fly with yours. -C. JoyBell C.
I believe in miracles.... I have to. -Terry Fox
I believe in roses. And I believe in putting roses into a vase and sitting the vase on the table. I believe in getting lost and being found, I believe in going barefoot, and in laughter! My religion is to laugh at myself, whenever I can! I believe in the sunlight and in grey skies with big, beautiful clouds! -C. JoyBell C.
I believe in roses. Oh God, yes! I do believe in roses! And I believe in lots and lots and lots of them, too! -C. JoyBell C.
I believe in strong women. I believe in the woman who is able to stand up for herself. I believe in the woman who doesn't need to hide behind her husband's back. I believe that if you have problems, as a woman you deal with them, you don't play victim, you don't make yourself look pitiful, you don't point fingers. You stand and you deal. You face the world with a head held high and you carry the universe in your heart. -C. JoyBell C.
I believe that the most important thing for a couple of any sort, to realize in their relationship with each other (and please allow me to share this with you), is that neither are a limited source. You see, the idea of the soul is that it is eternal and that it continually receives from an Eternal Source. So the idea in any relationship is never really what you can get from it; but the idea is what you can give to the other, what you can put into it. Withdrawing from eternity— and depositing into the physical realm. Of course, as you both give, you are also both receiving from one another, thus a beautiful relationship is formed and maintained. It's that certain flow that needs to be encouraged and allowed. I say "allowed" because it's natural, however, it's usually not "allowed" because our human faculties are taught and bombarded by stupid ideas in magazines that relationships are all about what one can get from it; it's never about giving! So in a nutshell, the idea is to give because you know that you are receiving from an Everlasting Source, but to also remain graceful and eager enough to also receive gratefully from the other. And this is how eternal relationships are born. We are all conduits of eternity and we happen to meet another conduit whom we feel we belong with, then we share what we receive from eternity and receive what the other has to share. -C. JoyBell C.
I believe that we are solely responsible for our choices, and we have to accept the consequences of every deed, word, and thought throughout our lifetime. -Elizabeth Kübler-Ross
I believe the most difficult situation to be in, is one of mind-game-playing. Interestingly enough, it can be observed that it’s those from the most prosperous countries that tend to play the most mind-games with other people. They even write things about it. Why is it very difficult to be honest and transparent about what one thinks and feels? Why must one resort to manipulations and mind-mockery and mimicry? It is such a sad situation or state for any person to be in. Living in cubicle within cubicle within cubicle of themselves. Victims and perpetrators of mind games, interestingly, are the most paranoid about it happening to them— because they do it, they think everyone else does it too. Or because it’s been done to them, they think everyone will do it to them. Why cannot people say what they think, think what they say, say what they mean and mean what they say? The world would be happier if we were all just living out in a big plain in Africa! Roaming with animals, walking barefoot, being simple, transparent, real... -C. JoyBell C.
I believe there is another world waiting for us. A better world. And I'll be waiting for you there. -David Mitchell
I can assure everyone, that God is looking at the condition of your heart; not at the faith that you profess to have. After all, God is the God of all people, God is not sitting inside of a bottle, belonging to any one group of people. God looks at the condition of the hearts of every person, no matter what faith you belong to, no matter if you even have any faith at all. The days of using God to make ourselves look more elevated amongst the human race— should now be over. -C. JoyBell C.
I can do nothing without His help.  Oh, Lord, what ignorance thinking everything was wealth. -Venus Angelica Perez
I can lend you my money not my books. -Amit Kalantri
I can manage," said Frodo. "I must. -J.R.R. Tolkien
I can no other answer make but thanks, and thanks, and ever thanks. -William Shakespeare
I can't imagine anything more dangerous to the enemy of our hearts than people who know who they are. -Emily P. Freeman
I can't over-emphasize how important an exquisite perfume is, to be wrapped and cradled in an enchanting scent upon your skin is a magic all on its own! The notes in that precious liquid will remind you that you love yourself and will tell other people that they ought to love you because you know that you're worth it. The love affair created by a good perfume between you and other people, you and nature, you and yourself, you and your memories and anticipations and hopes and dreams; it is all too beautiful a thing! -C. JoyBell C.
I cannot compromise my respect for your love. You can keep your love, I will keep my respect. -Amit Kalantri
I cannot hate gay men, I cannot hate homosexuality. At the lowest points in my life, when all else abandoned me, my gay men friends were my sisters, aunts, mothers who lifted me up on their shoulders and reminded me that there is light at the end of the tunnel. If I were to hate gay men, or to condemn them just because they're gay, I would be a hypocrite. I simply cannot turn my back on arms that held me in my darkest hours. -C. JoyBell C.
I can’t sing “I Believe I Can Fly”. I sing that horrible. But I can sing “I Gotta Feeling” good. I wrote it for my capabilities. So I Gotta Feeling is just about let me make a song to inspire people to have a good time. -Will.i.am
I chase goals, not girls. -Amit Kalantri
I consider myself a stained-glass window. And this is how I live my life. Closing no doors and covering no windows; I am the multi-colored glass with light filtering through me, in many different shades. Allowing light to shed and fall into many many hues. My job is not to direct anything, but only to filter into many colors. My answer is destiny and my guide is joy. And there you have me. -C. JoyBell C.
I could recognise his soul in mine as much as he could find me in his. Our sole existences seemed to have been for this very moment when nothing else mattered. -X. Williamson
I decided to do the easy task of changing situations and conditions by being a hero, than staying back to do the difficult task of changing people by being just a man. -Amit Kalantri
I didn't fail the test. I just found 100 ways to do it wrong. –Benjamin Franklin
I do not regret one moment of my life. -Lillie Langtry
I don't beg for those things which can be earned. -Amit Kalantri
I don't consider those competitions fair where judges get to decide the winner, because selected judges quite often are not worthy or qualified enough to make the right decision. -Amit Kalantri
I don't crave success.  I crave happiness and that’s what makes me successful. -Nick Marquet
I don't dream at night, I dream at day, I dream all day; I'm dreaming for living. -Steven Spielberg
I don't expect congratulations for successful beginning, what I want is the applaud at successful ending. -Amit Kalantri
I don't fit into any stereotypes. And I like myself that way. -C. JoyBell C.
I don't have a diary, I don't write things into a diary. I imprint myself into the sky and when the sunlight shines brightly, I can stand under the sun's rays and everything I have imprinted of myself into the sky, I will begin to see again, feel again, remember. And when the wind begins to blow, it blows the details over my face, and I remember everything I left in the sky and see new things being born. I am unwritten. -C. JoyBell C.
I don't know why people are afraid of lust. Then I can imagine that they are very afraid of me, for I have a great lust for everything. A lust for life, a lust for how the summer-heated street feels beneath my feet, a lust for the touch of another's skin on my skin...a lust for everything. I even lust after cake. Yes, I am very lusty and very scary. -C. JoyBell C.
I don't like museums, I like labs. -Amit Kalantri
I don't look for love. Love looks for me." "Why?" "Because it needs me. Because I'm not afraid of it. -C. JoyBell C.
i don't need any valentine to show my love for you. As you always there in everything i do. -prashant chaudhari
I don't put my ideas in a meeting for acceptance or rejection, I put them in the market for success or failure. -Amit Kalantri
I don't regret my painful times, i bare my scars as if they were medals. I know that freedom has a high price, as high as that of slavery; the only difference is that you pay with pleasure and a smile, even when that that smile dimmed by tears -Paulo Coelho
I don't so much mind looking back on having lost the election, or having been denied a role in the play, or having had my novel repeatedly rejected, or having been turned down for a date, or recalling laughter at my expense when I attempted some silly challenge.  Those things simply prove that I lived life.  What I do mind, however, is looking back on the lost opportunities where imagined concerns kept me from even trying—lose or win.  I've learned that there is no regret in a brave attempt, only in cowering to fear. -Richelle E. Goodrich
I don't understand dating.. and the other things that people do.. all I know is that you ought to find the one you recognize. The one who gives you four arms, four legs, four eyes, and has the other half of your heart. There's only one of those, so what are all the other things for? Like dating? -C. JoyBell C.
I don't understand this irony - valuable things like cars, gold, diamond are made up of hard materials but most valuable things like money, contracts and books are made up of soft paper. -Amit Kalantri
I don't understand why people care so much about showing that they are good; because I am rather comfortable with having badness, quite okay with being inexplicable. They tire themselves so. The light is beautiful; but light can't hide treasures like the darkness can. -C. JoyBell C.
I don't want to write soft, easy fiction; I want to write fiction that challenges. -Brian A. McBride
I don't waste food, water, money, time and talent. -Amit Kalantri
I don’t want to freeze my eggs. I don’t want to visit a sperm bank. I don’t want to be a single parent, if I have any choice in the matter. I want a nuclear family. I want to put down roots, to let my seeds germinate, to watch them bloom and flourish. Not one day, if and when I ever fall in love again, but now. While I still have my youth, damn it. -Monica Pradhan
I enjoy growing older and wiser and learning from my mistakes every single day. -Ellen DeGeneres
I fatti di tutti sono i fatti di nessuno. -L.M. Montgomery
I feel like, God expects me to be human. I feel like, God likes me just the way I am: broken and empty and bruised. I feel like, God doesn't look at me and wish that I were something else, because He likes me just this way. I feel like, God doesn't want me to close my eyes and pray for Him to make me holy or for Him to make me pure; because He made me human. I feel like, God already knows I'm human...it is I who needs to learn that. -C. JoyBell C.
I fell in love with you like I fell asleep- slowly and then all at once. -John Green
I find it odd- the greed of mankind. People only like you for as long as they perceive they can get what they want from you. Or for as long as they perceive you are who they want you to be. But I like people for all of their changing surprises, the thoughts in their heads, the warmth that changes to cold and the cold that changes to warmth... for being human. The rawness of being human delights me. -C. JoyBell C.
I find no importance in showing others that I am happy; it's not important to me that they know or think that I am happy but what is important to me is that I am happy. I am interested in being happy, not in making others think or know that I am. -C. JoyBell C.
I gasp my last sigh and realise how right Tree is: all is as it is, as it is meant to be. -Judy Croome
I go to encounter for the millionth time the reality of experience and to forge in the smithy of my soul the uncreated conscience of my race. -James Joyce
I had always felt life first as a story: and if there is a story there is a story-teller -G.K. Chesterton
I Hate This Feeling Like I'm here, but I'm not. Like someone cares. But they don't. Like I belong somewhere else, anywhere but here, and escape lies just past that snowy window, cool and crisp as the February air. I consider the streets beyond, bleak as the bleached bones of wilderness scaffolding my heart. Just a stone's throw away. -Ellen Hopkins
I have a dream.” “Is your dream very big?” “No.” “Well is it very grand?” “Not either.” “Neither?” “Neither.” “What is it then?” “It is very shiny. -C. JoyBell C.
I have a picture of the Pont Neuf on a wall in my apartment, but i know that Paris is really on the closet shelf, in the box next to the sleeping bag, with the rest of my diaries. -Thomas Mallon
I have a vision. In this vision, I see men not being distrustful of women and I see women not being distrustful of men. I see a world wherein people don’t say, “I want to win, I want to control, I want to make him/her...” when talking about a potential lover. I see men believing in women and women believing in men, believing in each others’ dreams and ambitions. And I have another vision. In this vision, I see women looking at other women with eyes of love and men looking at other men with eyes of acceptance. In these two visions, I see all people looking at all other people and remembering that we are all children on the inside. We all don't want to be hurt, we all don’t want to be left behind and we all want to know where home is. -C. JoyBell C.
I have been impressed with the urgency of doing. Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Being willing is not enough; we must do. –Leonardo da Vinci
I have been loved enough, now I want to be respected. -Amit Kalantri
I have come to accept the feeling of not knowing where I am going. And I have trained myself to love it. Because it is only when we are suspended in mid-air with no landing in sight, that we force our wings to unravel and alas begin our flight. And as we fly, we still may not know where we are going to. But the miracle is in the unfolding of the wings. You may not know where you're going, but you know that so long as you spread your wings, the winds will carry you. -C. JoyBell C.
I have found that the only consolation is never regretting anything that you do.  Never look back, always look forward and continue moving along with a confidence that everything you’re doing and everything you’ve done is the way it’s supposed to be. -Randolph J. Rogers
I have found the paradox that if I love until it hurts, then there is no hurt, but only more love. -Mother Teresa
I have just lost my reason for fighting so hard. How do I go on now, without my thing to fight for?' And he whispered into my ear, he said: 'Maybe it's time to stop fighting. -C. JoyBell C.
I have learned over the years that when one's mind is made up, this diminishes fear. –Rosa Parks
I have learned that positive encouragement and positive advice is limited to the believers not the masses -Herbert Edgar Alamo
I have learned that you can go anywhere you want to go and do anything you want to do and buy all the things that you want to buy and meet all the people that you want to meet and learn all the things that you desire to learn and if you do all these things but are not madly in love: you have still not begun to live. -C. JoyBell C.
I have learned, that the person I have to ask for forgiveness from the most is: myself. You must love yourself. You have to forgive yourself, everyday, whenever you remember a shortcoming, a flaw, you have to tell yourself "That's just fine". You have to forgive yourself so much, until you don't even see those things anymore. Because that's what love is like. -C. JoyBell C.
I have learnt that once one lets go of all expectations, one can never be disappointed; everything then that comes one's way, will be an appreciated blessing. -Aisha Mirza
I have lived my life backwards as compared to my peers. Everyone did incredibly stupid things as teenagers and pre-teens. I didn't. I was the one telling everybody that they were incredibly stupid. Now that they are all past that stage and we are all much older— I am the one doing incredibly stupid things. I have figured that I've earned that right, by now! You have to earn the right to be stupid. -C. JoyBell C.
I have lost my soul into my work, and I have lost my mind in the process."                  ~Vincent van Gogh -Vincent van Gogh
I have realized; it is during the times I am far outside my element that I experience myself the most. That I see and feel who I really am, the most! I think that's what a comet is like, you see, a comet is born in the outer realms of the universe! But it's only when it ventures too close to our sun or to other stars that it releases the blazing "tail" behind it and shoots brazen through the heavens! And meteors become sucked into our atmosphere before they burst like firecrackers and realize that they're shooting stars! That's why I enjoy taking myself out of my own element, my own comfort zone, and hurling myself out into the unknown. Because it's during those scary moments, those unsure steps taken, that I am able to see that I'm like a comet hitting a new atmosphere: suddenly I illuminate magnificently and fire dusts begin to fall off of me! I discover a smile I didn't know I had, I uncover a feeling that I didn't know existed in me... I see myself. I'm a shooting star. A meteor shower. But I'm not going to die out. I guess I'm more like a comet then. I'm just going to keep on coming back. -C. JoyBell C.
I honor the past. I'm loyal to the future. But I fight with the present. Since NOW's where I belong, every battle's fought with urgency. -Ace Antonio Hall
I hope I don't write TOO many books! When I look at authors who have written too many books, I wonder to myself "When did they live?" I certainly want to write BECAUSE I live! I know I don't want to write in order to live! My writing is an overflow of the wine glass of my life, not a basin in which I wash out my ideals and expectations. -C. JoyBell C.
I hope you take the courage to pursue your dreams. I wish that you will have the determination to start the best day of your life everyday. -Happy Positivity
I implore the atheist not to judge the religious and I implore the religious to not find fault with the atheist. Be a good religious person, or be a good atheist person. How? By putting an end to faultfinding. All do what they believe in their best interest to do and with a little insight and understanding, all can see that the only way anyone can do any good service to the world, is by being thankful for what is been given him, by looking inwards to correct his own faults instead of the perceived faults of others, and by keeping his eye upon his own horizon; not upon the perceived horizons of anybody else. -C. JoyBell C.
I is for Integrity, be honest with yourself and others. -Lucas Remmerswaal
I just believe that us as women— should not criticize nor pull down other women. And why? Because we’re all just trying our best to be beautiful! We all just want to be loved, we want to be beautiful, we’re all trying to leave our own legacy! The good news is that the universe is unending and that means there is enough space for each woman on earth to leave her own mark and to be her own legacy. To be her own kind of beautiful. So why spend even a second on trying to take away from another woman? Trying to steal, trying to criticize, trying to oppress? There is enough space for every woman and every kind of beautiful, in this vast cosmos! When you waste any amount of time trying to take what is another’s— you are wasting your huge chunk of a galaxy that’s already been given to you! -C. JoyBell C.
I knew there were no such things as death cooties.  Unfortunately, that's an intellectual fact.  And death cooties are an emotional reality. -Janet Evanovich
I knew who I was this morning, but I've changed a few times since then. -Lewis Carroll
I know but one freedom, and that is the freedom of the mind. Antoine de Saint-Exupery
I know from the bottom of my heart and with all of it, that it doesn't matter if at the end of your life you can say that you shared the best of yourself with the rest of the world and it doesn't matter if everyone in the world remembers you as wonderful; but what matters is if at the end of your life you can say that you shared the best of yourself with the handful of people who are around you, that you gave the wonderful in you, to the people you love and who love you. Happiness never has and never will come from fame. -C. JoyBell C.
I know I don’t know you all that well, but I honestly believe you can live a magical life, no matter what your  situation is just now. How do I know this? Well, I believe in the power of the mind, and because of that I totally believe in you. I know, 100%,  that you can have the life you want, and all you need is belief in yourself, and the motivation to take action to get what you want without giving up. -Steven Aitchison
I know that when things are at their worst, something better is just around the corner if we just put one foot in front of the other and keep moving forward. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
I learned a long time ago writing does soothe the soul. Our deepest feelings grasp our hands and as fast as you think of it your utmost feelings is in plain view.  "A wisp of a thought brought to life. -Darlene Cruz
I led the life of so many other so-called respectable people,—that is, in debauchery. And like the majority, while leading the life of a debauche, I was convinced that I was a man of irreproachable morality. -Leo Tolstoy
I like to set my dreams high. That way, even if I only make it half way there, it's still pretty darned good. -Elizabeth O. Dulemba
I looked around and acknowledged that what you see around you is proof of what exists within you. -Adam Braun
I looked long and hard for the paper roses! I found the reddest red ribbon, and a little golden card! We were all there together, many of us, in the same place; but I was the only one who found the paper roses, the only one who chose the reddest red ribbon, and the only one who topped off with a golden card. And so I learned that if people are unhappy, it is only because they don't know how to look for the paper roses, they don't see the reddest red ribbon, and they don't like the little golden cards. We are all in the same wrap-shoppe in this life. But we are different. Because some of us are looking for the paper roses, choosing the reddest red ribbon, and picking up the little golden cards. -C. JoyBell C.
I love words.  I crave descriptions that overwhelm my imagination with vivid detail.  I dwell on phrases that make my heart thrum.  I cherish expressions that pierce my emotions and force the tears to spill over.   In essence, I long for a writer's soul sealed in ink on the page. -Richelle E. Goodrich
I love you but I got to love me more. -Peggi Speers
I love you Jack.  A woman's heart is a deep ocean of secrets.  Jack, this is where we first met. -James Cameron
I may be a idiot, but most of the time, anyway, I tried to do the right thing, an dreams is just dreams, ain’t they? So whatever else has happened, I am figgerin this: I can always look back an say, at least I ain’t led no hum-drum life. -Winston Groom
I may never know when an answer to prayer is going to arrive, but I know that God will never fail me. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
I NAME THIS LAND TOMORROW, FOR IT SHALL LAST FOREVERMORE! -Cressida Cowell
I name you today, heart fears. I am small, but you are smaller. You will not stop me. You have a voice, fears, and I must listen, but then I will open my heart. I will love you right to death. -Anna White
I never encountered any crisis in life, because I solved my problems before they turned into crisis. -Amit Kalantri
I never had any doubts about my abilities. I knew I could write. I just had to figure out how to eat while doing this. [Cormac McCarthy's Venomous Fiction, New York Times, April 19, 1992] -Cormac McCarthy
I never trust frank and simple people whose stories hold together. -Hemmingway Ernest
I observe life more than I live it. -Jayme K.
I opened the diary that is my life this morning, and began again with the words - I am grateful. -Sherri Lynea Gerek
I pray, before I die, that I receive the power to believe in fairytales again, Oh' how I would love to laugh and know that God laughed with me. -Tonny K. Brown
I promise. For the other side of the card, I put the giraffe and penguin on it and wrote: To think and try not to over think. To breathe, but not hyperventilate. To try to envision the best, and not dwell on the worst. To call you when I'm in trouble. To not do anything permanent on a situation that might be temporary. -Shirley Miranda
I reject animal welfare reform and single-issue campaigns because they are not only inconsistent with the claims of justice that we should be making if we really believe that animal exploitation is wrong, but because these approaches cannot work as a practical matter. Animals are property and it costs money to protect their interests; therefore, the level of protection accorded to animal interests will always be low and animals will, under the best of circumstances, still be treated in ways that would constitute torture if applied to humans. By endorsing welfare reforms that supposedly make exploitation more “compassionate” or single-issue campaigns that falsely suggest that there is a coherent moral distinction between meat and dairy or between fur and wool or between steak and foie gras, we betray the principle of justice that says that all sentient beings are equal for purposes of not being used exclusively as human resources. And, on a practical level, we do nothing more than make people feel better about animal exploitation. -Gary L. Francione
I rely on one thing in this world: my actions. I will leave nothing to chance and prefer playing the game of life with the strongest hand possible. -Liv Morris
I see it perfectly; there are two possible situations - once can either do this or that.  My honest opinion and my friendly advice is this: do it or do not do it - you will regret both. -SOREN KIERKEGAARD
I see myself as a Scottish sky: there are rain clouds, rainbows and sunrays that run and overtake one another, mingle together and dance with each other! You see all of this within seconds of looking up! It’s a living sky, it breathes and it’s real! And I think that when you look at me, you’ll see my rain clouds first, because only after rainclouds can there come the rainbows. You see, if the rainbows come first, then the rainbows aren’t even real, so I think that if people deserve to see my real rainbows, then they will just know that they need to stick around through the rain! Like a Scottish sky, I want to be real and breathing and running. I don’t want to be a clear blue all the time, or a dark grey all the time or have fake rainbows painted onto me; I want to be Scottish. -C. JoyBell C.
I slipped, but that's was the point where i learned to walk -Ahamed Nafaz Raja.S.N
I speak less because my words are precious and my advices are priceless. -Amit Kalantri
I spend money on convenient, comfortable and luxurious things; I spend money on books too. -Amit Kalantri
I SPIT real good rhymes, so they say I’m pregnant  That’s not case, I see the art of rhyming as a grass, I am only a ruminant My rhymes are just poignant  i own this art , you are just a tenant -Rhymesonny
I suggest that people walk around under the moon barefoot, as I have today. There's that voice of your mom and dad and aunt and big sister and uncle and annoying cousin in your ear saying "Your feet are going to get dirty and you're going to turn into a bat" so the defiance in the act of simply taking your shoes off and standing there under that moon— is astronomical. A dirty-feet-moonlit-defiance that will make you smile. -C. JoyBell C.
I suppose that's the secret, if you're ever wishing for things to go back to the way they were. You just have to look up. -Lauren Oliver
I suppose we must work on being gracious and grateful until we can do for ourselves. Someday the wheel of fate will put us in a position to be of use to them, and we will remember how much easier it is to give help than it is to accept it. -Patricia Briggs
I swear, the best things come to me by accident! Or should I say, effortless destiny? -C. JoyBell C.
I take my actions because of my passion not because of compulsion. -Amit Kalantri
I talked to my nephew today, he's afraid of the dark. Or was. I said, "Why are you afraid of the dark? In the darkness we find many beautiful things!" He said, "Like what?" And I said, "Like the Moon and the stars! We would never see them without the darkness! And have you ever been to a movie house before? Do you think it would be as fun if it wasn't dark inside? And all the creatures under the sea— they're always there, swimming beautifully in the darkness of the waters!" And he said, "Bad things like ghosts are just fairy tales, right?" Then I told him, "Even if there were ghosts all around, they would not change in the darkness; they would be just the same as they are in the light. Look, we live in a world where there are bad things but there's no difference between these things whether they are in the darkness or in the light! Everything good and bad is always there; what changes is what and when we can see them. And the darkness brings us many beautiful experiences that we wouldn't be able to see in the light." And then I gave him a piece of my son's meteorite stone, I told him that whenever he feels afraid in the dark, he can hold onto it and it should remind him that many beautiful things, like that meteorite, come from the darkness so there's really nothing to ever be afraid of. -C. JoyBell C.
I tell people not to be afraid of their fears; because their fears are not there to scare them, they're there to let them know that something is worth it. Yet I am often afraid. I guess that means in my life, lots of things have been worth it! -C. JoyBell C.
I tell young people: Do not think of yourself, think of others.  Think of the future that awaits you, think about what you can do and do not fear anything. -Rita Levi-Montalcini
I think a good rule of thumb for being true to your own convictions is this; don't do or champion anything in the name of a group that you wouldn't do or champion as an individual - for if you do so, you become a chameleon that fades into the colours of group think, and you compromise the autonomy of individuation. -James Knight - The Philosophical Muser
I think again about the Tree of Life. A wonderful notion that we as people are all stemmed and thrive from a tree springing life from branches reaching out to help our blood flow and providing oxygen to breathe. -Nicholas A. McGirr
I think i should not afraid to lose what wasn't meant to be. -Redzel Romulo
I think that fame removes true happiness. Because when you are famous, people know you for who they think you are and when you are happy, it's because people have met you and see you for who you really are. Of course, if you are not a great person, it's better to be famous. But if you have greatness, it's better to not be famous. -C. JoyBell C.
I think that if you have a horse, pegasus, qilin, or unicorn, you should sit on it! You should stroke its hair, whisper in its ear, be one with it! And you shouldn't feel sorry if other people don't have one. -C. JoyBell C.
I think that the best kind of change, is the change that comes from the inside and begins it's way out until it emerges on the outside; a change that is born underneath then continues and spreads until it has reached the surface. That's a true change. A powerful change. And I have found that while we are emerging, changing into something glorious; it is actually us becoming who we really are. A water lily is born underneath the water, inside the soil at the bottom of the river or lake. And the water lily has always been a water lily for that whole time that it was sprouting out of the wet soil, reaching up through the dark water towards the sunlight, stretching and grasping for the surface; where it then buds and blooms on the outside in the sunshine. It doesn't bud and bloom on the surface and then try to reach down below into the soil. -C. JoyBell C.
I think that the best thing we can do for our children is to allow them to do things for themselves, allow them to be strong, allow them to experience life on their own terms, allow them to take the subway... let them be better people, let them believe more in themselves. -C. JoyBell C.
I think that there are those who write of life being a skip on the sidewalk, a chocolate bar, a bowl of cherries... the problem with that is it ends up disappointing people. Because life is more like being on the tube in London; you never really know what could happen! But then there are those people who bring a box of chocolates to eat on the tube...so life, it isn't a skip on the sidewalk, but it is a matter of strength: "Can I bring my bowl of cherries to feast on while I stand here in the gutter?" that's the essence of life. Can you still put on your rose-colored glasses while your eyes are filled with tears, and see everything in rosy colors? That's the strength that fuels a true life. Can you think to bring your little box of chocolates with you while you sit on the tube running under the streets of London? Because you should. Because even if you don't know anybody, and you don't know what's gonna happen next, you should have your box of chocolates with you. You should eat your bowl of cherries. And that is what life is. -C. JoyBell C.
I think that we are like stars. Something happens to burst us open; but when we burst open and think we are dying; we’re actually turning into a supernova. And then when we look at ourselves again, we see that we’re suddenly more beautiful than we ever were before! -C. JoyBell C.
I thought that my voyage had come to its end at the last limit of my power, that the path before me was closed, that provisions were exhausted, and the time come to take shelter in a silent obscurity, but I find that thy will knows no end in me, and when old words die out on the tongue, new melodies break forth from the heart, and where the old tracks are lost, new country is revealed with its wonders. -Rabindranath Tagore
I understood that I might fail, but I wouldn't let it happen because I changed my compass along the way. -Adam Braun
I used to fear things like not having enough alcohol and drugs, or the money to get them. Now I fear someone holding me down and physically forcing me to take drugs and drink alcohol. I fear that for some reason I wouldn't be allowed or wouldn't be able to read anymore. -Volatalistic Phil
I used to look at my dog and think “if you were a little smarter you could tell what you were thinking,” and he’d look at me like he was saying “if you were a little smarter, I wouldn’t have to. -Fred Jungelaus
I want people to respect me and not just my position. -Amit Kalantri
I want to dream a dream so wonderful that I'll wake up sorry that it wasn't a memory. -Robin M. Helm
I want to live like a kid,          Away from bothering about others,           Smile without reason but true from heart,           Cry little harder instead of keeping hard things inside,           Stand up again with more determination when i fall,           And enjoy the gift of life by sharing gift of smile with others. -Nitish Sharma
I want to remember...Smelling your newness upon this earth. The baby-Jesus smell as Grandma used to put it. Pure. Unsullied. Like the imagined smell in the twirling air of eiderdown feathers spin-floating around the yard on a new spring day. -Carew Papritz
I wanted you to see what real courage is, instead of getting the idea that courage is a man with a gun in his hand. It's when you know you're licked before you begin but you begin anyway and see it through no matter what. Harper Lee (Author),
I was angry at God until I came to understand that it isn't God's fault when people mistreat me. I still have my doubts at times, but I try to remember that God has given them the same free will that He's given me. -Jennifer Hudson Taylor
I was in charge, but I made logic the boss. -Berry Gordy, Jr
I was just trying to be a very good human, instead I became a hero. -Amit Kalantri
I was merely cursing, under my breath, God and man, under my breath, and the wet Saturday afternoon of my conception. -Samuel Beckett
I was never part of the "in" crowd, because as I stood outside the circle, everyone looked the same. -Selena Haskins
I wasn't gonna go to the gym today, but then I realized I''m not going to get the a$$ I want by sitting on the one I've got! -Kailee Marie Hoch
I wasn't lonely. Loneliness, I think, has very little to do with location. It's a state of mind. In the centre of every city are some of the loneliest people in the world. If anything, because our whole planet was just outside the window, I felt even more aware of and connected to the seven billion other people who call it home. -Chris Hadfield
i wasn't made but i was created for the better intention i know my time is coming -Futty-fuze
I went to the woods because I wished to lived deliberately, to front only the essential facts of life, and see if I could not learn what it had to teach, and not, when I came to die, discover that I had not lived. -Henry David Thoreau
I will be with you in the sunrise that warms and brightens your face and in the stars you gaze up at when you fall asleep at night. -Peggy M. McAloon
I will live to the level of my own expectations, not others -Sara Wales
I will never attend an anti-war rally; if you have a peace rally, invite me. -Mother Teresa
I will not allow my mistakes of the past compromise my hope for the future. -Charles F. Glassman
I will not stop singing the Muses who set me dancing. -Anne Carson
I will once again keep my eyes open to the changes so that I won't miss even a single spec of chance. Life is possible, believe it, LIFE'S POSSIBLE! -Mphezulu Xetho Dainamyk
I will redirect my feeling of frustration into something positive -Sara Wales
I WILL RUN FOR EVER,IF I CANT, I WILL WALK FOR EVER BUT IF I CANT, I WILL LIMP FOR EVER. -QHUBEKANI NCUBE
I wonder if only artists can feel peace like this—such a gentle, inconspicuous peace that an ordinary person might not even notice. -Tessa Emily Hall
I work so hard for profits because my dreams are expensive. -Amit Kalantri
i would rather be a free animal then a cage animal -Beto jimenez
I would rather die of passion than of boredom. –Vincent van Gogh
I would rather live in a world where people shout, "This is wrong." than live in a world with superheroes saving the day. -♥EJ <---
I write, what I imagine -Lilian Quirino
I wrote this book for the Nelson Mandela's of our communities who are willing to stand up for change and people who are oppressed or suppressed from fulfilling their life's purpose -Sahndra Fon Dufe
I'm different. I will give you my treasure chest of darkness first. If you can handle that, then I'll bring out my shining moons. If one cannot handle the darkness, then one should not deserve the light. I have no interest in "trapping" anyone into a silken web. I have no silken web. -C. JoyBell C.
I'm not in search of sanctity, sacredness, purity; these things are found after this life, not in this life; but in this life I search to be completely human: to feel, to give, to take, to laugh, to get lost, to be found, to dance, to love and to lust, to be so human. -C. JoyBell C.
I'm so out of shape I take steroids just to watch sports. -Randy Kagan
I've come to believe that there exists in the universe something I call "The Physics of The Quest" — a force of nature governed by laws as real as the laws of gravity or momentum. And the rule of Quest Physics maybe goes like this: "If you are brave enough to leave behind everything familiar and comforting (which can be anything from your house to your bitter old resentments) and set out on a truth-seeking journey (either externally or internally), and if you are truly willing to regard everything that happens to you on that journey as a clue, and if you accept everyone you meet along the way as a teacher, and if you are prepared – most of all – to face (and forgive) some very difficult realities about yourself... then truth will not be withheld from you." Or so I've come to believe. -Elizabeth Gilbert
I've learned so much during my time with cancer.  It's taught me a lot about who I am.  It revealed to me my true goals and priorities.  It introduced me to a brand new world where time isn't wasted, and important things aren't left unsaid.  All the while, the superfluities of life are ignored and forgotten.  Because I now understand how a person should act, whether confronted by death or not.  And it's a shame that's what it takes to scare someone into becoming a conducive, meritable human being. -Kevin Lankes
I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel. –Maya Angelou
I've learned that the universe doesn't care what our motives are, only our actions. So we should do things that will bring about good, even if there is an element of selfishness involved. Like the kids at my school might join the Key Club or Future Buisness Leaders of America, because it's a social thing and looks good on their record, not because they really want to volunteer at the nursing home. But the people at the nursing home still benefit from it, so it's better that the kids do it than not do it. And if they never did it, then they wouldn't find out that they actually liked it. -Wendy Mass
I've learned that turning inward is where you develop emotional awareness.  This is the place where you connect with your soul, to God and nothing (no thing) can come between you and your source. -Alice Hocker
I've learned to stay the course. There are no shortcuts. No detours. They take you further away from your goal. -irene fantopoulos
I've missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I've lost almost 300 games. 26 times I've been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I've failed over and over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed. –Michael Jordan
I've never met a person, I don't care what his condition, in whom I could not see possibilities.  I don't care how much a man may consider himself a failure.  I believe in him, for he can change the thing that is wrong in his life any time he is ready and prepared to do it.  Whenever he develops the desire he can take away from his life the thing that is defeating it.  The capacity for reformation and change lies within. -Preston Bradley
I've told my children that when I die, to release balloons in the sky to celebrate that I graduated. For me, death is a graduation -Greg Laurie
Ideas are like the flint stone of wondrous works. You scratch at them until a spark flies ... then the world catches fire. -Gerard de Marigny
If a man has not discovered something that he will die for, he isn't fit to live -Martin Luther King
If a nation has not God that nation must fall, but if a nation has God then all the powers of evil, and all the armies, cannot shake its foundations; no, not even if the whole world is arrayed against it. -Taylor Caldwell
If a person loves you but doesn't respect you then it can not be a real love. It is not possible to love them without respecting them. -Amit Kalantri
If a tiny flower can struggle and raise itself out of hard rocks to offer its beauty to the world, so can you." From The Cartesian Machine -Nick  Tran
If all the people who were called "crazy" started acting "normal", we'd probably still be living in caves. -Joana James
If all you do is run every time, stop for a minute and take a glance at your back; you may have an idea of what you've been running from -Eve Lee myself
If an apology is followed by an excuse or a reason, it means they are going to commit same mistake again they just apologized for. -Amit Kalantri
If better is possible at what point is good, good enough? -Mark W. Boyer
If Cinderella were given a single shining epiphany (instead of a fairy godmother), she would have realized: "This is my father's house. This is my father's estate. I am the rightful heiress to everything here!" then she would have said: "Get off of my property, take nothing with you, and never show your faces to me again! You ugly, bitter, insecure, envious witches!" And I'm sure she would have been happier, sooner! -C. JoyBell C.
If everybody else your age is doing something very different than what you're doing, there's always going to be someone saying to you you might not succeed with it, you might not make any money with that... there's always going to be some type of obstacle in the way. All of those things will go away if you really focus on what makes you happy. -Kevin Clash
If everyone could be a successful and rich author, there would be no point in working so hard. Where is the fun in that? -L.A. Jones
If God on the Cross is God shamming a human tragedy, it turns the Passion of Christ into the Farce of Christ. The death of the Son must be real. Father Martin assured me it was. But once a dead God, always a dead God, even resurrected. The Son must have the taste for death forever in His mouth. The Trinity must be tainted by it; there must be a certain stench at the right hand of God the Father. The horror must be real. Why would God wish that upon Himself? Why not leave death to the mortals? Why make dirty what is beautiful, spoil what is perfect? Love. That was Father Martin's answer. -Yann Martel
If he can’t handle it, then you aren’t very good friends, are you? -J.M.  Richards
If I am to be fallen into love, I will. And if as a result I will appear to be stupid, disillusioned, and of poor judgment, I will. And I would be damned if I cared what other people think. For I would rather be thought of as all of these things, than not love. If in loving, I become the naked woman on the horse, I will ride that horse with my head held high. This is my spirit. I am unbreakable. -C. JoyBell C.
If I have learned anything over this last year it’s that you have to live your own life too so that if something we hoped for doesn’t work out, you still have two legs to stand on, you still have your own path. -T.S. Krupa
If I were a flower, then now I’d be a bud I shall treasure the beginning of my youth without any regrets -Kifuji Aya
If in life you choose something that is your second choice, whether it be clothes, a relationship, or a career, then don't choose it.  Wait until you  can have your first choice.  Never settle for second best. -Steven Aitchison
If insanity is defined as doing the same thing over and over and expecting different results - then success is insanity squared! (2012 SCBWI New Member Conference; Richmond, VA) -Brian Rock
If it had not been for The Lord on my side I don't know where I would be. -Tyler Perry
If it's broken... Fix it immediately. -Day Jah
if it's not the RIGHT thing to do it's something else! -Ruth Lizana-Jackson
if knowledge is a light,wisdom is a moon that illuminates the path. -Adele Mandez
If life is a bowl of cherries, what's inside of it? -Josh Stern
If life is an evolving process, then consistent change is the only resolving mechanism to problematic cases -Anuj Somany
If luck has not yet knocked your gate, change the gate -Qaiser Abbas
If monkey became a man, then a man can become a hero. -Amit Kalantri
if nature give citrus so make syrup and drink -saddam hussain
If one advances confidently in the direction of his dreams and endeavors to live the life which he had imagined, he will meet with success unexpected in common hours. -Henry David Thoreau
If opportunity doesn't knock build a door and open it, stop waiting around for someone to give it to you. -Tilicia Haridat
If people are going to be allowed to say "we love you" and "I love you", they'd better have the backbone to prove it. Love isn't just a word. -C. JoyBell C.
If people respect your age and not your personality, then it's time for you to do some urgent introspection. -Amit Kalantri
If people want something to be wrong about you— they are going to make things wrong about you. That is why it is my belief to never try and prove anything to anyone. Real diamonds belong to people who know how to spot a real diamond; they don’t belong to people who need to be convinced that they are real diamonds. It’s the idiots who need to be convinced of something that they cannot already see. -C. JoyBell C.
If people-young and old-can get one thing from my book I hope it is this: that there dream do count, no matter how big or small. -April E. Brucker
if plan A is not success you need to ready PLAN B but if plan B dozen work then try other bcz alphabet is more and more... -Sushil Singh
If someone sees you ugly? try to to tell them that Not All Angels are Good Looking. -kent Ian N. Cny
If someone thinks your ideas, the dreams bubbling up inside of you, are stupid, welcome to the Club. -Richie Norton
If the road is not patchy, rough and on a hilly terrain, then the journey is not often worth undertaking as all destinations are already enough crowded -Anuj Somany
If the truth offends you, you are probably on the wrong side of it. Lakesha M Ruise -Lakesha Ruise
If the wind will not serve, take to the oars. –Latin Proverb
If the world allows the people of Darfur to be removed forever from their land and their way of life, then genocide will happen elsewhere because it will be seen as something that works. It must not be allowed to work. The people of Darfur need to go home now. I write this for them, and for that day, ... and for those still living who might yet have beautiful lives on the earth. -Daoud Hari
If there is a God and future life, there is truth and good, and man's highest happiness consists in striving to attain them. We must live, we must love, and we must believe that we live not only today on this scrap of earth, but have lived and shall live -Leo Tolstoy
If there’s any girl in the world more determined than you, I’ve yet to meet her. -Chloe Gadsby-Jones
If time were to take on human form, would she be your taskmaster or freedom fighter? -Richie Norton
If two people are meant for one another, that doesn't mean that they have to rush and be together right away. Real love takes time to grow, just like how it takes time to grow from children to adults. -Jonathan Anthony Burkett
If u are perfect in any work or u can do that work in better manner people will wait for u or respect u. otherwise no one will respect u. u will lose your identity in this crowd. -shiv prasad
If u have done any good work no one will told that to anyone but if u have done misdeed people will spread it. -shiv prasad
If u r self-inspired to turn idle curiosity into an active quest, u r living at the fullest else ordianarism prevails. -Sushobhan
If u wanna be bright future.. you have to work hard today -Prasanth KPS
If we always think about past, we will miss our golden present which again in future turns to bad past. -Rajendra Ojha
If we are ever going to see a paradigm shift, we have to be clear about how we want the present paradigm to shift. We must be clear that veganism is the unequivocal baseline of anything that deserves to be called an “animal rights” movement. If “animal rights” means anything, it means that we cannot morally justify any animal exploitation; we cannot justify creating animals as human resources, however “humane” that treatment may be. We must stop thinking that people will find veganism “daunting” and that we have to promote something less than veganism. If we explain the moral ideas and the arguments in favor of veganism clearly, people will understand. They may not all go vegan immediately; in fact, most won’t. But we should always be clear about the moral baseline. If someone wants to do less as an incremental matter, let that be her/his decision, and not something that we advise to do. The baseline should always be clear. We should never be promoting “happy” or “humane” exploitation as morally acceptable. -Gary L. Francione
If we are willing to do the mental work, almost anything can be healed. -Louise L. Hay
If we come from the water, I conclude that we come from different kinds of it. I will meet a person and in his eyes see an ocean, deep and never ending; then I will meet another person and feel as though I have stepped into a shallow puddle on the street, there is nothing in it. Or maybe some of us come from the water, and some of us come from somewhere else; then it's all a matter of finding those who are the same as us. -C. JoyBell C.
If we could all love each and every person that crosses our path a little bit more, we could attain inner peace with the knowledge that many people on this planet would be hurting a whole lot less. -Molly Friedenfeld
If we don't start, it's certain we can't arrive. -januar
If we only say what we feel, then we merely dwell in that which keeps us zeal. -Anuj Somany
If we take the position that an assessment that veganism is morally preferable to vegetarianism is not possible because we are all “on our own journey,” then moral assessment becomes completely impossible or is speciesist. It is impossible because if we are all “on our own journey,” then there is nothing to say to the racist, sexist, anti-semite, homophobe, etc. If we say that those forms of discrimination are morally bad, but, with respect to animals, we are all “on our own journey” and we cannot make moral assessments about, for instance, dairy consumption, then we are simply being speciesist and not applying the same moral analysis to nonhumans that we apply to the human context. -Gary L. Francione
If we want to grow, the way to break a pattern of negativity is to face anything negative with love. -Molly Friedenfeld
If we will turn to God in prayer, and if we will seek His comfort through His Words in the Bible, we will find our hearts and minds healed. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
If we won't be serious about dealing with our sin,we cannot expect to grow in our faith. If you want to move to a new level with God,take an inventory of what God has told you about your sin and consider what you've been doing about it. -Richard Blackaby
If wishes were grains of sand, the world would be a desert. -Palle Oswald
If you achieve a success not achieved by anyone else and not possible to achieve by anyone else then you are the hero of your generation. -Amit Kalantri
If you adjust first time, compromise second time, failure is what you will get third time. -Amit Kalantri
If you are a winner by the judgements of few judges and not by your performance, you are not a real winner. -Amit Kalantri
If you are born weak, it's not your mistake. If you die weak, it's your mistake. -Saurabh Dudeja
If you are not dead, then there is hope. get up and go conquer the world. -Fenley Douglas
If you are not good at speeches, be good at your actions. -Amit Kalantri
If you are not proving yourself, you are proving yourself! -Ananya Dwivedi
If you are not satisfied with the things you have got then stop crying and start working and go get those things that will satisfy you. -Amit Kalantri
If you are not taking the time to set your own goals, chances are pretty high someone else is doing it for you. So don't be surprised someday when you end up someplace you never hoped to be. -Mark W. Boyer
If you are not vegan, please consider going vegan. It’s a matter of nonviolence. Being vegan is your statement that you reject violence to other sentient beings, to yourself, and to the environment, on which all sentient beings depend. -Gary L. Francione
If you are reading this then you have wasted another day of your life day dreaming, rather than planning the life God intended you to live. -Shannon L. Alder
If you are still worried, it means, you have not surrendered yet ! -Sri Amma Bhagwan
If you are the hero of your family, there is very good chance that one day you will be the hero of the world. -Amit Kalantri
If you are to become what you are meant to be, you have to first find your real meaning! -Leslie Austin
If you are too busy to pray, you are busier than God wants you to be. -Wanda E. Brunstetter
If you are willing to go out on a limb, the tree of life holds endless possibilities. -Angel Sharum
If you buy an egg thinking it's a goose's egg, and when it hatches it is actually a bird of paradise; no manner of convincing and reproach will turn the bird of paradise into a goose. Even if you make it go to goose church and goose school and eat goose feeds and only hang out with geese! In the end, it will still belong to paradise. -C. JoyBell C.
If you can conceive the idea, you can make it happen! -Louise Herman
If you can confess before a friend, you don't need a priest. -Amit Kalantri
If you can dream it, you can achieve it. –Zig Ziglar
If you can find just one place of pleasure within, than you can find the courage to persist. -Tania Elizabeth
If you can find no one to become your ideal to aspire to, no one to be your ultimate example, your idol, your motivation— don't fret! You can and you must become your own ultimate aspiration, your own example, your own idol, ideal, motivation! You go and be what you haven't found yet! -C. JoyBell C.
If you can smile at your troubles then honey, you are half way saved.  - Louise from Adventures with Max and Louise -Ellyn Oaksmith
If you can't bring yourself to applaud because the performance was lousy, then applaud because it's over. They tried. -Mark W. Boyer
If you can't enjoy what you have, you can't enjoy more of it. -Richard Bandler
If you cannot change your circumstances, then change your attitude. -Mark W. Boyer
If you cannot do Great things, do Small things in Great Way. -Naepolean Hill
If you cannot find it within you to withstand the negative in your life, you'll never manage to recognize the good -Mark W. Boyer
if you cannot ponder to wonder, you will always wonder to ponder -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
If you cannot stop yourself from getting angry, then at least get angry about things that matters. -Amit Kalantri
If you cant ignore the "SCIENCE" then how dare you to ignore your "MIND" because its the "SCIENCE OF ALL -Keshavjung
IF YOU CHOKE YOUR POTENTIAL BEFORE IT HAS AN OPPORTUNITY TO BECOME A POSSIBILITY YOU WILL NEVER REACH YOUR DESTINY -Mo Stegall
If you constantly make it clear that you are unwilling to budge, don't get upset when no one is around who's willing to give you a push. -Mark W. Boyer
If you could stay as stubborn as when you were a child then you need not to compromise on your dreams. -Amit Kalantri
If you do not see light at the end of the tunnel, consider it an opportunity to create an opening yourself,  wherever you want. -Ashok  Kallarakkal
If you do what you've always done, you'll get what you've always gotten. –Tony Robbins
If you do your best, stay in the game, learn along the way, and adapt as best you can, life has an incredible way of filling in the details for you. -Josh Hinds
IF you don't change, you can become extinct! -Spencer Johnson
IF YOU DON'T GO AFTER WHAT YOU WANT; YOU COULD SPEND YOUR ENTIRE LIFE SETTLING FOR WHAT YOU CAN GET -Mo Stegall
If you don't have the confidence to ask, you will never have the confidence to convince. -Amit Kalantri
If you don't know how to grow old, don't start learning how to grow old. -Carew Papritz
If you don't like the Fruits you are growing, then change the Seeds you are sowing.-RVM -Rvm
If you don't like what you got, why don't you change it? If your world is all screwed up, rearrange it! -Trooper
If you don't make the time to work on creating the life you want, you're eventually going to be forced to spend a LOT of time dealing with a life you don't want. -Kevin Ngo
If you don't work hard to achieve your own dreams, someone else will have you working hard to achieve theirs. -Jeremy Marcus Coates
If you don’t know exactly where you are going (and why),that is exactly where you will end up. -Christopher Babson
If you dream of the stars the heavens are yours - rjs -rassool jibraeel snyman
If you follow the ancient maps written on the stars, no person will ever understand you. So if you could read these maps, would you follow them? And forever be misunderstood? Or would you close your eyes tightly and pretend to be like everyone else? -C. JoyBell C.
If you fulfill the wishes of your employees, the employees will fulfill your visions. -Amit Kalantri
If you have a bright idea with such significance, don't pause but push, play and display that concept, it will be recognized or be seen somehow and it will not be forsaken. ( Taken from my forthcoming book " Ency Bearis' Ameliorated Poems" ) -Ency Bearis
If you have a dream, first build a team. -Vinita Kinra
If you have money but not love you will somehow manage, but if you don't have both then you are in serious trouble. -Amit Kalantri
If you have put your faith in Christ and have spent significant time in the Word of God, the tough times can be like a magnet that draws you to the Lord Jesus. -David Jeremiah
If you have put your faith in Christ and have spent significant time in the Word of God, the tough times can be like a magnet that draws you to the Lord Jesus. Nothing is going to happen - ever - that will catch Jesus Christ by surprise. He is able to help His children work through anything, and not a single thing is going to happen in the future that can change that fact. -David Jeremiah
If you have the courage to be honest with everyone, including yourself, you may hurt a few people's feelings, but they will forever value your opinion more than your half truths. -Steven Aitchison
If you have time to watch TV, you have time to work on your dreams and change your life -Bruce Van Horn
If you haven't met Kenny (Young) you have not seen how the spirit of Boston can be embodied by one single man. -David McCullough
If you hear a voice within you say “you cannot paint,” then by all means paint and that voice will be silenced. –Vincent Van Gogh
If you honor the moments by not wasting them, the Time will honor you back by remembering you as the hero, for the rest of the time to come. -Amit Kalantri
If you judge people you have no time to love them. -Mother Teresa
If you knew this day would be your last one, what would you be doing differently?  Wouldn't you seize the day and get the most out of it?  One of these days will be your last one.  Why not seize every day you have left? -Mike Rabe
If you look at what you have in life, you'll always have more. If you look at what you don't have in life, you'll never have enough. –Oprah Winfrey
If you miss your bus, just start walking. -Shan McGinley
If you Never Give Up, you can Beat The Best !! -Manu Pratap
If you Never Give Up, You can Beat The Best !! And in the end you become The Best. -Manu Pratap TMPS
If you procrastinate for today, nothing will be done for tomorrow. -Kaw Moo
If you really want something ..   Nothing can stop you ..  It's about nothing except you ! -Gehad Badr
If you seek happiness, look in the mirror. If you seek love, look elsewhere. -Thomas F. Shubnell
If you swim effortlessly in the deep oceans, ride the waves to and from the shore, if you can breathe under water and dine on the deep treasures of the seas; mark my words, those who dwell on the rocks carrying nets will try to reel you into their catch. The last thing they want is for you to thrive in your habitat because they stand in their atmosphere where they beg and gasp for some air. -C. JoyBell C.
If you think rightly, every problem is financial problem or eventually becomes one. -Amit Kalantri
If you told me today our being together would result in heartbreak I would still choose to be with you because I believe that truly living life is in the experiences not the outcomes. -Kathryn Perez
If you wait for a cake to be given to you so you will be happy- then you will be happy when someone gives you a cake. But if you buy a cake (or bake one) for yourself so you will be happy, you have found the way of happiness. -C. JoyBell C.
If you wait for inspiration to write you're not a writer, you're a waiter. -Dan Poynter
If you walk on sunlight, bathe in moonlight, breathe in a golden air and exhale a Midas' touch; mark my words, those who exist in the shadows will try to pull you into the darkness with them. The last thing that they want is for you to see the wonder of your life because they can't see theirs. -C. JoyBell C.
If you want others to be happy, practice compassion. If you want to be happy, practice compassion. -The Dalai Lama
If you want to be an action person be proactive rather than reactive... -Stephen Richards
If you want to forget something or someone, never hate it, or never hate him/her. Everything and everyone that you hate is engraved upon your heart; if you want to let go of something, if you want to forget, you cannot hate. -C. JoyBell C.
If you want to know how a manager is performing ask to see their data, really want to know... ask those that report to them. -Mark W. Boyer
If you want to know if someone is lying to you, start by living a truthful life. Once you live in the truth, you will not be easily deceived. -Molly Friedenfeld
If you want to lift yourself up, lift up someone else. –Booker T. Washington
If you want to rise higher then see yourself as a winner... -Stephen Richards
If you want your children to turn out well, spend twice as much time with them, and half as much money. –Abigail Van Buren
If you want your lie to be believed then you need to speak thousand truths before you lie. -Amit Kalantri
If you wish to be a great family-man learn philosophy of people, if you wish to be a great businessman learn philosophy of finance. -Amit Kalantri
If you're feeling helpless, help someone. ” ― Aung San Suu Kyi (from Freedom from Fear) -Aung San Suu Kyi
If you're looking for an Inspiration, then I think Rahul Mahajan is a perfect example for all the fainthearted people out there who fear to show their talent. Many people around us assume themselves as "not so special" person and people will laugh at them if they perform in public. I've seen Rahul Mahajan in a reality show of dancing, which is no way related to him. He is been asked to dance various dance forms, but the fact is he doesn't have the body language to perform like a dancer. His dances make people laugh, and his mistakes in the performances are taken as humor. Rahul never thinks about the results or what the audiences are thinking and keep on performing. Not only that but he is a favorite contestant of all the judges and the audiences too. The power is his honesty, hardwork, innocence, ego-less and he enjoys every bit of his performance to the core. I think that’s the reason why he's successful and lives in the heart of the Indian Audiences. Hats off to your spirit Rahul Mahajan. :) -Ritesh Rangare
If you're lost and alone Or you're sinking like a stone Carry on... May your past be the sound Of your feet upon the ground Carry on -Fun
If you're not failing every now and again, it's a sign you're not doing anything very innovative. -Woody Allen
If you're offered a seat on a rocket ship, don't ask what seat! Just get on. –Sheryl Sandberg
If you've just left a place of difficulty, don't then move into the shadows, alone with your thoughts. Spend your time with friends, or even just people who care about you. It might feel more self-protective to isolate yourself, but the reality is that you need to let the light in. -Sally Hanan
If you've never been thrilled to the very edges of your soul by a flower in spring bloom, maybe your soul has never been in bloom. -Terri Guillemets
If your blinded with your first love , it's better to stay blinded -R.Gayan Priyankara
If your comfort zone is misery, it's time to get uncomfortable. -Charles F. Glassman
If your goals don't inspire you then why should you expect to achieve them? -Stephen Richards
If your God asks you to commit crime against humanity, change your God. -Vinita Kinra
Ignorance, Arrogance, Fear and Laziness are the biggest hurdles to success.  From what I have seen in my twenty-plus years in and around the business, those who continue to learn, watch for the changes and trends, never get too cocky, push through with courage, and truly commit to their goals, always succeed.  This went for me as well. Every time I failed, one of those first four elements played a role in the failure. -Loren Weisman
Ignore ignorance. The ultimate way to deal with men with ignorant mentality who are ignorance of your purpose on earth is to ignore their ignorance; capitalize on their ignorance and let them appreciate your purpose in awe and admiration -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Il culmine del piacere è la pura e semplice distruzione del dolore. -Epicurus
Ilmu itu lebih baik daripada harta. Ilmu akan menjaga engkau dan engkau menjaga harta. Ilmu itu penghukum (hakim) sedangkan harta terhukum. Kalau harta itu akan berkurang apabila dibelanjakan, tetapi ilmu akan bertambah apabila dibelanjakan. -Ali bin Abi Thalib ra
Imagination is what you do with your inspiration. -Violet Haberdasher
Impian harus menyala dengan apa pun yang kita miliki,  meskipun yang kita miliki tidak sempurna, meskipun itu retak-retak -Iwan Setyawan
Impian sederhana yang bisa diwujudkan akan lebih baik dari pada sebuah impian yang megah &amp; indah namun hanyalah fatamorgana. -Faiz Triumph
Improvement is not enough, you also need innovation. -Amit Kalantri
Improvement is not enough, you also needs innovation. -Amit Kalantri
In a few more days I'd anticipated telling Veronika that our injections had cured her heart condition. But in light of her unscheduled departure form Villette my telling that particular lie will not be required. The majority of people who attempt suicide repeat that attempt until they succeed. I took a risk in lying to her about her condition, i decided to test the only remedy i have come to have any faith in: awareness of life. Until she finds out from some other doctor that she is perfectly healthy. She'll consider each day a miracle. Which in my view it is. -Paulo Coelho
In about the same degree as you are helpful, you will be happy. Karl Reiland
In Australien ist man der amerikanischen Zeit um siebzehn Stunden voraus. Man fliegt also buchsnächstäblich in den nächsten Tag hinein. Während des Fluges erinnerte ich mich daran, daß wir sicher sein konnten, daß es die Welt am nächsten Tag noch geben und alles in Ordnung sein würde! Auf dem Kontinent, der vor uns lag, war es schon >morgen<. -Marlo Morgan
In business 'professionalism' is not a tactic but a moral value. -Amit Kalantri
In case you never get a second chance: don't be afraid!" "And what if you do get a second chance?" "You take it! -C. JoyBell C.
In everyone’s life, at some time, our inner fire goes out. It is then burst into flame by an encounter with another human being. We should all be thankful for those people who rekindle the inner spirit. -Albert Schweitzer
In friendship, words can go unspoken yet you still understand.  That's why I'm sure that even though I don't say it, you know how special you are to me. -John
In last ten days what I faced was truly unbearable, somewhere I felt little disappear, I traveled more than thousand miles, saw death, faced problems, fights, Anger, Illness and many... and finally I am back, feeling great. Thanks Allah for immense Luv &amp; for make me Strong... -Kumar Destiny
In life you gotta take chances the hell with shoulda, woulda, and coulda you never know what the out come will be. It may be a life full of success... -Christopher J. Williams
In meetings philosophy might work, on the field practicality works. -Amit Kalantri
In modern medicine, we have a name for everything, but a cure for nothing. -Charles F. Glassman
In modern medicine, we have a name for nearly everything, but a cure for almost nothing. -Charles F. Glassman
In modern times, beauty is more trusted than goodness. -Amit Kalantri
In moments of uncertainty, when you must chose between two paths, allowing yourself to be overcome by either the fear of failure or the dimly lit light of possibility, immerse yourself in the life you would be most proud to live. -Adam Braun
In my experience, when a woman's cruelty is combined with love and devotion, it is almost always without exception an act performed not out of treachery, but as a painful self-sacrifice for the good of her beloved, to obtain for him a future bounty where he would not know how to obtain it for himself, or have the courage, patience, or foresight to obtain it. Womankind always seems to be able to see a dozen steps into the future, far ahead of what men are able to see. And they have strength where we do not. -Roman Payne
In my life, I have but one anchor and that anchor is my God. I think if you look closely enough, you can even see it in my eyes, you'll see a strong place, an anchor. That is God. -C. JoyBell C.
In order for someone to be 100% content, they must first believe it to be so. -Mark W. Boyer
In order to receive in abundance ... give in abundance! -Stephen Richards
In order to succeed, your desire for success should be greater than your fear of failure. –Bill Cosby
In some nations day broke after a long night, but it is clouded with chaos and corruption. -Vinita Kinra
In spite of being complicated people choose superstitions over common sense. -Amit Kalantri
In the beginning, it is difficult and even painful to see the faults in yourself, the flaws in your soul, the error of your ways. But I have come to love the moments when I see my flaws and I spot my errors! It is one of the most beautiful things, really! Because it is when we see our own flaws and our own errors that we can find the opposite of those things! It is when we see our own flaws and our own errors that we can see that there is so much more room to become better! And so I have come to actually rejoice when I find something wrong with me! And I know when it’s really wrong because I can see it and I can feel it in my heart both at the same time— it is a revelation. It’s not something that comes from any external source; but it is my own spirit and the voice of God revealing these things to me, unfolding them, rolling them out of a silken cloth at my feet. And I smile. -C. JoyBell C.
In the building of walls to protect ourselves— we have managed to keep ourselves from the best in this life. And so the line is drawn whether to live and to be broken and unbroken or to breathe but not live at all. Perhaps there is no such thing as brokenness, afterall. Perhaps it is all just called "living. -C. JoyBell C.
In the business always talk to decision makers only, it will save your time and will get you the deal. -Amit Kalantri
In the end we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends. -Mr.Luther.K
In the end, all men die. How you lived will be far more important to the Almighty than what you accomplished. -Brandon Sanderson
In the end, it was the secrets that held me hostage and fuelled my depression, but, once released, emancipation - from fear, shame, guilt and judgement - was finally possible. -B.G. Bowers
In the face of adversity you have three choices... You can let it DEFINE you, let it DESTROY you or let it STRENGTHEN YOU! -Comic Strip Mama
In the face of adversity, beautiful things emerge -Epiphana Lewis
In the future, there will be no female leaders. There will just be leaders. -Sheryl Sandberg
In the matter of spirit follow the Gods, in the matter of work follow the heroes. -Amit Kalantri
In the men I love heroes, in the work I love heroism -Amit Kalantri
In the race of life, don’t be like a horse or car that can stop anytime; rather be like Earth and Time: unstoppable. -Vinita Kinra
In the woods is perpetual youth. In the woods we return to faith and reason. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
In the woods, we return to reason and faith. -Ralph Waldo Emerson
In the world that we live in— purity and innocence are the true strengths. It is strength to live in a world like this and remain pure of heart, it is strength to live in a world like this and retain innocence. These are things that the world wants to take away from you, that experiences tend to alter and attempt to redefine. The wild ones aren’t the defiled ones— the wild ones are the pure ones, the innocent ones. It takes a true wildness to retain these things through the fire and through the storms. It takes a real wildness to remain in the wild— not contorted and maligned by circumstance and experiences. And it takes power to stand up and to choose what experiences we allow to take root or to even come into our lives. -C. JoyBell C.
In this world, the thing people fear the most, and what pains people the most— is giving more than they receive. God forbid I cut off more of my fingernail for you than you cut from your fingernail, for me! Heaven forbid I hold my breath in longer while thinking about you, than the amount of time your breath is held in for me! Not a second longer! It is sad fact of the human nature that there you stand as an Infinite Soul and yet your greatest fear is not receiving from another person in proportion to what you give. Your viewpoint is low, your vision is clouded. You have become, in your eyes, a funny little drawing on the paper pad of the universe. Indeed, this race is yet to evolve. And yet, I am surrounded by such fear, to such a great extent that I begin to fear the same! -C. JoyBell C.
In those sticky summer nights in South London our windows stay open and our tiny apartment becomes our secret garden. The magic of the secret garden is that it exists in our imagination. There are no limits, no borderlines. The secret garden leads to the marigolds of Mogadishu and the magnolias of Kingston and when the heat turns us sticky and sweet and unwilling to be claimed by defeat we own the night. We own our bodies. We own our lives. -Diriye Osman
In trying so hard to win, we have instead become exactly like those whom we hate. The key is to know that there is no need to exert an effort to win; for we were already winners in the beginning when we were not like them. It's when we try so hard to overcome them that we become like them, without realizing that we were already victors in the very beginning. -C. JoyBell C.
In-existence, the soul’s greatest imposition is its perfection. It is projected as a perfected form of the physical embodiment, an emblem of things, perhaps hyperreal and untouchably perfect as existence. It can not be! The soul in-existence is nothing of perfection. It is raw potential. The soul is nothing but potential. To be specific, the soul is unordered potential! -Dew Platt
Increase your vision of achievement simply by raising your goals.... -Stephen Richards
Indeed, God is always with us even when things look hopeless. -Jennifer Hudson Taylor
Injustice happened to animals as they born an animal, you are born as man what else do you need ? -Amit Kalantri
Inside each of us is a child as insecure as ever. As adults, we've just learned how to cover well." - L. R. W. Lee, Andy Smithson: Blast of the Dragon's Fury -L.R.W. Lee
Inside every woman, is a crazy girl. And we all know what I'm talking about. That part of you that is entangled with insecurities, fears, and absolute insanity! The art of femininity lies in the molding, pounding, and defeating of that crazy girl on a daily basis! Look at any woman, and you're looking at a woman fighting a daily battle, wielding her weapons in war, every day! I have said it before and I'll say it again: it is never easy being a woman! And if we could only pound that crazy, insecure girl out of ourselves, it would make such the difference! -C. JoyBell C.
Inside that tiny seed, lives the roots, branches, bark, trunk, leaves, twigs and apple fruit of that apple tree. You can’t see, feel, hear, taste or smell any of that yet; nevertheless, it is all inside that seed. The moment the seed is in your hand— all of that is in your hand, too, from the root to the bark to the fruit! All you have to do is to push the seed into the soil. And what makes anyone plant any apple seed? It is the belief that in the seed, there is the tree. So, believe. To have a seed, is to have everything. -C. JoyBell C.
Inspiration is sometimes as simple as a shared smile. -Amy Leigh Mercree
Inspiration is the seed of imagination, where great ideas bloom -Jennifer Sodini
inspirational,motivational -Rvm
Inspirations are priceless &amp; limitless. -Jay Danzie
Instead of copying already existing success icons be an innovation and variety among them. -IqraI qbal
Instead of protesting and cursing others  because they write "X-Mas" instead of "Christmas"; try being Christmas. Live Christmas. Breathe Christmas.  Act Christmas.  Speak Christmas.  Reflect Christmas.  Listen and feel Christmas Christ doesn't care how you write Christmas; he cares how you live Christmas all year long. -Sandra Chami Kassis
Instead of treating your child like how you were treated. Treat them with the same love and attention you wanted from your parents while growing up. -Jonathan Anthony Burkett
Integration we get up Fractionate we get down -Chandan Kumar
Intelligence is more important than strength, that is why earth is ruled by men and not by animals. -Amit Kalantri
Intelligent resistance keeps the true self alive -Mary Pipher
Intercourse is one thing, Intimacy is everything. Be encouraged -Kerry E. Wagner
Into the silence rips a sound that makes me let go of Max's hand and cover my ears. It is like the strafe of a bullet, nails on a chalkboard, promises being broken. It's a note I have never heard - this chord of pure pain - and it takes a moment to realize it is coming from me. -Jodi Picoult
Is not this simpler? Is this not your natural state? It’s the unspoken truth of humanity that you crave subjugation. The bright lure of freedom diminishes your life’s joy in a mad scramble for power. For identity. You were made to be ruled. In the end, you will always kneel. -Loki of Asgard
ISE LO GUN ISE. -RIDWAN AKOTUN
Isn’t Love the great facilitator of the Universe’s creation according to the free will of man’s mind which, if facilitated by a selfish being generates a hell, and by a loving being, a paradise? -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
It always helps to think about other people instead of just ourselves. -Ellen DeGeneres
It can be sad how time may change things in our lives, yet let us not forget we always maintain the power to choose whether or not to be happy about the changes it brings. -Mark W. Boyer
It dawns on you one day... how precious your life is and how not okay it is for anyone, ever, to cause you any amount of suffering, ever. Then the next time you step out the door you look at everyone and you’re thinking, “My life is precious and you’re not allowed to hurt me. -C. JoyBell C.
It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop. –Confucius
It doesn't matter if you're alive or dead. It matters what was said to leave an everlasting impression on society. -Jay G Rich
It doesn't matter where your journey begins, so long as you begin it... -Solange nicole
It Hurts...It Kills...It Teaches... It Thrills...“IT” Is LIFE...! -Sujit Lalwani
It is a courage which can find the solution to every problem, not the intelligence. -Amit Kalantri
It is all for naught, if not for love. -Molly Friedenfeld
it is always the women who rebuild the civilizations that the men have done their best to destroy -Philip Kerr
It is beautiful to discover our wings and learn how to fly; flight is a beautiful process. But then to rest on the wings of God as He flies: this is divine. -C. JoyBell C.
It is better moving up to your goal and falling than not falling doing nothing -Qaiser Abbas
It is difficult to feel things very strongly in a world wherein most of the time, the majority seem to be intoxicated and often senseless. -C. JoyBell C.
It is during our failures that we discover our true desire for success. -Kevin Ngo
It is easy to lead from the front when there are no obstacles before you, the true colors of a leader are exposed when placed under fire. -Mark W. Boyer
It is how we nurture the good and deal with the bad that ultimately shapes our destiny. -Charles F. Glassman
It is imperative for our mental health that we surround ourselves with like minded people. -The Letters Of Gratitude
It is like the man who closes his eyes to the sun and then finds himself walking over the edge of a cliff. If the man is too foolish to use the gift of light given to him, how can the sun be blamed for his death? -Katie Beitz
It is much better to reveal the whole truth and be rejected . . . then to deny it and be accepted . . LexGreat
It is never too late to be what you might have been. –George Eliot
It is not needful for our dreams to be very grand nor very big. It is only needful for our dreams to be very shiny. -C. JoyBell C.
It is not the size of a person in the fight, but the size of the fight in a person is what determines victory. -Ifeanyi Enoch Onuoha
It is not what you do for your children, but what you have taught them to do for themselves, that will make them successful human beings.  –Ann Landers
It is often too easy to explain a novel idea to a few enlightened persons with a few words. But to enlighten about the same to many people, too many words are often required -Anuj Somany
It is only after the deepest darkness that the greatest joy can come -Malcolm X
It is only with the heart that one can see rightly, for what is essential is invisible to the eyes. -Antoine De Saint Exupery
It is said that there is a part of us in our characters. But I also believe there is a part of our characters we'd like to see in ourselves. -Lisa Wakely
It is the road you take that decides your destiny and not your destiny that decides the road you take. -Apoorve Dubey
It is through imagination that we transcend understanding and travel into the world of possibilities. -Danielle Pierre
It is through love that the door to Heaven is opened on earth. -Molly Friedenfeld
It is truly time to inspire your mind, whatever your dreams may be! Don’t wait for tomorrow, whatever your sorrows.  Today is the day to ‘believe’. Jump to it! written by  Lee Bice-Matheson, c2011. -Lee Bice-Matheson
It is when we think we can act like God, that all respect is lost, and I think this is the downfall of peace. We lie if we say we do not see color and culture and difference. We fool ourselves and cheat ourselves when we say that all of us are the same. We should not want to be the same as others and we should not want others to be the same as us. Rather, we ought to glory and shine in all of our differences, flaunting them fabulously for all to see! It is never a conformity that we need! We need not to conform! What we need is to burst out into all these beautiful colors! -C. JoyBell C.
It is when you lose sight of yourself, that you lose your way. To keep your truth in sight you must keep yourself in sight and the world to you should be a mirror to reflect to you your image; the world should be a mirror that you reflect upon. -C. JoyBell C.
It matters not how fast light may travel, darkness shall always be there awaiting its arrival. -Mark W. Boyer
It may be difficult, but there will be times we need to pick up our brooms and do some spiritual house cleaning. It is through this process that we find our true relationships, our true heart, our core integrity, and our life’s purpose. -Molly Friedenfeld
It means nothing to cry, all you can you is fly, expand your wings take flight, and never return. -Alysha Millet
It only takes one minute to find a really good book, but it can give you a lifetime of memories when you read a really good book that leaves you with lasting impression. -Nahisha McCoy
It only takes one person, one voice from somewhere beyond, to save a life. -Kirsten Arcadio
It quickly became apparent that to Mr. K, there was no such thing as an untalented kid—just a kid who didn’t work hard enough. You are going to fix this problem, he said when he diag- nosed whatever was wrong, and there was never any question. Of course you would. It was just a matter of trying and trying and trying some more. He yelled not because we’d never learn, but because he was absolutely certain that we would. -Joanne Lipman and Melanie Kupchynsky
It really sucks to come in second in your own life. It sucks even more to think that this is okay. -Robin Korth
It really was a blessing after the storm. -Diyar Harraz
It should be a privilege to be able to say "I love you" to someone. It shouldn't be something people say just because they feel like it. A privilege that is earned. They say you have to earn the right to be loved; no, love is unconditional, if you love someone, they don't have to earn it. But. The right to tell someone that you love them? That has to be earned. You have to earn the right to be believed. -C. JoyBell C.
It takes a really long time to realize this, but if you’re lucky you eventually see that you’ve got this life on this planet and you’re responsible for really loving yourself. And I mean really, really, really loving yourself. Love is never a corruption. I’m talking about loving yourself with a true love, a love that’s incorruptible and everlasting. -C. JoyBell C.
It takes a while to build a dream -Tyler Perry
It takes writing a billion bad words before you get to the good ones. -Ray Bradbury
It was him, it was always him, they only needed to stand there with their feet buried into the muddy moss and look at each other; to feel each other. Time stopped, movement disappeared and it was both the beginning of everything and the end of everything else. They had each other and there was no name, no title to it other than they just had each other. There was no necessity to be practical, what they had and what they were, was of their own and in their own and I think nothing in the world could have made Lucy happier than to have what they had, to be what they were. -C. JoyBell C.
It was human who said BLACK is SAD. I don't believe. You know why. Because I am BLACK but am HAPPY. -Ahamed Nafaz Raja.S.N
It was only by focusing on creating joy in her life that I discovered the greatest feeling of happiness in my own. -Adam Braun
It wouldn’t matter if he was a bad boy , if you got rid of your bad habit. Be encouraged -Kerry E. Wagner
It's a new day, it's a new season, it's time to sing a new song and it's time to put on the dancing shoes. -Euginia Herlihy
It's better to die chasing a dream never caught than to die never having chased the dream. -Joyce Fields
It's better to put yourself out there and get hurt than to never take the chance at all. -Cara Lockwood
It's definitely difficult being a woman and growing up a girl. When you're graceful, people say you lack personality; when you're serene, people say you're boring; when you're confident, people say you're arrogant; when you're feminine, people say you're too girly; and when you climb trees, people say you're too much of a tomboy! As a woman, you really need to develop a very strong sense of self and the earlier you can do that, the better! You have to be all the things that you are, without allowing other people's ignorance change you! I realized that they don't know what grace is, they can't identify serenity, they have inferiority complexes, they are incapable of being feminine, and they don't know how to climb trees! -C. JoyBell C.
It's easy to get carried away in the search for “experience.” I think that people boast of “experience” as if all experience is good. The whole world will tell you that all mistakes are good and all experiences are worthwhile. Nevertheless, I believe in an equilibrium. I always say “throw yourself out there” but at the same time, I want to tell you, that there are so many experiences in life that you’re better off not experiencing. Experience is not always a positive thing, it can affect a person in such a way that it is like finding a tulip trampled under foot, run over by bicycles and spit on. And then the tulip is set on a windowsill for sale with a sign that says “I have had so much experience, that’s why I’m more expensive.” But the truth is, there’s nothing wrong with being that tulip in the field, untouched and caressed by moonlight. Yes, we have the choice to make mistakes, but we also have the choice to choose what things we allow in to make marks upon our lives. It is okay to be untouched by darkness. -C. JoyBell C.
It's fun to do the impossible"  Walt Disney I always dream BIG! -Steve William Laible
It's humbling to start fresh. It takes a lot of courage. But it can be reinvigorating. You just have to put your ego on a shelf &amp; tell it to be quiet. -Jennifer Ritchie Payette
It's like I am inside this ethereal sphere wherein exists no logic, no reasoning, no typicality, no explanations, no realism, no comparisons, nothing ordinary, and no normalcy. And then if you are to understand me, you have to step into my realm and leave all of those things behind. I'm not typical. I'm not ordinary. And I'm not normal. And I never will be ‎. So I don't see the point of waking up in the morning and wishing to be so. -C. JoyBell C.
It's matters not how a man dies, but how he lives. Mello Death Note
It's not my accent, but my brevity makes me stylish. -Amit Kalantri
It's not our job to toughen our children up to face a cruel and heartless world. It's our job to raise children who will make the world a little less cruel and heartless. -L.R. Knost
It's not the law of religion nor the principles of morality that define our highways and pathways to God; only by the Grace of God are we led and drawn, to God. It is His grace that conquers a multitude of flaws and in that grace, there is only favor. Favor is not achieved; favor is received. -C. JoyBell C.
It's not the years in your life that count. It's the life in your years. –Abraham Lincoln
It's not very easy to grow up into a woman. We are always taught, almost bombarded, with ideals of what we should be at every age in our lives: "This is what you should wear at age twenty", "That is what you must act like at age twenty-five", "This is what you should be doing when you are seventeen." But amidst all the many voices that bark all these orders and set all of these ideals for girls today, there lacks the voice of assurance.  There is no comfort and assurance. I want to be able to say, that there are four things admirable for a woman to be, at any age! Whether you are four or forty-four or nineteen! It's always wonderful to be elegant, it's always fashionable to have grace, it's always glamorous to be brave, and it's always important to own a delectable perfume! Yes, wearing a beautiful fragrance is in style at any age! -C. JoyBell C.
It's not what power you have. It's what you do with the power you have that defines you. We all have power. What's yours? -R.S.J. Gregory
It's not where you start or even what happens to you along the way that's important. What is important is that you persevere and never give up on yourself. -Zig Ziglar
It's not whether your glass is empty or full, it's what you do with it that really matters. -Sue Nelson Buckley
It's the easiest thing in the world to be kind to someone, to show love, to forgive. You are born with this instinct - it should be your first reaction. NOT violence, anger and hatred! That is something we are taught, it's a Choice You Make. -Michelle Horst
It's the presence of others who are smarter, kinder, wiser, and different from you that enables you to evolve.  Those are the people to surround yourself with at all times. -Adam Braun
It's the soul's eye which stares at your beauty and knows you well. And from it's vantage point you're as visible as a sunny day -Leandra J. Kalsy
It's this: that a certain point in our lives, we lose control of what's happening to us, and our lives become controlled by fate. That's the world's greatest lie. -Paulo Coelho
It's time that I stop referring to myself, thinking about myself, planning for myself, according to the gridlines and the timelines and the guidelines of people. I will expand in this universe, I will not stay on the lines nor within the lines written by this world. -C. JoyBell C.
It's time to start living the life you've imagined. -Henry James
It's what you do that makes your soul, not the other way around. -Barbara Kingsolver (Author)
It's your place in the world; it's your life. Go on and do all you can with it, and make it the life you want to live. –Mae Jemison
ITALIANO Non ho mai ritenuto reale la mia fantasia, ma ritengo molto fantasiosa la mia realtà. ENGLISH I've never felt my fantasy as real, but I think my reality is very imaginative. -Gianluca Frangella
Its been enough enjoying now, let's begin achieving. -Amit Kalantri
Its never to late to get back on your feet though we wont live forever make sure you  accomplish what you were put here for -Abigail Adams
Its not the ill words that are being passed through each other that matters, but the feelings and the memories attached to that person, that makes it all worth while. Sabrina Mohammed
Its not time that changes everything,get your ass up and make some change. -Corneliuas Mashilane
Itulah sebabnya kita memiliki ingatan. Dan lawan ingatan-harapan -Isaac Marion
IT’s All In The Game Of Mind. -Sujit Lalwani
It’s always going to be easy to live like others or other’s life, because creating or innovating something of own is always difficult in comparison to buying or borrowing anything from others. -Anuj Somany
It’s been said that love is all there is; that a lack of love causes people to do evil things. I can buy that. Take it a step further: capitalism, by itself, is not a bad thing; but when taken to an extreme, as it has been in America—when Christmas is but a measuring stick for how well the economy is doing, when Wall Street and the banking industry turn nescient heads to morality in pursuit of the Almighty Dollar, when love of money overshadows love of self and others—what then? In the grand scheme of the universe—whatever that scheme may be—when one considers its immensity, that it has existed for billions of years, some of us realize how insignificant our seventy or eighty years is; while others, for whatever reason (selfishness?) pursue materialism to a vulgar degree. In the end, what does all that matter, really? It’s nice to spoil oneself from time to time; but really, life’s true gift to oneself is doing and giving to others. That’s love. -J. Conrad Guest, novelist
It’s difficult to find a person who can accept the truth consistently and more when it is related to him only and that’s what keeps the difference between the real talk and the negative talk very marginal. -Anuj Somany
It’s easy to be a Christian when you’re living the perfect life. It’s easy to live a perfect life when God seems to be showering you with blessings. -Tessa Emily Hall
It’s not enough to say it; you would need to take it out of your mouth, you would need to become it. You would need to become what you were born to be. -Chris Campanioni
It’s the hard things that break; soft things don’t break. It was an epiphany I had today and I just wonder why it took me so very, very long to see it! You can waste so many years of your life trying to become something hard in order not to break; but it’s the soft things that can’t break! The hard things are the ones that shatter into a million pieces! -C. JoyBell C.
I’d rather live with a good question than a bad answer. -Aryeh Frimer
I’m a survivor. And like the moon, I have a feeling it would take a truly spectacular event to keep me from taking my place in the scheme of things, waxing, waning, and eclipsing notwithstanding. -Janet Rebhan
I’m barely human. I’m more like a creature; to me, everything gives off a scent! Thoughts, moments, feelings, movements, words left unsaid, words barely spoken; they all have a distinct sense, distinct fragrances! Both a smell and a touch! To inhale is to capture, to experience! I can perceive and I can “touch” in so many odd ways! And so I am made up of all these scents, all these feelings! An illumination of nerve endings! -C. JoyBell C.
I’m not going to die because I failed as someone else. I’m going to succeed as myself. -Margaret Cho
I’m not saying that you should deny the difficult events of your life. But the fact that you survived is also a wonderful story to tell. And that story, the story of the way you came through a difficult situation, found resources within yourself or outside of yourself, gleaned from that experience what you wanted and what you didn’t want going forward — that is a story that can inspire you and others to heal and grow. -Golda Poretsky
I’m not you; you’re not me. Then why do I want you to be like me? -Vinita Kinra
I’ve gotten so many letters and DMs from girls that cut because they’re insecure, that they feel fat, that they feel ugly. They feel they’re not good enough and they don’t believe in themselves. I always see these tumblr posts going around that read “You aren’t ugly, society is” or “society makes us feel like crap”. We ARE society. And the same people that reblog those posts are the same ones that reblog the post that says “when your x dates someone ugly after you… talk about degrading”. What does that say about you? Maybe your ex is more than a guy that likes girls for her boobs and butt. Maybe he likes her for who she is. Or the people that have been nonstop BASHING on a celebrity lately (you know who im talking about) . I understand if you dont like her music,or if you think she’s annoying, but there are people that have been making fun of her body. She is a HUMAN BEING. Whether or not you are jealous of her (which I am lol), does not give you the right to stoop so low as to make fun of her for something she might already be insecure about. Maybe she looks in the mirror sometimes and doesn’t like what she sees and its bad enough to see a world wide trending topic about it. Same goes for every other celebrity, same goes for every girl and boy in the world (im talking to you @uruglyok) Everyone has a story. Everyone’s gone through something that’s changed them. Maybe a tweet to a girl calling her fat could push her over the top, you don’t know what she’s been through. Not only that though, we need to stop putting a grading rubric on who’s beautiful and who’s not. Beauty is not defined by how pretty you are, by how skinny you are, or how tan you are. Let me just say, I genuinely think every person is beautiful. It doesn’t matter what size jeans you are, how long your hair is, if you have straight teeth, all the physical stuff, although it sounds cliche, is FUTILE. I’ve met plenty of hot guys who turned out to be so cocky and arrogant they became completely unattractive to me. Just as I’ve met people that weren’t necessarily calvin Klein models or barbie dolls and had a heart that made them beautiful. I am not perfect. I’m not stick thin, I dont have perfect teeth, perfect skin, perfect hair, perfect anything. I get insecure, self conscious, I’m awkward, I’ve had more embarrassing moments on national TV than I have fingers. And that’s okay. You are all so beautiful. And I really hope you realize it. But I’ve learned that it’s insignificant whether or not other people love you or accept you, YOU have to love and accept yourself. It’s okay not to be perfect. Your imperfections are what make you YOU. And at the end of the day, people like real people, flaws and all. At least I do. And I believe in you. And I don’t know how helpful this may be but I hope it puts a smile on your face and you realize that if you’re going through rough times, I’m here for you. I might not see your tweets or read your DMs, but I believe in you and I love you. -Camila Cabello
Jangan menunggu yang nggak pasti. -Cindy Pricilla
Jarak adalah kendala terbesar yang menjelma menjadi tantangan. Sebenarnya sesederhana itu. -Ariesadhar
Jenny and I were like peas and carrots. -Forrest Gump
Jesus knew that many of his listeners believed the old wineskin (or way of doing things) was good enough. They were comfortable with their beliefs and practices, but Jesus hadn't come to patch up old religious traditions. He was offering a new garment, a new wineskin, a way of life that didn't abolish the old ways, but fulfilled them. The teaching illuminated my own need to remain pliable before God. I realize that I must have a softer housing for my growing faith, one that can flex and change as God is at work inside of me. All too often I find myself clinging to that which is comfortable and familiar, rather than embracing the challenges that emerge with change and growth. Sometimes I shy away from people who have strong views that differ from mine, even though sharing a great conversation... could temper both our viewpoints and deepen our relationship. Why do I run away from strong opinions and potential conflict? Am I too comfortable and unwilling to change? Such a realization highlights the need for the Spirit in my life not just to discern and distinguish, but also to illuminate and invite me to move forward into the fullness of life with him." -Scouting the Divine -Margaret Feinberg
Jesus taught us to pray, "Forgive us our trespasses as we forgive those who trespass against us" not forgive us and smite those bastards who hurt us. -Nadia Bolz-Weber
Jesus was not a carpenter forever. -Chris Matakas
Jewelry maybe is more expensive than clothes, but clothes are more important than jewelry. -Amit Kalantri
jika seluruh hidupmu kau lesakkan dalam satu benda, terpikir olehmu benda apakah itu? -Lisa Febriyanti
Jonahtan Seagull discovered that boredom and fear and anger are the reasons that a gull's life is so short,and with these gone from his thought,he lived a long life indeed. -Richard Bach
Josiah became King of Judah at the age of eight. Joan of Arc led the French Army at nineteen. King Tut led all of Egypt at age nine. Age isn't everything you think it is. Your heart and your spirit speak more than a simple candle count on your birthday cake. ~Tony (Exposing ELE) -Rebecca Gober
JOURNEY is not all about HAPPINESS or SADNESS that you take its all about how much HARDWORK you do and lesson that you EARNED.... -Angela Relato
Judge a man by it's questions, rather than his answers -Cynthia Hand
Judging is the cause that creates the effect of choosing. -Joey Lawsin
Just because God allows it doesn't mean He wills it. -Prophet AJ Lovett
just because it burns doesnt mean your gonna die ......... -Me
Just because you can speak louder than me does not make you more right! -Mark W. Boyer
Just because you start attempting to do right, doesn’t mean people will let you forget about what you’ve done wrong…Be encouraged -Kerry E. Wagner
Just do it! First you make your habits, then your habits make you! -Lucas Remmerswaal
Just go with it', he thought. 'You won't figure out anything if you give in to fear'. -James Dashner
Just pick a goal and stick to it―no big complicated secret. -Richelle E. Goodrich
just pick the world up and drop it on your haters!!!! -MR-S
Just read one book a month and at the end of they year you would be totally different but an impressive personality. -Amit Kalantri
Just remember that you can't always do everything, but you can always do everything you can. -Briar Kit Esme
Just remember, everything should be EXACTLY as it is. Not better, not worse." - L. R. W. Lee -L.R.W. Lee
Just remember, the difference between being good versus being great is just a few points, inches, or seconds. -Bruce H. Jackson
Just when the butterfly thought the world was over, it became a butterfly. -Anonymous
Just You Against Life >> -Khaireddine Safwane
Kadang kita harus memilih bukan karena kita menginginkan pilihan tersebut,  tapi hanya karena pilihan tersebut, segalanya akan lebih baik. -Robin Wijaya
Kahit gaano kahirap basta't gusto mo makakaya mo. -Rodugsoy Pinoy
Kau terlalu mencintainya, tapi tak menyadari bahwa jiwa setiap laki-laki adalah petualang.Bahwa ia selalu menjadi burung liar yang ingin terbang kemanapun sebelum akhirnya menemukan sarang yang menyimpan hatinya. Sekali kau simpan hatinya, dia tidak akan pernah terbang lagi. Andai pun pergi, ia akan selalu kembali kepadamu. -Sanie B. Kuncoro
Kebahagiaan tidak dihasilkan oleh potongan besar keberuntungan yang terjadi, melainkan oleh keberuntungan kecil yang terjadi setiap hari.” Benjamin Franklin -Eric Weiner
Kebathilan selama bila pun (abadan abada) tidak boleh dianggap benar kerana ukuran ramainya yang menyokong - atau sudah diarus perdanakan. Dan kebenaran pula - dalam apa jua zaman dan ruang masa pun - tidak boleh diinjak mati dan dilenyap punah hanya semata dititipkan rohnya oleh sebatang pena dan selembar kertas. -Hafiz Fandani
Keberuntungan yang berlebihan selalu mengundang dengki. -Tere Liye
Keep Distance From The People You LOVE The MOST Because The More You SHOW Your LOVE Towards THEM The More They Take You FOR GRANTED ! -Sanyukta Mishra
keep looking at the sun...and the shadows will fall behind !!!!!!!!! -Anonymous
Keep pointed in the right direction. If ya stumble you'll land in the right place. -Curt Rude
Keep showing up. You never know when you’ll be the miracle in another's life. -Kathryn V. White
Keep your eyes on the stars and your feet on the ground -Theodore Roosevelt
Kein Schiff trägt uns besser in ferne Länder, als ein Buch. -Emily Dickinson
Kemudian yang kamu perlukan hanyalah kaki yang akan melangkah lebih jauh, tangan yang akan berbuat lebih banyak, mata yang akan melihat lebih lama, leher yang akan lebih sering mendongak, tekad yang setebal baja, dan hati yang akan bekerja lebih keras serta mulut yang selalu berdoa. -Donny Dhirgantoro
Kenangi yang lalu, hadapi yang baru dengan penuh kesyukuran. -Iman Mka
Kenapa harus takut dengan masalah,karna hidup tanpa masalah seakan membawa kita ke titik nol -duzzy
Ketawalah kalau itu boleh mendatangkan kegembiraan kepadamu -Imaen
Killing a cruelty is not a cruelty. -Amit Kalantri
Kindness always leaves a timeless deposit on the heart. -Molly Friedenfeld
Kita akan mulai melupakan sebuah tempat begitu tempat itu kita tinggalkan. Charles Dicken -Eric Weiner
Kita tidak pernah tau,apa di setiap hujan reda akan ada pelangi yang muncul. Begitu juga hidup , terkadang kita harus bermandikan air mata untuk mencapai sebuah kebahagiaan. -Mitamorfh
Know that true change is demonstrated only by your actions around everyone, not just certain people. -Tanya R. Liverman
Know well what leads you forward and what holds you back, and choose the path that leads to wisdom. -Buddha
Know yourself who you are, Know your inner potentials, motivations and purposes, Know what blocks you. -Allen Parker
Knowing how to fall is much more valuable than knowing how to walk. -Diogo Mainardi
Knowledge comes from leaning - Ignorance is born from not wanting to know the difference! -Robbie Thomas
Knowledge comes from learning - Ignorance is born from not wanting to know the difference! -Robbie Thomas
Knowledge is high in the head, but the salmon of wisdom swims deep -Neil M. Gunn
Knowledge is like an endless resource; a well of water that satisfies the innate thirst of the growing human soul. Therefore never stop learning... because the day you do, you will also stop maturing. -Chidi Okonkwo
Knowledge is something that sustains forever with you and even there after -Himangshu Bailung
Knowledge without destination is a disaster. -Chiemezie Anyaeji
L'esercizio rende perfetti, ma nessuno è perfetto, quindi perché esercitarsi? -Billie Joe Armstrong
La risa es algo muy serio, Sabes? Es el disolvente universal de las preocupaciones. -Álex Rovira Francesc Miralles
Last night at Bingo, Sylvia won the last prize. 'What am I going to do with a mermaid?"  "Learn to swim in the murkiest water, reinvent yourself," the mermaid said #149 -Monique Duval
Last night I lost the world, and gained the universe. -C. JoyBell C.
Last Resort friends are for getting from, not giving to. -J.M.  Richards
Laughter is good for both the body and the soul. -Mike Meyer
Laziness is sickness to success. -Jonathan Celestin
Laziness is the curse of someone who has no dreams. -Vinita Kinra
Le souvenir n'est qu'un regard posé de temps en temps sur des êtres devenus intérieurs,mais qui ne dépendent pas de la mémoire pour continuer d'exister. -Marguerite Yourcenar
Leaders console the world with their speeches, heroes console the world with their actions. -Amit Kalantri
Leaders lead themselves first and foremost. Only then can they act as example and inspiration to others. -Christopher Babson
Leadership is all about caring, daring and sharing! Caring for people, Daring to Act fearlessly, &amp; Sharing the success with all! -Sujit Lalwani
Leadership is bringing people into new realms of excellence and challenging them to become distinguished in their chosen field. -Onyi Anyado
Leadership reveals itself in the big moments, but is forged in the small. It is the exponential and compounding product of our many incremental behaviors and actions; all of which arise out of our choices in values, beliefs &amp; emotions. Choices all. Not a one is thrust upon us. -Christopher Babson
Learn from yesterday, Live for today, Pray for tomorrow -Daniel Šalić
Learn to be embarrassed by little and sorry about even less. -Andrew Sturm
Learn to let go or everything you have ever done will be in vain. You will let go of everything right now." He told me, staring into my blue eyes with his big golden orbs. "You are going to let go of everything in this world and let yourself become nothing. Do you understand? -Grace Fiorre
Learn to think BIG but start small. All the big projects eventually started with a single step. -Petronela Zainuddin
Learning from your mistake is good, but learning from others mistake is better. -Japson
Leave yesterday in yesterday. If yesterday cannot add value to YOUR today, then it has no place and serves no purpose. -Stephanie Lahart
Leer abre tu mente a conocer cosas que nunca antes imaginaste -Miriam Mendoza
Length of a straight line is determined by the two tiny dots on both ends -mads
Let All Your Life’s Experiences Lead To More Writing &amp; Encourage More Reading..! -Sujit Lalwani
Let go of self-condemnation and guilt! -Tae Yun Kim
Let go of yesterday, you made it! Don't use yesterday's state of mind to make today's decisions. -C. Nzingha Smith
Let God’s actions be accounted unto God, and man’s actions be the responsibility of man. Do not blame God for man's mistakes. -Kassi Pontious
Let me hear your voice; and I'll tell you who you are. -sir kristian goldmund aumann
Let no feeling of discouragement prey upon you, and in the end you  are sure to succeed. -Abraham Lincoln
Let people be the pursuits of happiness, you be the pursuit of perfection. -Amit Kalantri
Let people stick to their philosophy, you stick  to your passion. -Amit Kalantri
Let the positivite in to be in a good one and Ignore the negativity in life thrown to you. :) -Maria Aiza
Let there be beauty and strength, power and compassion, honor and humility, mirth and reverence within you. -Starhawk
Let those who can write to write and bring more knowldge and understading to the society. And let those who can read to read out loud for every ear to hear. -Euginia Herlihy
Let us each take up our flaming torches and mount as the blazing fireballs of light that we are and let's burn the skies and leave it with deep scars and let them be our signatures upon eternity as we go forth! -C. JoyBell C.
Let us make sure that future generation writes our biography. -Amit Kalantri
Let yourself be enchanted in small ways. -Guy Kawasaki
Let's get one thing clear, there may be few or many successful people in your profession, but there is going to be only one hero in that profession. -Amit Kalantri
Let's go for our dreams and be stronger than any obstacles. -Christy Birmingham
Let's make just a few more steps and secure success forever. -Stephen Richards
Letter to read on your way to Success Dear Me If you see someone successful. Don't envy them, but rather remind yourself that we all had to start somewhere. I mean if you think about it we were all kids at once with big dreams. What separates us as we grow older is the choices we had to make along the way. Shakespeare to put it well when he said, "some are born into greatness and others simply choose to be." I simply love these to quotes when you put them together, "Don't compare yourself with others cause it is because were different that each of us is special" and "If you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree, it will always seem like failure to you." The message here is that we are all good at something. So if you haven't made it thus far, don't be to hard on yourself by comparing yourself with others, cause you know nothing about their journey. We are all on our own individual paths in life. Some people have already given themselves the job of trying to put you down every chance they get, don't make it worse for yourself by doing the same. Its never to late to be what you always wanted to be. But before you start on your journey be sure what that is exactly, so as to prevent you climbing a ladder only to end up on the wrong wall. -Njabulo P. Vilakazi
Librarians are tour-guides for all of knowledge. -Patrick Ness
Lies are like anchovies in a Caesar salad. You may not be able to see them, but your soul knows they are there. -Molly Friedenfeld
lies may hurt you but you have to get up and forgive them -MR-S
Life doesn't offers charity, it offers chance. -Amit Kalantri
Life equates to being fairly simple at times. Although we have the tendency and unbelievable ability to complicate things. So I suggest we go to the basics. Do unto others as you would have others do unto your children. Yes, your children. Because they are the ones that will be left behind to live their lives in the world that we have created. -Joe Bailey
Life gets easier when you stop caring and expecting things to get better! -Nehali Lalwani
Life goes quickly. It's such a shame to waste time. We always think we have so much of it. -Mitch Albom
Life has no victims. There are no victims in this life. No one has the right to point fingers at his/her past and blame it for what he/she is today. We do not have the right to point our finger at someone else and blame that person for how we treat others, today. Don’t hide in the corner, pointing fingers at your past. Don’t sit under the table, talking about someone who has hurt you. Instead, stand up and face your past! Face your fears! Face your pain! And stomach it all! You may have to do so kicking and screaming and throwing fits and crying- but by all means- face it! This life makes no room for cowards. -C. JoyBell C.
Life is 10% what happens to me and 90% of how I react to it. –Charles Swindoll
Life is a bowl of cherries. Some cherries are rotten while others are good; its your job to throw out the rotten ones and forget about them while you enjoy eating the ones that are good! There are two kinds of people: those who choose to throw out the good cherries and wallow in all the rotten ones, and those who choose to throw out all the rotten ones and savor all the good ones. -C. JoyBell C.
Life is a changing sequence of situations.If you do not change something, something will change you. -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Life is a continuous war between negative and positive thoughts.Yes continuous. -Sandeep Kakkar
Life is a mystery to be lived not a problem to be solved -Clive Ollies
Life is a tagline, please compose it with your best-est knowledge. -Kaushal Yadav
Life is a tragedy for those who feel...but a comedy for those who think -Brenda Walpole
Life is a wonderful gift bestowed us from Above, but it is also challenging and heart-wrenching. We can all use a little motivation and inspiration from time to time, to navigate the small  and large hurdles we encounter on our journey. But when the moment comes you will be creating footsteps on that aimed horizon, never forget to look back and be reminded of those few people who have brought you there. Remember those hands which comforted you on your failures, rather than those hands which praised you on your success. -Jelord Klinn Cabresos
Life is about being nice to people and believing in yourself.. -Gary Gray
Life is agid, life is fulgid. Life is what the least of us make most of us feel the least of us make the most of. Life is a burgeoning, a quickening of the dim primordial urge in the murky wastes of time. -Willard Van Orman Quine
Life is an adventure.  You must be adventurous to embrace life. -Lailah Gifty Akita
Life is an experiment in which you may fail or succeed. Explore more, expect least. -Santosh Kalwar
Life is difficult for everyone. We all have stress and we all need someone in our lives that we can lean on. Never think that you cannot talk to someone because they have problems to or that your friend or loved one would be better off without you or your problems. You'll soon find out that they need you just as much as you need them. -Joshua Hartzell
Life Is Like A Bicycle ; If You Want To Keep Your Balance You Should Move On &amp; On ~ Albert Einstein . -Albert Einstein
life is not about how fast you start,but how the end is going to be ,so don't worry when others are ahead of you.just keep on doing what you have been doing. -lexis smigz
Life is not about perfection. It's about persistence. -Natalie Wright
Life is not about waiting for the storm to pass...it's about learning how to dance in the rain. -Anonymous
Life is not about waiting for the storms to pass...  It's about learning how to dance in the rain. - Vivian Greene -Vivian Greene
Life is not about what happened yesterday nor what will happen tomorrow,it's about this particular moment! -Runa Magnus
Life is not compassionate towards victims. The trick is not to see yourself as one. It's never too late! I know I've felt like the victim in various situations in my life, but, it's never too late for me to realize that it's my responsibility to stand on victorious ground and know that whatever it is I'm experiencing or going through, those are just the clouds rolling by while I stand here on the top of this mountain! This mountain called Victory! The clouds will come and the clouds will go, but the truth is that I'm high up here on this mountaintop that reaches into the sky! I am a victor. I didn't climb up the mountain, I was born on top of it! -C. JoyBell C.
Life is not easy for any of us. But what of that? We must have perseverance and above all confidence in ourselves. We must believe that we are gifted for something, and that this thing, at whatever cost, must be attained. -Marie Curie
Life is not measured by the number of breaths we take, but by the moments that take our breath away. –Maya Angelou
Life is one grand, sweet song, so start the music. Ronald Reagan -Barbara Post-Askin
Life is pain. Anyone who says otherwise is selling something. -William Goldman
Life is seasonal and that's a fact.Your determination,diligence and perseverance will only come into fruition when it's your ordained season.Never give up on your dream but never be in haste to shine;remember, even the almighty SUN awaits for day to come;and when it is day,it's brightness is conspicuously evident and remarkable.Be your self and don't be a photocopy because you are simply unique. -Lotsu Setor
Life is short but heartache is shorter -Tyler Perry
Life is short, and that's why, I don't test people; because we all fail tests sometimes, but that is supposed to be okay! I don't play games with people; because people aren't toys. And I don't risk what I don't want to lose; because if I do lose it, it's definitely my loss and not theirs! How short is life, you ask me. Well, life is as short as one drop in eternity. I swim in a single drop in this basin of eternal waters, and after that drop evaporates, it's gone! But then you could argue that if life is just a drop, then why even bother? Well, yes it is a drop, but it's a meaningful drop, an unforgettable drop, and a beautiful one! It's so unforgettable, that when you come back again, if you choose to, you will remember it in your dreams at night! So you see, I don't test people, I don't play games, and I don't risk who and what I don't want to lose. -C. JoyBell C.
Life is short,Live it long -Zaveric
Life is too short not to start something stupid. -Richie Norton
Life is too short to have even few enemies and too long not to have one more friend! -Sathish Krishnamurthy
Life is too short to waste any amount of time on wondering what other people think about you. In the first place, if they had better things going on in their lives, they wouldn't have the time to sit around and talk about you. What's important to me is not others' opinions of me, but what's important to me is my opinion of myself. -C. JoyBell C.
Life is what happens to you while you're busy making other plans. –John Lennon
Life is what we make it, always has been, always will be. –Grandma Moses
life is worth living when you have someone to share it with .. -zybil rogan
Life isn't about finding yourself. It's about creating yourself. -George Bernard Shaw
Life isn't about getting and having, it's about giving and being. –Kevin Kruse
Life shrinks or expands in proportion to one's courage. –Anais Nin
Life will just not wait for us to live it: We are in it, now, and Now is the time to Live -Michelle Geaney
life without a purpose is like an unsharpened pencil; it has no point. -Eraica Chan
Life, is energy. It is the energy that makes your heart beat and makes you breathe, that causes the cells of your body to automatically grow and reproduce the moment you are conceived! -Tae Yun Kim
LIFE. What it was . What it will be?  It’s, How I see it . How I will see. Starts from you, and ends in me. And whispers...Who I am . Who I will be. -Swapnil Tewari
Life's journey is peppered with many bumps and pitfalls. If we make mountains out of each one, we will get nowhere. -Charles F. Glassman
Life's meant to be sweet! Grab a cupcake and enjoy the ride! -Kimmie Easley
Like a bud is born with the knowing that it will flower when the season comes, like a bird is born with the principles of flight that take over when it spreads its wings to fly, the human body-mind-soul, is born with the capacity to heal itself, long before it is taught . . . to forget. -Sanjiv Ranjan
Like a Rainbow at Midnight, your Brilliance Shines through the Darkness. -Renee Rentmeester
Like butterflies, we evolve; but as Beings of Light we continuously evolve when we are fully present. -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
Like everyone else in the house, she suffers from dreams. -Andrew Miller
Like everything else, Fletcher. Practice. -Richard Bach
Limitations live only in our minds.  But if we use our imaginations, our possibilities become limitless. –Jamie Paolinetti
Listen and learn from others' criticism.It will tell you as much about you as it will about them. -Carol Vorvain
Little Engine That Could - "I think I can. I think I can. I think I can. I know I can. -Watty Piper
Live a life of love, of passion of desire, of free will. Take a chance, take the leap, and jump head first into the abyss.  Start a flame in your bonfire  heart, and show the world your passion. -Steven Aitchison
Live a life of virtue. Remember, yesterday you were not here, tomorrow you won’t be here. -Vinita Kinra
Live free, dream loud, be inspired, find your power. -Ben Herr
Live full, die empty -Les Brown
Live life like it's your last day. Make every minute count. For tomorrow is not promised. Live in the moment. -Alisha Broughton
Live life to the fullest, however long that life might be. -Ileana Araguti
Live life with passion from our hearts and believe. Let love be the reason and purpose of life -Jerrycel Verlinden
Live like no else today, so you can live like no else tomorrow. -Dave Ramsey
Live simply, love seriously, care deeply, speak kindly...leave the rest to God. -Joanne Clancy
Live the life you have always imagine. -Lailah Gifty Akita
Live to start your stupid ideas, and start to live a life without regret--a life filled with meaning, freedom, happiness, fun, authenticity, and influence. -Richie Norton
Live well, Laugh often, Love much. -John McLeod
Live where you are so God can meet you at your needs. -Tyler Perry
Live your life as a curious student and you will discover how fascinating it is. -Elena Ornig
Live your life in such a way that it is going to be the favorite story of your generation and generations to come. -Amit Kalantri
Live your life so you don´t have to have any regrets when you throw your 70 year old birthday party -Herdis Pala
Live... More than your neighbors. Unleash yourself upon the world and go places. Go now. Giggle no,laugh. -Jon Blais
Living a Princely life requires that you learn to think and reason like the Prince, talk and behave like him, react like him as well. -Jaachynma N.E. Agu
Living is about capturing the essence of things. I go through my life every day with a vial, a vial wherein can be found precious essential oils of every kind! The priceless, fragrant oils that are the essence of my experiences, my thoughts. I walk inside a different realm from everybody else, in that I am existing in the essence of things; every time there is reason to smile, I hold out my glass vial and capture that drop of oil, that essence, and then I smile. And that is why I have smiled, and so you and I may be smiling at the same time but I am smiling because of that one drop of cherished, treasured oil that I have extracted. When I write, I find no need to memorize an idea, a plot, a sequence of things: no. I must only capture the essence of a feeling or a thought and once I have inhaled that aroma, I know that I have what I need. -C. JoyBell C.
Living isn't always red bows and birthday balloons. -Carew Papritz
Living, if we go about it with selfishness and lack of awareness about our interdependence with the universal laws and other beings, turns into a nightmare of suffering with brief moments of happiness -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
Locating friendship at the heart of mission involves certain assumptions -- that reconciliation with God is something for which every human being is made and relationships are reciprocal. -Christopher Heuertz
Long before we even lose our lives, we lose our souls. Tragic but true. Some carry on—willing to make the sacrifices, putting what is perceived as important before anything else. Some tread into the dark—wasting moments of grace, letting themselves suffer from their own decisions or the other’s domination. Some continue to love, give too much, and not leave even a little love for themselves. -Joanne Crisner
Look at what they do in a lifetime," she said. "These hands lit fires, cooked, wove a thousand blankets and carpets. They helped children into the world. When you are old," Hagar said, "look at your hands, Ish, and think of what they have done, good things and bad. Hands are like faces. Every scar a story -Jack Lasenby
Look at your life as a patient and a doctor! -Tae Yun Kim
Look The art of being wise knows what to overlook Sing positive vibes into your soul like a hook Pray for more years because a year in a man's life teaches more than book -Rhymesonny
Lord pls give me quality problems like where to bank my Billions!which country to go shopping,should I buy a Bugatti or Ferrari?problem like where do I park my Jet Eleda masun!!!Oya turnup -Kazeem Akintilo
Lord, you're the only one I can truly confide in without you judging me, or throwing dirt back in my face months later. -Colishia S. Benjamin
Los pensamientos que acuden a mi mente cuando corro se parecen a las nubes del cielo. Nubes de diversas formas y tamaños. Nubes que vienen y se van. Pero el cielo siempre es el cielo. Las nubes son sólo meras invitadas. Algo que pasa de largo y se dispersa. Y sólo queda el cielo. El cielo es algo que, al tiempo que existe, no existe. Algo material y a la vez, inmaterial. Y a nosotros no nos queda sino aceptar ka existencia de ese inmenso recipiente tal cual es e intentar ir asimilándolo. -Haruki Murakami
Loss is merely a tool for evaluation, organization, determination and actualization towards being the best you that you can possibly be. -Jennifer Sodini
Lost in New York City. Not that I don't know where I am, but rather perplexed as to where I am going. -Christy  Hall
Love all, Trust a few and do wrong to no one! -William Shakespeare
Love and honor the world around you, and you experience life in its fullest.  There is no “Other.”  There is simply us.  The all of us, the whole of us.  The mankind of us.  Anything else is a lie. -Cassandra Blizzard
Love and kindness are the hammer and chisel that gently chip through barriers and long-held beliefs to reveal the magnificent soul contained within every human. -Molly Friedenfeld
Love and ruin are explained with letters of the alphabet. The power of the word can describe the glory of the universe. It only requires an open mind and heart. -J.R. Ortiz
Love and truth are intimately connected. You cannot have pure love without pure truth and you cannot have pure truth without pure love. -Molly Friedenfeld
Love cannot be hidden. It even shines in the darkest places." ~ Carla Olson Gade, The Shadow Catcher's Daughter -Carla Olson Gade
Love comes with a risk. We all know that. We don’t know what’s going to happen tomorrow…hell, we don’t even know what’s going to happen the next second. So we just love the person we love by the second and pray to God that we get another one with them. -V.R. Avent
Love for yourself is the key to loving other. Love begins with you. -Miguel Ruiz
Love invests with no guarantee of a ROI. (Return On Investment) -T. Webb
Love is like a good cake; you never know when it's coming, but you'd better eat it when it does! -C. JoyBell C.
Love is sacrifice... -Nagato Uzumaki
Love is something you must accept in order to have, Naomi. -Nakia R. Laushaul
Love is the ultimate creator. -Molly Friedenfeld
Love might come again, Surely Dreams Never. -Sarvesh Jain
Love paid a price so hope could become a reality. -Susan Gaddis
Love those who love you back; leave those who think lust is love. -Vinita Kinra
love yourself,.,.,.,for  the sake of       your better future -John Grisham
Love, affection, even attention are not things that need pursuit. If they are not given freely, openly, willingly to you by another person, then stop trying to obtain them from that person. Someone else will gladly share theirs with you. -Charles F. Glassman
Love. Not the kind you see in the movies or hear about on the radio. The real kind. The kind that gets beaten down and bloody, yet perseveres. The kind that hopes even when hope seems foolish. The kind that can forgives. The kind that believes in healing.  The kind that can sit in silence and feel renewed. The real kind of love. It's rare and we have it.. -Chelsea Fine
Love' is the only weapon I have, I will defend with love, I will attack with love. -Amit Kalantri
Lovers tend to be philosophical, achievers are practical. -Amit Kalantri
Loving ourselves is a revolutionary act! -Abiola Abrams
Ma már nem gondolom, hogy út, szenvedés, fáradtság nélkül célba lehet jutni. -Tolvaly Ferenc
Magic moments are the currency of life ... manage them well and you will be wealthy... -Stephen Richards
Maintain a balance life: Nurture your physical, emotional, and spiritual needs. -Lailah Gifty Akita
Maintain a forgiving attitude! -Tae Yun Kim
Maintain a receptive attitude! -Tae Yun Kim
Majority wins, but majority is not necessarily right and sometimes majority is awfully wrong. -Amit Kalantri
Make daily small deposits... Our lives are defined by small acts of greatness. -Steve Gutzler
Make no mistake, sin has been dealt with once for all, and we are as close to Him as we will ever be. -D.R. Silva
Make sure when you reach for the stars, you keep both feet firmly planted on the ground. -Charles F. Glassman
make the most of the day, by determining to spend it on two sorts of acquaintances only - those by whom something may be got, and those from whom something may be learned. - Colton -Colton Robinsmith
Make your interactions with people transformational, not just transactional. -Patti Smith
Make your lives a masterpiece, you only get one canvas. -E.A. Bucchianeri
Making a decision based on fear is like painting a self-portrait of someone else. -Charles F. Glassman
Making peace with one's truth is to live in one’s own moment, moving passionately forward in joy. -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
Man is not defiled by his impurities. It is the other man pointing out his impurities to him, whom he is defiled by. Is there anything anyone can do, to become righteous, anyway? God made us impure. If he had a problem with that, He would have made us gods, instead. -C. JoyBell C.
Man is smart - If money would have grown on trees, we would have used green leaves as money. -Amit Kalantri
Man is whoever he thinks he is, within his own boundaries. -Dudley Davidson-Jarrett
Man kept control over the machines he created, I wish God would have done the same with the man he created. -Amit Kalantri
Many have never risked losing the normalcy of their daily existence to gain the astonishing experience of having to see God come through or die. -Murray Pura
Many people are so enamored by the Glamour of the Gift of Life that they forget to Open , Understand and Live it. Unwrap your Gift of Life and find the True Treasure. -Rvm
Many people become prosperous only to realize that Success is more Fulfillment than Achievement. -Rvm
Many people define beauty as skin deep, but I’ve found the beauty in physical and superficial changes that continue throughout the life of a woman. -Alyscia Cunningham
Many people do not fall in love; they fall in love with the idea of themselves being in love. They never see the other person. I don't ask for much; I only ask to be seen. -C. JoyBell C.
Many people think of similar great things, but only the few act on it that makes them great. -Pontius Joseph
Many things that don't really mean so much of anything, are wonderful. -C. JoyBell C.
Marcel ise şöyle öldü: Bir gün bütün berduşların Paris'in kent manzarasından silinmelerine karar verilmişti. Sosyal yardım örgütü, aynı zamanda kentin doğru dürüst bir görünümde olmasıyla da ilgilenen ve düşünülebilecek en resmi nitelikteki sosyal yardım örgütünün ilgilileri, polisle birlikte Rue Monge'a geldiler, tek istedikleri, yaşlı adamları yaşama geri döndürmek, dolayısıyla da yaşama hazır olsunlar diye önce yıkayıp paklamaktı. Marcel yerinden kalkıp onlarla birlikte gitti, çok sakin bir adamdı, birkaç kadeh şarap sonra bile hâlâ bilge ve uysal kalabilen bir insandı. Gelmelerini o gün büyük bir olasılıkla hiç umursamamıştı, belki de caddedeki iyi yerine, metronun sıcak havasının mazgallardan dışarı çıktığı yere geri dönebileceğini düşünüyordu. Ama kamunun esenliği için yapılmış olan, içinde çok sayıda duşun bulunduğu yıkanma salonunda sıra Marcel'e de geldi, onu duşun altına soktular ve duş hiç kuşkusuz ne fazla sıcak, ne de fazla soğuktu, ama Marcel yıllardan beri ilk kez çıplaktı ve ilk kez suyun altına girmişti. Daha kimse durumu kavrayıp yardımına koşamadan düştü ve hemen oracıkta öldü. Ne demek istediğimi anlıyor musun! Malina, biraz ne yapacağını şaşırmış gibi bakıyor, oysa ne yapacağını asla şaşırmaz. Bu öyküyü anlatmayabilirdim. Ama duşu bir defa daha hissediyorum, Marcel'in üstündeki neleri yıkamaya hakları yoktu, bunu biliyorum. Eğer bir insan kendi mutluluğun buharları arasında yaşıyorsa, eğer bir insanın "Allah sizden razı olsun"un dışında söyleyecek pek sözü yoksa, o zaman o insanı yıkamaya kalkışmamalı, o insan için iyi olanı o insanın üstünden yıkayıp akıtmamalı, birini olmayan bir yaşam için arındırmaya kalkışmamalı... -Ingeborg Bachmann
Marmee: Oh, Jo. Jo, you have so many extraordinary gifts; how can you expect to lead an ordinary life? You’re ready to go out and – and find a good use for your talent. Tho’ I don’t know what I shall do without my Jo. Go, and embrace your liberty. And see what wonderful things come of it. -Louisa May Alcott
Marriage is the equivalent of trying to live with a bug perpetually up your nose.” D’Artagnan Bloodhawke -D'Artagnan Bloodhawke
Masa lalumu adl masa lalu yg suram sdh trbuang percuma, energy mudamu salah dipergunakan &amp; harta tak ternilai yg dianugerahkan Pencipta kepadamu hanya sekali &amp; takkan pernah dilimpahkanNya lg dg sia2, tp utk masa depan, kau blh berharap. -Charles Dickens
May Light always surround you; Hope kindle and rebound you. May your Hurts turn to Healing; Your Heart embrace Feeling. May Wounds become Wisdom; Every Kindness a Prism. May Laughter infect you; Your Passion resurrect you. May Goodness inspire  your Deepest Desires. Through all that you Reach For,  May your arms Never Tire. -D. Simone
May the Best Man Wins!? how can you compete if your already below of your Feet? -kent Ian N. Cny
May the river be; may the fish live. May the river not dry up and may the fish not die. We shall not shiver; we shall not quake.  When the bush is burning, may we run out to the road; and when the road is burning, may we run into the bush. We shall see that which we shall eat; whatever will eat us will not see us. Whatever will profit us, if it is inside the ground, it will germinate; if it is in the water, it will float. The source through which enmity comes our way shall turn to the source of our joy. -Azuka Onwuka
May there be great peace and happiness in your lives! May society become a better place and those that are hurting deep down inside feel great about themselves and to those that hate the world as well as everything still, fight that ball of bitterness that lives within you. The world may not care about you so you have to care about yourself and take care of yourself or go to places for asylum &amp; serenity. Don't feel ashamed or make the world give you the impression because of negative stereotypes that you shouldn't because humans are about themselves and their personal issues. At the end of the day, who knows you better than yourself? Perhaps close friends? God? But may God be a God of peace for you. And if you don't have any true friends, remember one genuine friend is better than a thousand fake friends. -Krystal Volney
May Your Light of Love In Life, Shine Through Others. -Official Barbie Michelle
Maybe deep down inside we were all still in our formative years. Maybe it was never too late for any of us to change. -Claire Cook
Maybe God doesn't care if we get all dressed up and sit in the pew every Sunday, as Diana believes.  Instead, maybe God comes to us through men like Sloth, watching over us as we make our own decisions.  Maybe God has always been with me.  Opening doors, leading me to opportunities, letting me choose my own path, and loving me even when I chose the wrong one.  Never giving up on me.  Knowing all along that I am on a journey.  That I must find my own way to Him.  Maybe River was rights.  Maybe God does still believe in me. -Julie Cantrell
Maybe i'm a dreamer... but i'm Living the reality. -Asma Dreamer
Maybe we can't change the world, but we can do our part to make the world a better place for everyone. -Boss Amanishakhete
Maybe we shouldn't be looking for love. Maybe we should be looking for a person. Because maybe you can find love in a person, but not have that person. So if you look for love, what you will find is love. But if you want to belong to someone, and you want someone to belong to you, you should look for a person. -C. JoyBell C.
Maybe we shouldn't begin to stop believing in God when He starts to let go of our hand; because at that moment He begins to let go of your hand, that's the moment He's begun to believe in YOU! He says, "I believe in you, I know you can." And that's not the time to stop believing in someone, when He is believing in you. A good father knows when to let go and start believing that you can. We may not understand it at first, but after we look at ourselves and say "Wow, I'm awesome, I did that all by myself." Then we say "Thanks, dad. If you never let go of me, I would have never learned how to fly. -C. JoyBell C.
Maybe you are in the Abyss of Emotional Bankruptcy looking for a way out, looking for the next rung in the ladder on your climb to the Peak of Happiness, or you may even be at the Peak of Happiness already, looking for a way to stay there. Wherever you are in life, this book is designed to give you the tools necessary to help you achieve your goals. -Ken Poirot
Me" ( Notice Me) I was sent here on a journey that has no end. I hear you joke of going nowhere fast. Well, maybe life’s a joke and I’m the fool That dreams of being first but ends up last. Life’s a trial—a sentence I can’t escape. Confusion and desperation tear me down and turn to hate. There’s so much more to figure out, But it’s growing way too late. If I could answer half the questions in my mind, If I could find the place where I belong, If words were near as strong and deep as the wall of emotions I climb Then sorrow wouldn’t be so wrong. There’s no way to make you understand. An entire symphony could not play the broken notes in one child’s soul. That child screams and no one hears her, Until the tears have dried and now she’s just too old. I don’t want to hear the philosophies, the opinions, The remarks, the horrible reasonings. Words are to pad the mind and fight with the solitude of the heart. Still, silence chills to the bone and tears the soul apart. She never means to hurt or harm, only to belong. To find the truth ‘mid mortal lies, to sing her only song. But someday this race will end, and if she comes in last, I pray the first will look deeper than the others, smile, and then pass. "Copyright 1985 -Richelle E. Goodrich
Memahami apa yang dirasakan dan diharapkan orang lain membutuhkan hati yang selalu hidup,karena hati yang bisa membaca hati. nurul arofah
Memories make you sentimental, experiences make you smart. -Amit Kalantri
Men brave and generous live the best lives, seldom will they sorrow; then there are fools, afraid of everything, who grumble instead of giving. -Anonymous
Men come and go, but best friends are irreplaceable. -C.M. Stunich
Men who fish at shallow waters can never have enough fish to feed their family talk less of a nation or a generation -Olojo Daniel Olatunji
Mentorship is an eye that's not judgemental, soft hearted that boosts the mentee's confidence and encourages him/her to believe in herself/himself. -Euginia Herlihy
Mereka sedang dalam perjalanan menggapai mimpinya ... tampaknya sebentar lagi sampai .. sementara ini aku masih duduk termenung menunggu bus yang dapat membawaku menuju impian itu, inginnya sih naik pesawat jet ... tapi dalam menggapai mimpi tidak ada yang instan butuh perjuangan , kalau begitu sembari menantinya datang bagaimana kalau kamu tetap melangkah dengan kedua kakimu sekarang? walaupun jauh tapi setidaknya kamu tetap mencoba hingga waktu itu pun tiba ... percayalah, bersabarlah dan melangkahlah :) -Rizqiyyah Yasmin
Mga bata pa kayo. Pag pinaniwalaan namin kayong hindi kayo naglaro ng tubig kahit na basang-basa ang mga damit ninyo, kayo ang niloloko namin. Hindi kayo ang nakakapanloko. -Bob Ong
Mi piaceva, Colodino... Non l'ho preso perché era affittato come noi. Uccidere un coronel va bene, ma uno che lavora non lo ammazzo. Non sono un traditore..." Solo parecchio tempo dopo ho saputo che il gesto di Honório non si chiamava generosità. Aveva un nome più bello: Coscienza di classe. -Jorge Amado
Minn, I love you the way you're today, nonetheless before I wanted fate to fare you better Fate is faring me best with you by my side I'm not perfect So do I I'm still adjusting with the new me W'll get through it together We've never had anything to do with each other before We'll start from step one We need time to work things out We have forever -Hlovate
Mira a la vida de frente y siempre con una sonrisa, verás que todo sale mejor así Elena Portillo
Miracles aren't always a grand happening like the kind I learned about in Sunday school. Sometimes they're as small as giving someone a break. -Brian Spangler
Miracles happen, but not as often as we would like. And never when we expect. -Tamara Grantham
Mistakes from the past can never be repaired. Do your best in the present, to be a good person in the future. -Sylvia L'Namira
Mistakes made me matchless. -Amit Kalantri
Money - it can buy you a moment of glee but not a lifetime of happiness. -Carew Papritz
Money is a tool. Used properly it makes something beautiful- used wrong, it makes a mess! -Bradley Vinson
Money is very powerful inspiration. -Amit Kalantri
More than once, the broken moon would cast through the window a silver light and remind me of independent events yielding to their own momentum and interacting under natural laws while my mind would impose happiness, grief, beauty, ruin, justice and chaos. -Leonard Seet
Most content People don't have the best of everything. They just make the best of everything they've got. -Belle Aurora
Most of all, I'll remind them each morning that we make a choice to bring positivity or negativity into the world, and that within every single person where lies an extraordinary story waiting to unfold. -Adam Braun
Most of the people are nice to live with, but not to do business with! -Amit Kalantri
Most of the people don't see a big success in life, because small successes ignites ego issues in them. -Amit Kalantri
Most of the people will try to prove your right ideas as wrong, so share your ideas carefully or not at all. -Amit Kalantri
Most of the views are visible to everyone but only those who had passion can see it beyond. -Namie Richards
most times the best things people deserve from us is our silence.Speak through silence and it will be more powerful than harsh words -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Most times, the best thing people deserve from us is our silence.speak through silence and it will be more powerful than harsh words -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Most women go through life looking for love, and looking for someone to treat them like a queen. For some women finding real love seems to be something that will never happen. I believe that finding love is not as hard as people make it seem. The reason that some women can't find real love is because they look for more than just real love. A lot of women know what they need in a relationship, and thats for a man to  love that woman with all of his heart, and to treat her real good. Most women have guys in their life or guys that try to get with them that could really love them and treat them real good. Those are usually the guys that get forced into that friend zone or rejected upfront. See those guys could give them what they need, but not what they want. “Wants”  can be anything from a woman wanting a man to have certain materialistic things, or she could want him to look a certain way, those are a few examples of the things that some of them want, but they vary depending on the female. What some females don't understand is that none of the things that they want has anything with love or how that person will treat you. You could find a man that looks perfect, has a house and car, he can be a college graduate with a good job, and you could still end up being with a person that doesn't truly love you, and will treat you like shit. What I am trying to say is that the person who could treat you good and really love you could already be in your life, but you could have been blinded by the things you want in a man so you overlooked the person that you were really looking for. And by the way there are men that do the same thing; I just wanted to be clear on that. -Taïsen Deshimaru
Mother Nature is our teacher—reconnecting us with Spirit, waking us up and liberating our hearts. When we can transcend our fear of the creatures of the forest, then we become one with all that is; we enter a unity of existence with our relatives—the animals, the plants and the land that sustains us. -Sylvia Dolson
Motivation doesn't last, neither does shower. That why we need it everyday -Zig Ziglar
Mr. Heathcliff and his man climbed the cellar stairs with vexatious phlegm. -Emily Brontë
Muchos no hacen nada con su vida porque se siente muy viejos para comenzar. Otros no hacen nada porque sienten que aún están muy jóvenes. Pero la verdad, no existe una edad correcta o predeterminada para el éxito; sólo personas que finalmente se deciden a triunfar. -Mauricio Chaves Mesén
Muhabbat apni marzi se khulay pinjray main totay ki tarha bethnay ki salaahiyat hai. Muhabbat is ghulami ka toq hai jo insaan khud apnay ekhtyar se galay main dalta hai -Bano Qudsiyah
Music is the language of memory -Jodi Picoult
Music is the universal language, because it is the language of the universe. -Charles F. Glassman
My 'passion' is my priority. -Amit Kalantri
My action is my prayer. -Amit Kalantri
My artificial creations will be better than nature's natural creations. -Amit Kalantri
My belief is when God created you, he put inside you all the tools you needed to have a full and purposeful life. Sometimes we forget how many fantastic gifts lay inside and it takes very trying and tough situations to have them present themselves. When they do present themselves, it is almost as if long lost friends that we longed to see have come home. - The Hidden Path -Inshan Meahjohn
My creed is this: To make sure that every single ounce of true kindness given to me, will never be forgotten, and not only remain unforgotten, but that those acts of true kindness will multiply and bear fruit just because they were planted in me. To make people’s acts of true kindness towards me multiply like investments. That’s my creed. So that a person who has bestowed a goodness upon me, will never be able to regret that act and will in fact say to herself or himself “I am so glad that I did that for her, it’s one of the best things I’ve ever done. A good investment.” And I know for sure that the people who have shown me any amount of true kindness, can say for certain, that it's one of the best things they’ve done in life, because I make sure that they can say that about me. Ask anyone who’s been kind to me, and they will tell you. Because this is my creed in life. There is no greater evil, in my opinion, than the evil that infests a person who takes for granted any amount of true kindness given to her/him. To forget a kindness done unto you, is to be just like a donkey. Donkeys might even be better. And so this is the creed that I live by. -C. JoyBell C.
My expeirences have taught me that a man is never quite so near success as when that which he calls failure has overtaken him. -- Napolean Hill
My father used to say that life is what you make it. Today is the first day of the rest of your life. You can’t change the past, but the future isn’t set in stone. You can effect a change there. Move forward not with hatred or love. Move forward with purpose. (Simone) -Sherrilyn Kenyon
My friends wanted their names in the list of employees of some company, well I wanted my name in the list of the heroes of the world. -Amit Kalantri
My friends, don't idolize hardship. What you idolize is what your heart will look for and what your heart looks for is what you will have. And don't capitalize on misfortune, because you will always seek out to have capital! Throw away that pride! Don't put sorrow on a pedestal! If you ask me if I would rather have had my sorrows or not, I will tell you that no, I would rather have not had any of them! In the blink of an eye, I would rid myself of them! I have no pride. I don't rely on hardships and sorrows to mold me into someone. I don't allow myself to be dictated. When hardship and sorrow come knocking, saying "We are responsible for who you are today, let us in!" I'm going to say, in a split second, "No you're not! Go away, I don't owe you anything! -C. JoyBell C.
My friends, love is better than anger. Hope is better than fear. Optimism is better than despair. So let us be loving, hopeful and optimistic. And we'll change the world. -Jack Layton
My heart is not available for hurt. -Amit Kalantri
My hope is that after you read Imprinted Wisdom, you will be able to see your blessings, to count more of them that you already have. Realize your thoughts touch holy ground. Action with compassion for others will heal all your sorrow. And prayer will lift your veil of tears. Give more of everything than you take. Know that the true spirit of God lies within your heart. -Catherine Nagle
My ideas will not be discussed, they will be executed. -Amit Kalantri
My intellect tells me "read between the lines.. No need to humor something that is what it is and is not what it was. -Phil Thersby
My left foot is the wisdom from yesterday, my right foot is the vision of tomorrow and my mind is focused on the work of today and this is how I stand a winner. -Amit Kalantri
My life came to a standstill. I could breathe, eat, drink and sleep, and I could not help doing these things; but there was no life, for there were no wishes the fulfilment of which I could consider reasonable. If I desired anything, I knew in advance that whether I satisfied my desire or not, nothing would come of it. Had a fairy come and offered to fulfil my desires I should not have known what to ask. If in moments of intoxication I felt something which, though not a wish, was a habit left by former wishes, in sober moments I knew this to be a delusion and that there was really nothing to wish for. I could not even wish to know the truth, for I guess of what it consisted. The truth was that life is meaningless. -Leo Tolstoy
My Life is My Message -Mahatma Gandhi
My love is something valuable to me which I ought not to throw away without reflection. -Sigmund Freud
My Mama always said, 'Life is like a box of chocolates. You never know what you might get. -Forrest Gump
My men are my money. -Amit Kalantri
My own life is a fairy tale story—one that has already been written by the hands of God. -Tessa Emily Hall
My past conduct was so transparent and so honest that when my enemies spread rumours about me nobody believed them. -Amit Kalantri
My plans for this day are simple: Step one accomplished, I woke up. Now take a moment to be thankful for my gift. The gift of another chance. I have been blessed to have another day with my loved ones and the people I care about. Next step, Choose to be Happy. Remembering that it is a choice. If this were to be my last day, I would not want to live it with hate, anger or discontent in my heart. Last step, Attack Life! Remind myself to never take the gift of another day for granted, because unfortunately this morning there are many that will not complete step one. -Joe Bailey
My purpose is: What Lord? Where Lord? When Lord? Yes Lord! -Christine Brooks-Martin
My religion consists of laughing at myself. My motto is this: As long as there is a me, there is a reason to laugh out loud! -C. JoyBell C.
My son, you are just an infant now, but on that day when the world disrobes of its alluring cloak, it is then that I pray this letter is in your hands. Listen closely, my dear child, for I am more than that old man in the dusty portrait beside your bed. I was once a little boy in my mother’s arms and a babbling toddler on my father's lap. I played till the sun would set and climbed trees with ease and skill. Then I grew into a fine young man with shoulders broad and strong. My bones were firm and my limbs were straight; my hair was blacker than a raven's beak. I had a spring in my step and a lion's roar. I travelled the world, found love and married. Then off to war I bled in battle and danced with death. But today, vigor and grace have forsaken me and left me crippled. Listen closely, then, as I have lived not only all the years you have existed, but another forty more of my own. My son, We take this world for a permanent place; we assume our gains and triumphs will always be; that all that is dear to us will last forever. But my child, time is a patient hunter and a treacherous thief: it robs us of our loved ones and snatches up our glory. It crumbles mountains and turns stone to sand. So who are we to impede its path? No, everything and everyone we love will vanish, one day. So take time to appreciate the wee hours and seconds you have in this world. Your life is nothing but a sum of days so why take any day for granted? Don't despise evil people, they are here for a reason, too, for just as the gift salt offers to food, so do the worst of men allow us to savor the sweet, hidden flavor of true friendship. Dear boy, treat your elders with respect and shower them with gratitude; they are the keepers of hidden treasures and bridges to our past. Give meaning to your every goodbye and hold on to that parting embrace just a moment longer--you never know if it will be your last. Beware the temptation of riches and fame for both will abandon you faster than our own shadow deserts us at the approach of the setting sun. Cultivate seeds of knowledge in your soul and reap the harvest of good character. Above all, know why you have been placed on this floating blue sphere, swimming through space, for there is nothing more worthy of regret than a life lived void of this knowing. My son, dark days are upon you. This world will not leave you with tears unshed. It will squeeze you in its talons and lift you high, then drop you to plummet and shatter to bits . But when you lay there in pieces scattered and broken, gather yourself together and be whole once more. That is the secret of those who know. So let not my graying hairs and wrinkled skin deceive you that I do not understand this modern world. My life was filled with a thousand sacrifices that only I will ever know and a hundred gulps of poison I drank to be the father I wanted you to have. But, alas, such is the nature of this life that we will never truly know the struggles of our parents--not until that time arrives when a little hand--resembling our own--gently clutches our finger from its crib. My dear child, I fear that day when you will call hopelessly upon my lifeless corpse and no response shall come from me. I will be of no use to you then but I hope these words I leave behind will echo in your ears that day when I am no more. This life is but a blink in the eye of time, so cherish each moment dearly, my son. -Shakieb Orgunwall
My spirit is healthy, yes. But I tell you, my flesh is healthy too. I am enlightened and free, but I am also lustful and carnal. -C. JoyBell C.
My story was not the story of a girl's broken dreams: it was the story of a girl who couldn't be broken. -Heather Schuck
My study of prophecy convinces me that God intends knowledge of future events to help us "occupy" with a sense of urgency until the Lord returns. -David Jeremiah
My words are not the inspiration, I am the inspiration. -Amit Kalantri
Múmias não eram mais assustadoras do que qualquer obra de arte naquele museu. Eram artefactos, coisas mortas, extintas há muito tempo, sem alma e sem sentimentos. Os vivos eram mais aterrorizadores. -Sara Farinha
N-aş fi iubit-o niciodată pe D. dacă-ar fi fost numai (foarte) frumoasă sau dacă singurele ei mijloace de seducţie ar fi fost palatul în care mi se părea că locuieşte.N-aş fi iubit-o nici doar pentru că o dată, pe când o conduceam acasă, ca de obicei, într-un decembrie înzăpezit, s-a oprit cu mine într-o piaţetă triunghiulară, luminată doar de un bec chior, şi-a strecurat mânuţele ude în buzunarele paltonului meu şi m-a privit în ochi, în întuneric, fără să-mi spună nimic, pe când în lumina becului ningea cu o furie nemaipomenită. Pentru asta o iubesc abia acum. Adevărul este că D. m-a sedus (prin forţă şi persuasiune, mai mult aşa cum un bărbat seduce o femeie) prin puterea ei specială de a visa. -Mircea Cărtărescu
Nature has created countless number of wonders, we got a long way to go as man have created only seven wonders. -Amit Kalantri
Nay, this village isn't yer sanctuary from the cruel world. It's God Almighty. He's the only one who can protect ye. -Jennifer Hudson Taylor
Negotiation is permissible for mediocrity not for excellence. -Amit Kalantri
Nemoj da se sažaljevaš. To rade samo kreteni. -Haruki Murakami
Nervousness kill us... because we think we have only one opportunity that is in the Present and we don't think about the future! We loose our balance. -Vikram Roy
Never allow others to create your world because if you do, they will always make it too small. -Christopher Robinson
Never argue with what is. -Tyler Perry
Never be afraid to offer a smile; sure the risk is that a few foolish people may misinterpret your kindness as weakness, but the sweet reward is that as you make new friends and encourage others, the foolish have ignored the fact that you have already shown them your teeth. -Johnnie Dent Jr.
Never be afraid to offer a smile; sure the risk is that a few foolish people may misinterpret your kindness as weakness, but the sweet reward is that as you make new friends and encourage others, the foolish will learn the error of their ways because you did at least show them your teeth. -Johnnie Dent Jr.
Never believe a friend who offered you his friendship just because he was getting bored. -Amit Kalantri
Never build your country, until you build and grow your people -Mohamed Osman Abbasheikh
Never do a single thing in the anticipation to prove something to someone who has hurt you. If someone has hurt or offended you (whoever that person may be), never perform anything or strive for anything in your life with the mind of proving something to that someone/ to those people. May nothing that you do be done with any thought of them in mind. There is nothing that needs to be proven. -C. JoyBell C.
Never fear shadows. They simply mean there's a light shining somewhere nearby. Ruth E. Renkel
Never forget to look back to see what your accomplishment. -coltgasp
Never give up, GOD is not done with you yet. -Evans Biya
Never let your head hang down. Never give up and sit down and grieve. Find another way. And don’t pray when it rains if you don’t pray when the sun shines. -Leroy Satchel Paige
Never let your past mistakes cause you to doubt your future -Jessica Houston
Never look for perfection, You will Never get it,  but consistent trying will always bring you closer. -Nitish Sharma
Never lose faith in the end of your story. -Steve Gutzler
Never lose hope, and if you can, find the courage to love again. -Danielle Steel
Never miss an opportunity to be truly and deeply humiliated!  The shame will carve you down to an individual of exquisite layering, and in the process, etch within you the arcs of exceptional narrative. -Ashim Shanker
Never mistake movement for action... a rocking horse moves; a race horse charges towards a goal. -Johnnie Dent Jr.
Never mourn the loss of innocence, because it always brings the much greater gain of wisdom. -Erica Goros
Never put off for tomorrow what is meant for today...tomorrow may never come. -C.J. Candel
Never regret the things you do; only the things you don’t. -Unknown
Never step on caterpillars, as one day they'll become butterflies, and you'll never know when you'll need a ride on their wings of fortune. -R.P. Falconer
Never step on caterpillars, as one day, they'll become butterflies and you'll never know when you'll need a ride on their wings of fortune. -R.P. Falconer
Never stop acquiring the commonsense, it is as good as the knowledge. -Amit Kalantri
Never stop hoping, wishing, and praying; your dreams are merely a heartbeat away. And while you're at it, invest in them too! -Apryl L Yates
Never waste any amount of time doing anything important when there is a sunset outside that you should be sitting under! -C. JoyBell C.
Never wish to be somebody else. -Tyler Perry
Never worry a bit in Life. Always be full of merriment. -sharda sriram
Never worry about the Past, it brings Tears.Don't think too much about the Future, it brings Fears. Live in the Present Moment with a smile it brings Cheers !! - RVM -Rvm
Never, never, never give up. -Winston Churchill
New beginnings always had something special—starting at the bottom and making it to the top produced something magical. When you reach your destination, your goal, that’s when it really hits home. Maybe that’s why I felt the way I did. I knew I was just a kid, but eventually I’d become something much more. Eventually I’d be at the top. Someday. -Alex Rogers
New media is the modern day gold rush. -Amy Leigh Mercree
Ninety percent of everything you believe you can achieve in life you will. -Gregory C Dugger
No challenges like producing effective people -Mohamed Osman Abbasheikh
No difference, good or bad. Thoughts like birds in mind. Some fly in. Some fly out. Some stay at water hole to drink. Beware of birds that linger. -Natalie Wright
No hay caminos para la paz; la paz es el camino. -Mahatma Gandhi
No importa cuántos autos o casas tengas, o si tu cuenta de banco está llena de billetes… ¡Lo que importa es lo que sienta tu alma cada vez que te despiertas, cada momento que vives, cada experiencia que pasas! -Mauricio Chaves Mesén
No kind of social system can make you more happier and secure than your own money. -Amit Kalantri
No man ever steps in the same river twice, for it's not the same river and he's not the same man. Imaam Al Ghazali
No man is ordinary, only their performances are ordinary. -Amit Kalantri
No man will make a great leader  who wants to do it all himself or to get all the credit for doing it -Andrew Carnegie
No matter how you twist and turn, your ass is always in the back. -Andrew Sturm
No matter what happens, or how bad it seems today, life does go on, and it will be better tomorrow. -Maya Angelou
No matter what it looks like or seems like. There is hope at the end of the tunnel. Think smart and plan for your future. Your words are power. Your thoughts are dynamite and your life can make a major difference for someone else. You are above and not beneath. You are the head and not the tail. See hope in everything that you do because you are filled with major purpose. Giving up is not an option and living life to the fullest is a major choice. Choose to be happy! Live for tomorrow. -Alisha Broughton
No Matter what path in Life you take... It's up to you to Finish the Journey -Frederick E. Owen Jr.
No matter what, we have to keep moving forward, even if we have to crawl. -Kellie Elmore
No matter where we live on the planet or how difficult our situation seems to be, we have the ability to overcome and transcend our circumstances. -Louise L. Hay
No matter who you are or what you've been through realize in this life there is nothing that you cannot do" Imagine This Imagine That -Yanatha Desouvre
No one can know you better than two peoples in the world. 1- Yourself 2- Your Mirror -Abhishek Bhatt
No one can make you feel inferior unless you allow them to. -Sherman Kennon
No one ever said your life would be easy. The nature of being human makes life for all of us a challenge. The most important thing to consider here is this. Your life is only as challenging as you think it is. Think of challenge as a teacher and yourself the student. It's up to you to figure out what the lesson is to be learned. To learn that lesson and build the strength and courage to face other challenges…. -James A. Murphy
No one in this room is identical. We all have something unique to offer. It is the responsibility of each of us to realize what that is – to fulfill our destiny. Imagine the awesomeness – the potential we would have if we worked together for a change. -Aaron B. Powell
No one in this world can change your habits, but only you can..... so, MOst powerfull person of this world is you..!..........keep that in your mind! -M Fazan Hafeez
No one is an outside observer of nature, We're defined by our environment and our interaction with that environment -- by our ecology. And that ecology is necessarily relative, historical and empirical. -Beau Lotto
No one is perfect; that’s all the reason to work towards perfection. -Vinita Kinra
No one loses anyone, because no one owns anyone. That is the true experience of freedom: having the most important thing in the world without owning it -Paulo Coelho
No one of real intelligence will accept anything just because some authority declares it be so. Don't accept the truth of anything you have not confirmed for yourself. -Paul Hoffmann
No one preached to me... No one had to... I wouldn't have listened anyway. I became a believer from a direct encounter with an answered prayer. I came face to face with God and all his power in a tiny bathroom in Washington. -Jacci Mendelsohn
No person can ever be called friendless for he has the company of books. -I.R. Shankar
No se debe oponer resistencia a la corriente: hay que ir hacia arriba cuando hay que ir hacia arriba, y hacia abajo cuando hay que ir hacia abajo. Cuando debas ir hacia arriba, busca la torre más alta y sube hasta la cúspide. Cuando debas ir hacia abajo, busca el pozo más profundo y desciende hasta el fondo. Cuando no haya corriente, quédate inmóvil. Si te opones a la corriente todo se seca, el mundo se ve envuelto por las tinieblas. "Yo soy yo, él es yo, atardecer de otoño" Cuando renuncias a mi, yo existo. -Haruki Murakami
No society can prosper if it aims at making things easier-instead it should aim at making people stronger!! -Ashoka Prasad
No writing is wasted. Did you know that sourdough from San Francisco is leavened partly by a bacteria called lactobacillus sanfrancisensis? It is native to the soil there, and does not do well elsewhere. But any kitchen can become an ecosystem. If you bake a lot, your kitchen will become a happy home to wild yeasts, and all your bread will taste better. Even a failed loaf is not wasted. Likewise, cheese makers wash the dairy floor with whey. Tomato gardeners compost with rotten tomatoes. No writing is wasted: the words you can't put in your book can wash the floor, live in the soil, lurk around in the air. They will make the next words better. -Erin Bow
No, this is not the beginning of a new chapter in my life; this is the beginning of a new book! That first book is already closed, ended, and tossed into the seas; this new book is newly opened, has just begun! Look, it is the first page! And it is a beautiful one! -C. JoyBell C.
No. In my eyes, she was most beautiful because at a time when she had every right to be terrified, she managed to show comfort to another person who needed it. -Bella Forrest
Noboby is succeeded by going astray from Allah -Salman Farooqi
Nobody can go back and start a new beginning, but anyone can start today and make a new ending." i love it so much -Maria Robinson
Non è mai prudente pensare che per noi sia già finita. Quando crediamo di aver scritto la parola fine sulla nostra storia, ecco che il destino usa lo stratagemma di voltare pagina e ci svela che c'è un capitolo ancora. -L.M. Montgomery
none of sin makes you better, sin always makes you get worse -Tolop Marbun
Not all days are good. One day might be a total fucked up and one day could be awesome. It is up to you which day would matter. -Jezi
Not caring what people think about you is so much easier said than done and I think that it’s easy to be in school and kind of compare yourself to everybody else, you might think that you’re weird because some people don’t like you or because you just dont feel like you belong in your own skin in your school and I think that it’s important to realize that there’s absolutely nothing wrong with you you’re worth so much. As time progresses you’ll see that and you have to learn to love yourself and accept yourself because its your skin -Camila Cabello
Not doing harder than doing. -Natalie Wright
Not obedience or feelings or respect, there is only one thing which people take seriously at all time and its "money". -Amit Kalantri
Not only is there often a right and wrong, but what goes around does come around, Karma exists, chickens do come home to roost, and as my mother, Phyllis, liked to say, “There is always a day of reckoning.” The good among the great understand that every choice we make adds to the strength or weakness of our spirits—ourselves, or to use an old fashioned word for the same idea, our souls. That is every human’s life work: to construct an identity bit by bit, to walk a path step by step, to live a life that is worthy of something higher, lighter, more fulfilling, and maybe even everlasting. -Donald Van de Mark
Not trying is the greatest failure, it robs you of the life you're meant to live -Rodger Halston
Nothing Comes Home...You Have To Get OUT &amp; Get IT~! -Sujit Lalwani
Nothing consoles and comforts like certainty does. -Amit Kalantri
Nothing good ever comes without a price. -Larry McMurtry
Nothing in the world can take the place of persistence. Persistence and determination alone are omnipotent. -Calvin Coolidge
Nothing is impossible for God. -Tyler Perry
Nothing is impossible, the word itself says, “I'm possible!” –Audrey Hepburn
Nothing is more difficult than removing a negative attitude. -Shailesh Bhokare
Nothing lasts forever so live it up! fear it down! so weak it off, avoid the drama take the chances and never have regrets, because at the one point everything u did was exactly what you wanted. -hinz mcbride
Nothing lasts forever. But the thing is, you can reuse some. Use your mind. - Leo's Mother, The Lost Hero -Rick Riordan
Nothing you become will disappoint me; I have no preconception that I'd like to see you be or do. I have no desire to forsee you, only to discover you. You can't disappoint me -Mary Haskell
Now let's talk about dreams. Yes. Dreams. I believe that dreams are one of the best thing in the world. It's so powerful. Because of people dreaming; things are being done and things are being made. Things happen. Dreams are being manifested to beautiful things. Dreams can make people happy, but sad as well (if they don't happen). Well let me tell you, I believe dreams come true because one person decided it so. -Happy Positivity
Nurture to know, Nurture to grow. Nipan
Não acredites na multidão Vazia e falsa, esquece as dúvidas... -Fiodor Dostoievsky
Não tenha medo de viver o momento.Aceite que você não pode saber ou ter tudo, então não seja excessivamente preocupado com o qye os outros vão pensar. Faça umas bobeiras de vez em quando. Mandeb mensagens para pessoas que talvez nunca responderão para você.Cante em público .Viaje com os amigos para lugares desconhecidos. As pessoas mais carismáticas que eu conheço não têm medo de serem espontâneas. Pelo contrário, elas têm medo de perder uma boa oportunidade. -Bel Pesce
Obey God and leave all the consequences to Him. -Charles F. Stanley
Obsession and desperation for your goal, gets you the goal. -Amit Kalantri
Of all the evil man can do, the greatest is doing nothing. -Jury Nel
Of course truth is stranger than fiction. Fiction has to make sense. -Mark Twain
Often people attempt to live their lives backwards they try to have more things, or more money, in order to do more of what they want so that they will be happier. The way it actually works is the reverse. You must first be who you really are, then, do what you need to do, in order to have what you want. sin09
Often times it isn't the quality of your candidates, it's the quality of your interview. -Mark W. Boyer
Oh, monsters are scared', said Lettie. 'And as for grown-ups...' She stopped talking, rubbed her freckled nose with a finger. Then, 'I'm going to tell you something important. Grown-ups don't look like grown-ups on the inside either. Outside, they're big and thoughtless and they always know what they're doing. Inside, they look just like they always have. Like they did when they were your age. The truth is, there aren't any grown-ups. Not one, in the whole wide world.' ... We sat there, side by side, on the old wooden bench, not saying anything. I thought about adults. I wondered if that was true: if they were all really children wrapped in adult bodies, like children books hidden in the middle of dull, long books. The kind with no pictures or conversations. -Neil Gaiman
Old ones should respect the energy of youths and youths should respect the experience of old ones. -Amit Kalantri
once i asked myself  ," what is time? " , in a second or two , i find the answer - " 't' for tension , 'i' for imaginative character of time , 'm' as it is mathematically  expressed , 'e' as it has elegance -suman kundu
Once you discover that you can, you must. -Al Jarreau
Once you expect great things from yourself, anything is possible. -Mark W. Boyer
Once You keep Aside the Emotional side Of yours, Is when You stop using the phrase “This was a BAD PHASE” of life.. -Sujit Lalwani
One absolutely sure way to be fearless is to speak the truth at all time about everything. -Amit Kalantri
one can even kill a cow in self defence.... -vineet asopa
One can overcome fear by acknowledging it and then choosing not to heed it." - L. R. W. Lee, Andy Smithson: Blast of the Dragon's Fury -L.R.W. Lee
One candle is like a smile. One little light can start a whole fire. Smile at someone today. -Gail Thackray
One courageous act can make you a hero but frequent courageous acts will keep you a hero. -Amit Kalantri
One day you may make wake up and think your all alone. One day you may feel this house is not my home. One day you may find that things around you have change. But one thing for sure God still knows your first and last name. -E.R. Turner
One day, in retrospect, the years of struggle will strike you as the most beautiful. -Sigmund Freud
One discovers that destiny can be diverted, that one does not have to remain in bondage to the first wax imprint made on childhood sensibilities. Once the deforming mirror has been smashed, there is a possibility of wholeness. There is a possibility of joy. -Anaïs Nin
One evening an old Cherokee told his grandson about a battle that goes on inside people.  He said, "My son, the battle was between 2 "wolves" inside us all. One was Evil. It was anger, envy, jealousy, sorrow, regret, greed, arrogance, self-pity, guilt, resentment, inferiority, lies, false pride, superiority, and ego. The other was Good. It was joy, peace, love, hope, serenity, humility, kindness, benevolence, empathy, generosity, truth, compassion, and faith." The grandson thought about it for a minute and then asked his grandfather: "Which wolf wins?" The old Cherokee simply replied, "The one you feed. Cherokee Indian
One is to a human and other is to adopt humanity -Qasim Raza Qadri
One of the biggest favors that you can do for yourself is to accept your loved ones for who they are, and not be constantly disappointed because they are not who you think they should be. -Jennifer O'Neill
One of the greatest gift you can give another human being whi is going through adversity is HOPE. -Shaka Senghor
One of the most beneficial and valuable gifts we can give to ourselves in this life: is allowing ourselves to be surprised! It is okay if life surprises you. Its a good thing! -C. JoyBell C.
One of the most important things a man must bear in mind is this very thing - that he owes his fellow a transforming encounter. -Ogwo David Emenike
one of the most painful things in life is to be considered as meaningless in an environment where you think you are truly meaningful -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
One of the most scariest thing in life is when you come to the realization that the only thing that can save you is...yourself -Demi Lovato
One of the most sincere forms of respect is actually listening to what another has to say. -Bryant McGill
One of the smartest things one can do in life sometimes…is play stupid. Be encouraged -Kerry E. Wagner
one spark of genius,suddenly the entire world is filled with anticipation -Elliot Kesebonye
One thing I will surely miss is that I couldn't read all the good books in this lifetime. -Amit Kalantri
One thing that creates difference between pilgrims of life as they journey along the various paths of life is their head. It makes some fall, others rest and some pursue to the farther. The reason for the difference is not the size, shape, hair color or the style of their head but what is within their head, what fills their mind, what enters their ears; what their eyes look and see, what their ears hear and listen to;  make some champions of life and others wanders of life. -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
One thing that shapes our behavior knowingly or unknowingly is fear -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
One way to be in good attitude is with sincere, heart felt gratitude. -Ency Bearis
One who has reached a goal no longer travels the road" (Pauline Christianity, p. 111) -John Ziesler
One who is seeking the truth sooner or later finds a woman. -Sergey Vedenyo
One who knows nothing understands nothing -Kingdom hearts
Only by giving are you able to receive more than you already have. -Jim Rohn
Only grabbing the necessary tools and getting to work, you'll build the path you'll use to get where you wanna go. -Pamela Nicole
Only Live Like You (OLLY) -Jeroen Saey
Only something extremely dire and disabling will ever stop a real writer from writing. Retirement is never an option. -Warren Adler
only the defeated know LOVE. because it is in the realm of love that we fight our first battles - and generally lose ........ -Paulo Coelho
Only the good die young, the bad petite-mort -Josh Stern
Only the mediocre die always at their best. Real leaders are always improving- and raising their bar on how superbly they can perform and how quickly they can move -Jean Giraudox
Only those who ignore d sea waves&amp;tides to fish in deep waters can have abundance of fishes to feed their generation. -Olojo Daniel Olatunji
Only when we are truly lost are we free to choose our own path. -Hugo Embleton-Black
Only you can determine your own worth. No one else but you, but they can certainly help when you need it. We are a family not by blood but by bond and family must stand together -James O. Terzian
Only you can take inner freedom away from yourself, or give it to yourself. Nobody else can. -Michael A. Singer
Only your limited vision stops you seeing success...open your mind and you open your vision. -Stephen Richards
Open your mind before your mouth -Aristophanes
Opportunities are born by learning! -Jonathan Anthony Burkett
Opportunities?  They are all around us ... There is power lying latent everywhere waiting for the observant eye to discover it. -Orison Swett Marden
Opportunity is another word for moving on. And it is a word choice, which is often the wiser. If the well gets poisoned, move to a meadow of merriment, where your hearts will echo the more. -Tom Althouse
Opportunity may knock only once but temptation leans on the door bell -Oprah Winfrey
Orang akan melupakan kebaikan kita,namun tetaplah berbuat baik. Berbuat baik bukan karena pujian orang lain. Berhenti berbuat baik bukan karena makian orang lain. -Pepatah Yunani
Orang menyebutnya ILHAM. Tapi bisa saja itu datang dari suatu proses, setelah kita membiarkan diri mengalami yang lain -Ayu Utami
Orang-orang itu telah melupakan bahwa belajar tidaklah melulu untuk mengejar dan membuktikan sesuatu, namun belajar itu sendiri, adalah perayaan dan penghargaan pada diri sendiri. (hlm. 197) -Andrea Hirata
Ordinary men earns responsibility towards their family, extraordinary men earns duty towards their nation. -Amit Kalantri
Otherwise,is the only reason why one is unhappy and unsuccessful -Gopichand Lagadapati
Our ancestors have invented, we can at least innovate. -Amit Kalantri
Our attitude toward life determines life's attitude towards us. -Earl Nightingale
Our bodies have five senses: touch, smell, taste, sight, hearing. But not to be overlooked are the senses of our souls: intuition, peace, foresight, trust, empathy. The differences between people lie in their use of these senses; most people don't know anything about the inner senses while a few people rely on them just as they rely on their physical senses, and in fact probably even more. -C. JoyBell C.
Our choice, always, is to love and understand. -Ping Fu
Our deepest fear is not that we are inadequate. Our deepest fear is that we are powerful beyond measure. It is our Light, not our Darkness, that most frightens us. -Marianne Williamson
Our deepest fear is not that we are inadequate. Our deepest fear is that we are powerful beyond measure…We ask ourselves, who am I to be brilliant, gorgeous, talented, and fabulous? Actually, who are you not to be? You are a child of God. Your playing small doesn’t serve the world. There’s nothing enlightened about shrinking so that other people won’t feel insecure around you. We are all meant to shine, as children do. We are born to make manifest the glory of God that is within us. It’s not just in some of us, it’s in everyone. -Marianne Williamson
Our deepest fear is that we are powerful beyond measure. It is our light, not our darkness, that most frightens us. -Marianne Williamson
Our fingerprints don't fade from the lives we've touched. -Will Fetters
Our key to greatness lies not in our ability to project ourselves to others as if we are putting ourselves onto a projector and creating an image of ourselves on a projector screen. Rather, our key to greatness lies in who we are which we can give to other people in a way that when they walk away from us, they are able to say in their hearts that they have taken away something with them quite extraordinary. -C. JoyBell C.
Our lives begin to end the day we become silent about things that matter. –Martin Luther King Jr.
Our personal stories of perseverance contain immense wisdom that can assist others in finding their way to peace and illumination during difficult times. -Molly Friedenfeld
Our pride keeps us from breaking our pride. Our pride tells us we don't have pride issues. -Heather Bixler
Our right brain hemisphere (transcendent mind) supports us in acknowledging our infinite potential when we understand our true nature and origins, and the importance of our free will. The latter gives us the ability to choose to live like an interdependent whole, within which, we are as musical notes inside a great symphony or the various shades of color in a painting, where our role is as important as that of every component but not better than any other -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
Our sincere and innermost anxiety is not that we are insufficient. Our sincere and innermost fear is that we are prevailing and dominate. Our proficiency, not our incompetence is the misapprehension that most startles and worries us. It’s when we contemplate in retrospect that we demand of ourselves why am I extraordinary, striking, talented, and remarkable? Essentially, Why can’t you? A child of God blessed from the crown of you head to the soul of your feet. There is nonentity progressive about shrinking so individuals won't feel apprehensive around you. Every individual is predestined to shine. Humans were conceived to manifest the exaltation, magnificence, splendour, beauty or the glory of God imbedded in us . this gift is not some individual but in everyone -Archibald Gumiro
Our state of mind, our state of being, and our outlook on life is contagious. -The Letters Of Gratitude
Our understanding of the universe is like a story without a beginning or end where the reader is creating the plot as he is reading the story -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
Our understanding of the universe is like a tale without beginning or end, where the reader creates the script as he reads along. It’s like the act of creation was more like an act of facilitation, where Love (divinity) is the facilitator and mankind’s mind, with its free will, is the co-creator. -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
Our universe was created to perpetuate creation, it was not created to perpetuate consumption. -Jennifer Sodini
Over intellect will make you a genius, over emotions will make you a lunatic. -Amit Kalantri
Over thinking ruins you n ruins your situations twists things around you n make u much worry than just makes everything much worsts than actually it is.... -Jittu Nanda
P is for Persistence! Nothing in the world can take the place of persistence. Wishing will not; Talent will not; Genius will not; Education will not; Persistence is like a Genie that creates a magical force in your life. -Lucas Remmerswaal
Pages entertain me more than pictures do. -Amit Kalantri
Pain is a pesky part of being human, I've learned it feels like a stab wound to the heart, something I wish we could all do without, in our lives here. Pain is a sudden hurt that can't be escaped. But then I have also learned that because of pain, I can feel the beauty, tenderness, and freedom of healing. Pain feels like a fast stab wound to the heart. But then healing feels like the wind against your face when you are spreading your wings and flying through the air! We may not have wings growing out of our backs, but healing is the closest thing that will give us that wind against our faces. -C. JoyBell C.
Pain is like a fabri, the stronger it is, the more its worth -John Green
Paradise” is a suffering word, grossly overused and ineptly devalued in everyday hype and blurb. Yet, tired as it is, it will have to do. Nothing else conveys that sense of place that can inspire a blissful contentment. -Andrew Rayner
Passion is the gate to your purpose. -Prophet AJ Lovett
Paths are clear when you walk with your own style -cursedbuddy
Paths that lead to the crossroads of life; otherwise known as "transition." Transition is the tension present between struggle and grace. -Deborah Brodie
Patience is the glue that binds hard work and faith. -Charles F. Glassman
Patience Pays..Is true!  But the greater truth is that it takes  advance payment before it pays you in return! -Sujit Lalwani
Peace begins when expectations end. -Sri Chinmoy
Peace is not a result inside us from everything around us. Peace is not submissive nor passive. On the contrary, peace is an overwhelming force which comes from within us, disrespectful of everything around us, a firm coalition of spirit and soul standing against all the unrest that abounds. -C. JoyBell C.
Peace is possible for dead bodies, living bodies can not expect peace on the way to the victory. -Amit Kalantri
Peace is self-examination and being all right with what you see. Freedom is being able to open up to others without the worry of persecution. Happiness is seeing others for who they are and embracing the differences. -Leeann Smith
Peace is something like happiness; you cannot say "I will be happy when..." and you can't say "I will be peaceful when..." Your happiness shouldn't depend on the situation you're in nor on the circumstances that surround you. In the same breath, you cannot wait for everything around you to become peaceful in order for you to say "I am peaceful." In both happiness and peace, there is a heart of strength, determination and steadfastness; a heart that has the power to make things happen. You have to be at peace. You have to be happy. Now. -C. JoyBell C.
Peace is the number one beautiful ornament you can wear, I really believe that. They say you should always wear a smile, but I don't believe that you should "always" wear a smile, seriously, you're going to look stupid! But peace, you should always carry peace within you, its the most beautifying thing you could ever have or do. Peace makes your heart beautiful and it makes you look beautiful, too. You want to have perfect physical posture when you stand, sit, and walk, and peace is the perfect posture of the soul, really. Try perfect posture outside as well as inside. Peace creates grace and grace gives peace. -C. JoyBell C.
Peace may be hard to achieve, but is possible with small yet essential steps that are guided by courage and sufficient commitment. -Widad Akrawi
Peacefully and lovingly accepting who we are today requires honestly looking at our past. -The Letters Of Gratitude
People always, always talk about confidence, it’s supposed to be such an attractive thing. I wonder why though, why is it supposed to be such an attractive thing? When confidence hides so many other things that are so much more beautiful! When you think of being confident, you think of tucking away all those other things that you consider to be nuisances; but those nuisances make up whom you are! And those nuisances are beautiful. They are beautiful and they are you and they’re always going to be there, even when you try to cover them up! So what happens when they all come out one day? Are you going to feel like less of a person? Are the people who are supposed to love you, going to see you as less of a person? I say that it’s not about going out into the world and putting on a certain face— it’s just about going out into the world. I’ve gone out into the world! And I don’t put on that face! Or any other face, as a matter of fact! I don’t want to hide the way I play with my hair to feel more secure or the way I laugh at all the wrong times. I don’t want to hide those things because those things are a part of me. And I can still go out into the world— and all alone, too! I know so, because I’ve actually done it! So more important than confidence— is serenity and acceptance. The serenity comes from having a deep acceptance of all those little things about you that add up like the trillions of molecules and atoms you are made up of! And that’s just beautiful. Being beautiful is something rooted and strong; being confident is just a matter of putting on something that isn’t even a real part of you. Falling in love with the molecules that make up your essence is so much more attractive. And maybe that’s what confidence really means— the acceptance and belief in every single atom that you are. -C. JoyBell C.
People are already disappointed by their acquaintances, they can not handle anymore hate from stranger, so show some instantaneous kindness and forgiveness to them. -Amit Kalantri
People are crazy about food, smoking, drinking, girls but not about their dreams. -Amit Kalantri
People are creators. But I doubt that many realize this. We are not meant to go out into the world and find flawless things, we are not meant to sit down and have flawless things fall into our laps. But we are creators. We can create a beautiful thing out of what we have. The problem with idealistic people is that they see themselves as receivers instead of creators, they end up hunting for the flaw in everything in order to measure it up to their ideals. Now, when you see yourself as a creator, you can look at a chunk of marble and see the angel within it. Then you carve until you have set that angel free. -C. JoyBell C.
People Are Like Fruits They All Come In Different, Colours,Shapes And Sizes. Just Love Them All -Official Barbie Michelle
People are not interested in truths; they are interested in inventions. -Charmaine Shaw
People ask, "Are you important enough for me to love you?" But they've got it all wrong. When you love someone, you make them important. And the same thing happens to you. You don't love them because they're important; they become important because you love them. -C. JoyBell C.
People become followers of the God because of his fear, but they become a fan of a hero because of his work. -Amit Kalantri
People come to me for the solution of their problem, if my knowledge and experience is not enough to solve the problem, I go to my library read the relevant book and provide the solution. -Amit Kalantri
People crave for more respect than love, because they expect love only from few people but they want respect from everyone. -Amit Kalantri
People decide they like one another, based upon the color of their shells that they wear on the outside of them. And then they decide to leave one another, based upon the color of their souls that is who they really are underneath the shell. I think it should be the other way around. I think people should decide they like one another, based upon the color of their souls and then decide to leave one another if they run into the shells. But then it's not even that. What if they loved the soul and then broke down each others' shells when they ran into them? Then nobody would leave anybody and everybody would know what love means. -C. JoyBell C.
People do not meet by chance––they navigate their lives to certain people for certain reasons. -Ruti Yudovich
People enjoy convincing others, if others are wrong they convince them towards right, if others are already right they still want to convince them towards wrong. -Amit Kalantri
people experience hell so we may comfort others that may be going through the same thing or before they experience it. everyone learns something different from the same experience. we learn from each other and try to make the best of it. Akanesi Kauvaka
People fear nothing as much as boredom and they will do unimaginable things to make it go away. -Amit Kalantri
People have boldness to criticize but not to sensitize. -Amit Kalantri
People have seen too many common people like them, and they are bored by it. They need heroes. -Amit Kalantri
People have struggled for the benefits of others, you can struggle at least for your own benefit. -Amit Kalantri
People have this dream of being unreachable. They build a name for themselves and then finally fulfill their dream of "being more important." Which just shows they were born from down below. Because when you're born from up above, your dreams have nowhere to go but downwards! And you dream of doing things in order to meet people, to know them, to understand the smallest importances! -C. JoyBell C.
People have to forgive. We don't have to like them, we don't have to be friends with them, we don't have to send them hearts in text messages, but we have to forgive them, to overlook, to forget. Because if we don't we are tying rocks to our feet, too much for our wings to carry! -C. JoyBell C.
People in blind love throw away common sense, conscience and comedy from the life. -Amit Kalantri
People in love overvalue their heart and undervalue their mind. -Amit Kalantri
People live their lives based on what they define as "reality" and "truth", but both are vague terms, their meaning easily change from person to person and even from time to time, therefore, cannot we say that people live in illusions of their own creation? Wisdom is to see beyond our own foolishness, once that is achieved it becomes impossible not to see how the world should really be; cowards remain indifferent and forsake their wisdom by lying to themselves,  the only other path is to choose to change the world, and in doing so we become great, we become people to be remembered, and best of all, we forsake our regrets. -Masashi Kishimoto
People may like a person’s thought for its touching words, but they like him truly for his own deeds touching their heart. -Anuj Somany
People need appreciation from more persons than they need love from one person. -Amit Kalantri
People never forget two things, their first love and the money they wasted watching a bad movie. -Amit Kalantri
People often say that motivation doesn't last. Well, neither does bathing.  That's why we recommend it daily. –Zig Ziglar
People say that your dreams are the only thing that save ya Win Butler, Arcade Fire
People shouldn't just talk about you, they should tell your tales. -Amit Kalantri
People tend to spend so much time focusing on what they feel they can't do, rather examining the true potential of what they can. -Mark W Boyer
People think they are not satisfied with what they have but in true sense they are not satisfied with what they are. -Amit Kalantri
People today are dying for something to live for. -J.S.B. Morse
People wait around too long for love. I'm happy with all of my lusts! -C. JoyBell C.
People who have woken up now to some harsh reality of life may often hide their ignorance by innocently saying that it’s a new trend without realizing the fact of its existence since ancient times. -Anuj Somany
People who live in brick houses shouldn't throw wrecking balls -Josh Stern
People who lost their mother should be careful about committing crime, because probably no one else is praying to save you. -Amit Kalantri
People who profess to have no faith, do not actually have no faith. They simply do not have faith as defined by the rest of the people. Many people who do not have faith as defined by the rest— do have a faith in many other good things— honesty, dedication, inner strength, and so on and so forth. And if you ask him (or her) why do they abide by these beliefs if there be no external force to damn them if they do not abide, they will answer and say, that it is because it is who they are, it is what they believe in, and that to them any other way is abominable. He (or she) does have a faith. It is just not expressed on one of the main paths of expression that most of the population walk on. They are just different in their faith, that is all. Religion should be rightly termed "The love of the beautiful." For anyone who has a true love and devotion to what is beautiful, does have a faith. That is his faith, that is his religion. -C. JoyBell C.
People who talk too much are only digging their own grave. -Sylvia L'Namira
People who tell untruths are easily deceived because they have placed their energy in that negative vibration location and are now a match for that behavior. -Molly Friedenfeld
People will always believe what they want to believe, about you. This is due to the fact that people wish to create their own truths; anything but the truth that's real. My creed is simple: Let them! Their beliefs don't alter your truth. Moreover, your attempt at altering them won't do any good for you. -C. JoyBell C.
People with responsibility and people without responsibility are sorry for each other. -Amit Kalantri
People with too high an opinion of themselves get cut down; people with too low an opinion of themselves get pushed around.... -Lolly Daskal
People withhold their forgiveness, thinking that it makes them badass. But really, the unwillingness to forgive is merely the wishing that things were better. You wish that you had better, you wish that someone else were better so they could have treated you better... it’s you making wishes. And that’s not badass. To forgive is to be able to look at the person and say “I accept that you weren’t any better than what you were”, “I accept what you were you and couldn’t have been what I wished you to be”, “I accept that things were the way they were and weren’t any better.” The ability to forgive is intertwined with the ability to accept the reality of the way things are/ the way a person is or was. You stop wishing things and you just accept. And hope is what says to you: “One day you’ll have what’s better. -C. JoyBell C.
People won't respect you until you achieve the respectable goals. -Amit Kalantri
People wonder if it’s possible to meet a person, or to just read their name out loud for the first time— and within those moments— to know them, to remember them, even if you have never met them before! Well of course this is possible and in fact, for some of us, our lives are spent reuniting with such people. There are different types of bonds. Some we have ran with, some we have swam with, others we have won battles side-by-side! And then there is the one whom we have loved. Some of us have been here so many times before— that we spend this lifetime not wasting any moments— but we spend our moments searching for those we have bonds with. And of course, searching for the one we are bound to. Our dreams at night— they contain our memories of places we think we’ve never even been to, of people we think we’ve never even met before. Of course, yes, it is possible to read a name out loud and for the vibration of that name on your lips to open up a casket filled with things that are anything but dead! Nothing dies. -C. JoyBell C.
People wonder why you choose certain subjects to write about. The truth is: you don't really. They choose you -Sebastian Faulks
Perhaps the only way to love is to bury yourself so deeply in it that you avoid its very suffering. -Meghna Pant
Perhaps there really is a good that exists; for a century of darkness to be eschewed by a single flame; for a decade of evil done to the heart to be undone by simple and unplanned acts of kindness! There must be a goodness, after all! But we don't find it when we're looking for it; not in church, not in a cathedral, not even in our own homes! We find it when we've fallen down so hard, are downtrodden so low; and there is one true friend who picks us up; or one random person who takes us in! And we realize goodness was never in the places we thought it was! It was all along in the most humble of places: bound up in the heart of a true friend. -C. JoyBell C.
Persistance is the quality of winners. Successful people never never give up -Lynda Field
Persons tend to think and feel exclusively in one node or the other and in doing so tend to misunderstand and underestimate what the other mode is all about -Robert M. Pirsig
Pikiran mengendalikan hati manusia -Dian Dermawan
Pity without rigor would be cowardly egotism, mere sentimentality. -Matthew Pearl
Places of learning are full to brimming, but those with a real thirst for knowledge are few. Remain true to yourself and never stop learning... -Stephen Richards
Planets and humans are alike. They collide during conflicts, but shine during peace. -Vinita Kinra
Please do not break your heart over the withering of a dream you once held, that never became yours! After all, the shattered dream could have very well been a nightmare and not a dream at all, you wouldn't really know because you didn't have it yet! Let the sparks fade, let the flame dim and die, you'll never know it wasn't poison. -C. JoyBell C.
Plus on évolue dans sa vie, plus on se débarrasse des croyances qui nous limitent, et plus on a de choix. Et le choix, c'est la liberté. -Laurent Gounelle
Policy-makers continue to discover that they cannot solve today’s problems with yesterday’s mindsets -Widad Akrawi
Politeness is okay, but it gets old and boring. You want to attack life with a passion, not a politeness, you want people to think about you and remember you and say "she is so passionate" you don't want people to think about you and remember you and say "she is so polite," because, who cares about polite? -C. JoyBell C.
Positive change is mobile, if you don’t push it, it won’t move but when you push it, it will definitely move with you. -Peter A Preye
Practice patience to get the results but don't be much patient to take actions. -Amit Kalantri
Practising honestly the simplicity in life is an act of humanity so, in fact, a true spirituality which is always a service to an omnipresent, invisible power called God Almighty. -Anuj Somany
Pragmatism is good prevention for problems. -Amit Kalantri
Pray for "all men." We usually pray more for things than we do for men. Our prayers should be thrown across their pathway as they rush in their downward course to a lost eternity. -E.M.Bounds
Prayer is the mortar that holds our house together. -Mother Teresa
Prayer really can change things. -Tyler Perry
Preparation doesn't assures victory, it assures confidence. -Amit Kalantri
Pride is often used as a way to protect our hearts and to hide the truth. Pride causes us to shut down and build walls. -Heather Bixler
Pride will tell you, you don't need crutches, but humility is more powerful than pride. -Lorilyn Roberts
Professional men run the business started by the courageous men. -Amit Kalantri
Progress apart from purpose ends in arrogance. -T.D. Jakes
Prolong not the past Invite not the future Do not alter your innate wakefulness Fear not appearances There in nothing more than this -Ram Dass
promise you can keep but can you keep your self in a safe place -MR-S
promulgation of transfixed senses to circumnavigate total deeds brings forth everlasting preservation with augmented courage -Abdul Rehman
proselytizing unknown alphabets augments the range of rapacity in your nerves -Abdul Rehman
Prove the nay-sayers wrong... Leave being average to others... You could be the one who changes the way the world spins -Frank Giampaolo
Pues el amor esta hecho de esos pequeños momentos que con el tiempo se van perfeccionando y en eso éramos buenos y fuimos perfeccionándolo con el pasar de los años, es que “las cosas fundamentales suceden conforme pasa el tiempo” decía nuestra canción As times goes by y de algún modo eso ocurrió así -F.J. Vizcarra
Punctuality is not just limited to arriving at a place at right time, it is also about taking actions at right time. -Amit Kalantri
Pure truth is always present, but it is each soul’s choice to decide when he or she wants it to be revealed. -Molly Friedenfeld
Purpose an integral force to success and creativity -Akubuiro Chidera
Put your hand on your heart and ask yourself, what do I want? The first thing that comes to mind is always the right one. -Layne Beachley
Put your thoughts into action and see how your life changes. -Satyendra Pandey
Qualquer jardim regado a dois é mais florido. -Fabiane Ribeiro livro &quot;A Gente Ama A Gente Sonha&quot;
Quam bene vivas refert, non quam diu -Seneca
Quand tu aimes quelqu'un, tu le prends en entier, avec toutes ses attaches, toutes ses oligations.  Tu prends son histoire, son passe et son present. Tu prends tout, ou rien du tout. R.J.Ellory
Que as nossas palavras ressoem para sempre pela eternidade e que nunca sejam esquecidas. Se por ventura se perderem perdidos estaremos. -Rute Canhoto
Quella vita ch'è una cosa bella, non è la vita che si conosce, ma quella che non si conosce; non la vita passata, ma la futura. Coll'anno nuovo, il caso incomincerà a trattar bene voi e me e tutti gli altri, e si principierà la vita felice. Non è vero? -Giacomo Leopardi
Quien alcanza su meta no es el que sale primero o el que maneja más rápido. Es el que comienza preparado sabiendo exactamente para dónde va. -Mauricio Chaves Mesén
Quran 3:185: » Every soul will taste of death. And ye will be paid on the Day of Resurrection only that which ye have fairly earned. Whoso is removed from the fire and is made to enter paradise, he indeed is triumphant. The life of this world is but comfort of illusion. » -Aicha Zoubair
Rationality and common sense never goes out of fashion. -Amit Kalantri
Reach - The art of relentlessly pursuing a divine assigned goal or objective beyond expectations. -Catherine Crumber
Reading doesn't mean accepting everything you read, it means reasoning everything you read. -Amit Kalantri
Reading is listening to the dead with our eyes. (page 325, Reading in the Brain, Stanislas Dehaene, 2009) -Francisco de Quevedo
Reading is not daily its a life style for all readers. -Gary Paulsen
Reading is the noblest of all the hobbies, that is why people mention it so frequently in their resume even if they don't read much. -Amit Kalantri
Real inspiration are not people, but their stories. -Amit Kalantri
Real intimacy is a sacred experience. It never exposes its secret trust and belonging to the voyeuristic eye of a neon culture. Real intimacy is of the soul, and the soul is reserved. -John O'Donohue
Real-time action of the leaders inspires the followers and the support-seeking word of the followers motivates the leaders. -Anuj Somany
Reality is based on your perception of the truth. Think about that statement for a bit, it will blow your mind, and blow the lid of what you perceive to be real and what is an illusion.  You are here to live YOUR life, YOUR way and on YOUR terms, not for the people you work for, not the people in the media, and not to live in the little box that society may have placed you in.  You are a unique individual, with talents, with drive, with passion, with ambition, with love, with laughter, with a soul that could melt the hardest of hearts, and with a mind as creative as Da Vinci.  You chose this life for a reason, and it certainly wasn't to live a reality created by others. Is this the time to stand up, and say I can live my own reality, create what I want for my own life, have the things I want in life without guilt, knowing that you deserve anything you want and are prepared to put the time and effort into getting? What if there was a way to bend your reality, a way to use your mind consciously to get what YOU want in life, become wealthy, feel comfortable in your own skin, meet the perfect man or woman, become more spontaneous, feel free, love, be open, be honest, be heartfelt, be grateful, be the one, love life, live, feel it, breathe it.... Welcome to Mind Alchemy Is this the time to Bend Your Reality? -Steven Aitchison
Reality Sucks, I want my dreams back. -Sandra Chami Kassis
Realize that "I Can't" usually means "I won't"! -Tae Yun Kim
Realize this – your anger with God does not drive a wedge between you and Him. It is your silence that drives the wedge. - Prodigal Life -Pauline Creeden
Rebuilding relationship requires a lifelong discipline and commitment. -Sri Amma Bhagwan
Receiving is good but giving is much better. Nevertheless, sharing is the best. -Shahrizad Shafian
Recognise instant self-gratification for what it is. Resist the temptation to grab for material objects like the perfect house, the coolest clothes or the hottest car. The if I just had X, I would be happy syndrome is a mass delusion. When you look for happiness in mere objects, they are never enough. Look around. Look within. -Nick Vujicic
Recognize, manage and master your beliefs. They aren’t genetic. They are choices. Choose ones that serve you. -Christopher Babson
Redundancy is my favourite business strategy. -Amit Kalantri
Reflection is a good thing. It allows us to look back in time so we can connect the dots between specific memories to reveal the purpose and meaning behind synchronistic events. -Molly Friedenfeld
Regardless of how black the page, he had always managed to turn it and move on to a new chapter in his life. -Robert Masello
Remember no one can make you feel inferior without your consent. –Eleanor Roosevelt
Remember that a wish held fervently turns into belief, and a belief held diligently becomes reality. -Jim Stovall
Remember that not getting what you want is sometimes a wonderful stroke of luck. –Dalai Lama
Remember this always: There is a reason God limits man's days -Mitch Albom
Remember, before they promoted to the chair of CEO, they were the best employees of their companies. -Amit Kalantri
Remember, crowd doesn't care about common sense. -Amit Kalantri
Replace the word can’t with can. Know that you can, believe that you can, and know will ALL of your heart that you will. You will succeed in spite of any obstacles that may try to hinder you! There’s so much power in having a positive attitude, positive mindset, and positive outlook. -Stephanie Lahart
Replace the word can’t with can. Know that you can, believe that you can, and know with ALL of your heart that you will. You will succeed in spite of any obstacles that may try to hinder you! There’s so much power in having a positive attitude, positive mindset, and positive outlook. -Stephanie Lahart
Repotting a plant gives it space to grow.  Repotting ourselves means taking leave of our everyday environments and walking into unfamiliar territory—of the heart, of the mind and of the spirit.  It isn’t easy.  The older we get, the more likely we are to have remained in the same place for some time.  We stay because it’s secure.  We know the boundaries and, inside of them, we feel safe.  Our roots cling to the walls we have long known.  But remaining inside can keep us from thriving.  Indeed, without new experiences or ideas, we slowly grow more and more tightly bound, eventually turning into less vibrant versions of who we might have been. Repotting means accepting that the way is forward, not back.  It means realizing that we won’t again fit into our old shells.  But that’s not failure.  That’s living. -Heather Cochran
Resources are hired to give results, not reasons. -Amit Kalantri
Respect the past, and prepare for the future by taking action in the present. -The Letters Of Gratitude
Respecting others is the biggest discipline. -JP Joshi
Responsibility and duty are different things, you can sacrifice your responsibility for your duty but you cannot sacrifice your duty for your  responsibility. -Amit Kalantri
Rewards await you if you stay steadfast in your faith. -Joel Osteen
Rich or Poor  Wealth can be determined by the richness of one’s smile. -Heath Byers
Romance meant more to me now. More than laughter and longing. I couldn’t explain it. Romance, true romance, killed my childish dreams and replaced them with something real. Something of significance. Deeper and darker and brighter all at the same time. Faithfulness. Gentleness. Patience. Goodness. Kindness. Peace. Joy. Love. True love. -Marilyn Grey
Roses are picked every day, they are told that they will be better off sold in the flower shoppe. And so they go from the hands of the picker; to the hands of the delivery man; to the hands of the florist; to the hands of the customer; and then often to the hands of the final recipient of the rose. From field, cut by scissors and passed from hand to hand. The world has forgotten that it is okay for roses to be in fields, the world has forgotten the beauty of the rose uncut. The bouquet is praised and given away but the wild roses are forgotten. People have forgotten what “wild” means; they think it means something entirely different. The wild rose remains untouched, with roots and swayed by the meadow winds. And that is wild. I am wild for having roots and for being untouched and for seeing things that people have forgotten. And I will always remember— that it is okay to be uncut, that it is okay to be untouched by darkness, it is okay to be wild. -C. JoyBell C.
RVM Thoughts for Today "Joy and Bliss can come from the little and most unexpected things if only we Program our Mind to enjoy these little things. -Rvm
RVM Thoughts for Today : "Just because you have problems , it doesn't mean you should not have Dreams. Instead, let your dream become the scheme to solve your problems. -Rvm
RVM's Thought for the Day -" Everybody Counts- the Happy ones Count their Blessings and the sad ones Count their Troubles. -Rvm
S is for SCARY! Fear is driven out by action! Bad habits are overcome by good habits. -Lucas Remmerswaal
sabar, doa, dan semangat  berharap dan meminta pertolongan hanya kepada Allah semata -yeni dwi
Sacrifices will make you a martyr, victories will make you a hero. -Amit Kalantri
Say NO to nuclear bombs otherwise it may take us all to our tombs. -Vinita Kinra
Say you are at the brink of killing yourself and someone tries to talk you out of it. You’ve already thought about it and your life is not worth living. Someone else comes along and tries to convince you not to kill yourself. Is there someone out there that can convince you not to kill yourself? What can they possibly say to convince you that your life, the one you have firsthand knowledge of, is worth living? There is that one answer. No one! There is that other answer. Nothing! -Dew Platt
Saya adalah produk gagal yang sedang dalam proses pendauran ulang. :) -Boneka Lilin
Saying "thank you" signifies sense of gratitude, but it also implies your incapability. -Amit Kalantri
Scars are just another kind of memory. -M.L. Stedman
Search, discover, innovate, know, find... keep looking. -Fernando Araya
Sebab kita bersukacita bukan karena memotong padi; kita bersukacita karena memotong padi yang kita tanam sendiri. -Multatuli
Security is a kind of death. -Tenessee Williams
Sediments of stones scatter as the ego hath crushed, weather of life changes every form , be it rock or a human! -Soumya V.
see beyond the eyes can see, believe beyond the inspiration! -Felix Y. Siauw
See the life through your heart, understand it by your mind and love it like your soul. -Amit Kalantri
See the world anew and write down the bones of it. -A.D. Sams
See yourself as who you want to be, not who you think you are. -Rowena Portch
Seeing a miracle will inspire you, but knowing you are a miracle will change you. -Deborah Brodie
Segala luka &amp; kecewa tampaknya kan malu &amp; meniada: ketika kita insyafi bahwa Allah Yang Maha Mengatur tak pernah keliru, tak pernah aniaya -Salim Akhukum Fillah
Selama kita memiliki hari esok, teruslah berusaha untuk menjadi lebih baik. Percayalah bahwa dengan kita berbuat demikian akan ada hari yang lebih baik untuk dinikmati -Rizki De
Self belief is directly proportional to confidence i.e more the self belief more is the confidence and less of it will lessen the confidence. Success gets attracted to persons with high self belief. -Sandeep Kakkar
Self belief is the multivitamin pill that helps you to go that extra mile and provides motivational fuel 24X7 to achieve your goals. -Sandeep Kakkar
Self love is the only way to a high quality love life. The quality of men and love relationships you have experienced is a direct result of the degree of love you have for yourself. Once you do the inner work to love yourself completely, you will have a wonderful and fulfilling love life beyond your dreams. -Janet Ong Zimmerman
Self-discovery means learning to live free! -Tae Yun Kim
Self-loathing is man’s effort to sweep the moon of footprints. -Joseph Grammer
Sell your materials but save your morals. -Amit Kalantri
Semua yang baik datang berduyun-duyun. Hanya karena aku sudah memulai. Yang lain-lain akan datang dengan sendirinya. Semua membutuhkan permulaan. Permulaan sudah ditempuh. -Pramoedya Ananta Toer
Serving my generation with excellence will mean my generation can in turn lead with excellence. -Onyi Anyado
Serving my generation with excellence will mean my generation can in turn lead with excellence. ~ O. Anyado 2014. -Onyi Anyado
Sesungguhnya, terlalu perhatiannya orangtua kita adalah gangguan terindah yang pernah bisa kita terima -Raditya Dika
Share wisdom with those who will receive it. -Tyler Perry
She has a serene, glowing disposition. She looks at you and the rest of the world through the eyes of a lynx and is always mysterious, possibly because she always harbours those hidden laughs just beneath her lips. She’s always ready to laugh. -C. JoyBell C.
She sat like Patience on a monument smiling at grief Shakespeare
She silently thanked God for creating such a beautiful universe where anything was possible even when it seemed impossible. -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
She simply converted an average face into beautiful face and a beautiful face into an angelic face. -Amit Kalantri
She was free in her wildness. She was a wanderess, a drop of free water. She belonged to no man and to no city -Roman Payne
She was in control of her life, even though it seemed she wasn’t. All she had to do was take the steering wheel and start driving. -Missy Lyons
she was lucky if he stood behind her. Not so lucky if he came to crush her. And a woman might only learn the truth of it—when he walked out of her life.   Highlighted by 9 Kindle users -Lenore Wolfe
SHINE JESUS - I have found, the more we point others to Jesus... the more His radiance shines through us. "Those who are wise will shine like the brightest of heavens, and those who turn many to righteousness will shine like stars forever and ever." Daniel 12:3 -Paul Cobb
Show some mercy to your 'time', don't always waste it. -Amit Kalantri
Si falta pasión no se encuentra la victoria -Rafael Nadal
Silence Is The Answer Of Every Questions -purvi mendapara
Silent is the best way to protect that you have build with beauty -Adele Mandez
Silk is a fine, delicate, soft, illuminating, beautiful substance. But you can never rip it! If a man takes this tender silk and attempts to tear it, and cannot tear it, is he in his right mind to say "This silk is fake! I thought it was soft, I thought it was delicate, but look, I cannot even tear it" ? Surely, this man is not in his right mind! The silk is not fake! This silk is 100% real. It's the man who is stupid! -C. JoyBell C.
Simbol, huruf dan angka adalah alat, sedangkan gagasan adalah roh sebuah tulisan. -I. Made Iwan Darmawan
Since you've stepped in the war battlefield, it is impossible for you to turn back. -Asif
sincerely and seriously committed to peace -- Velu Prbahakaran -
Size does not make a role model, character does. -LaQuisha Hall
Smile all the while. Don’t let miseries pile, for life is just a mile.-RVM -Rvm
Smile, when you don't want to. Give, when you feel you have nothing to give. Go for a walk, when you don't have the energy. Listen, when you feel you can't listen. Play music, when you need to hear the news. Take five, when you don't have the time. -Charles F. Glassman MD
Smile...it kills time between disasters. -Barbara Johnson
Smiling is powerful. Smiling at your problems make you a powerful person. -K.R. Loreto
so here i sit. a sum of the parts. about a third way down this wonderful path, so to speak. and i've been thinking lately about a friendship that fell apart with time, with distance, and with the misunderstanding of youth. i'm trying not to confuse sadness with regret. not the easiest thing at times. i dont regret that certain things happened. i understand that perhaps i had a choice in the matter, or perhaps i believe in fate. probably not, but so far actions as small as the quickest glance to events as monumental as death have pushed me slowly along to right here, right now. there was no other way to get here. the meandering and erratic path was actually the straightest of lines. take away a handful of angry words, things once thought of as mistakes or regrets, and i'm suddenly a different person with a different history, a different future. that, i would regret. so here i sit. thinking about a person i once called my best friends. a man who might be full of sadness and regret, who might not give a damn, or who might, just might, remember the future and realize that's where its at. -Chris Wright
So it is always preferable to discuss the matter of veganism in a non-judgemental way. Remember that to most people, eating flesh or dairy and using animal products such as leather, wool, and silk, is as normal as breathing air or drinking water. A person who consumes dairy or uses animal products is not necessarily or usually what a recent and unpopular American president labelled an "evil doer. -Gary L. Francione
So long as fortune is favouring you, your defects will remain covered. -Hazrat Ali ibn Abu-Talib
So many love affairs doesn't survive, because the couple has been very loving to each other but with the time they stop respecting each other. -Amit Kalantri
So what? who cares what others think? It's your life, not their's. So get up, get out, and live your life the way you want to. We only live once. -Kalista Miller
So you never know who you touch. You never know how or when you'll have an impact, or how important your example can be to someone else" (20). -Denzel Washington
So, I believe that what you are looking for, really looking for, is that one person who is capable of recognizing you no matter what. You know, that one person who is going to be able to see past what everybody else sees and even past what you yourself see or want to show, then be able to look at you and really recognize you and say "That's not you! This is you right over here! You just forgot yourself, but I see you! I will help you remember yourself, because I remember you!" And that's what everyone wants. No, actually, I don't know if that's what everyone wants; but I know that's what I want! Because I can put up so many damn walls and faces just to see who really knows me, who really recognizes me, who really remembers me, even more than I recognize and remember myself! Because if I don't get that, then I don't get anything, because I don't want anything less than that. -C. JoyBell C.
Solution to a Problem can only be found when you want to get Rid of it. -ankur
Some books seem to have been written, not to teach us anything, but to let us know that the author has known something. -JOHANN WOLFGANG VON GOETHE Faust
Some choose to dream with a safety net. I dream with nothing to catch me, that way if I fall nothing can stop me from rising back up. -Evelyn Shepherd
Some come and leave fulfilling a single purpose; others, for a time or a season to teach us by their experiences; and last, a select few who participate with relationships that endure eternity. -Jaren L. Davis
Some instances in life call for humility. But, sometimes you need to be flat-out brazen when it comes to the desires of your heart. -Nakia R. Laushaul
Some of us are crèmes brûlées, unfortunately in the presence of those who would rather have corn dogs. We can try to degenerate into corn dogs to make them happy, or we can just accept the fact that we were made for Paris! -C. JoyBell C.
Some people are special because they're princes or princesses; or queens or kings! Some are special because they're presidents and senators; or because you can watch them on film! But what is the stuff that makes any person special? That makes any person more special than the world and everything in it? That would be love. Once you love someone? They're special, they're important. You make them important, it's your love that makes them more important than the whole world and everything in it! And guess what? That kind of important is real. -C. JoyBell C.
Some people don't like you just because your strength reminds them of their weakness. Don't let the hate slow you down. -Thema Davis
Some people gave up on their wishes and dreams because they’d been disappointed too many times in life and just didn’t have the courage to keep hoping things would change -Suzanne Elizabeth Anderson
Some people live in cages with bars built from their own fears and doubts. Some people live in cages with bars built from other people's fears and doubts; their parents, their friends, their brothers and sisters, their families. Some people live in cages with bars built from the choices others made for them, the circumstances other people imposed upon them. And some people break free. -C. JoyBell C.
Some people may like you, and some people may not, keep living your life dreams, you will succeed! -Nitra Gipson
Some people say they will not believe in anything they can't see. What a catastrophe to not have any faith at all! You live only less than a half of life, if you will only believe in the things that you can see. Life is lived by those who have much faith and believe in many unseen things. If you believe in nothing that you cannot see, think about how much there is that you choose to turn your face away from! You can't see your soul and you cannot prove that it exists, therefore if you call yourself one who believes in nothing unseen, then you will forever deny your soul its existence, for the existence of the soul dwells in love, trust, anger, passion, faith, belief, strength; the soul is forever nourished by things that are unseen! And so we have too many empty bodies walking around! Bodies with souls inside that are half-dead and dying. -C. JoyBell C.
Some stories wait their turn to be told, others just tap you on the shoulder and insist you tell them. -Michael Scott
Some things work better when they’re small. – Pg. 281 -Ian McEwan
Someone needs to fight,someone needs to sacrifice, someone needs to inspire, someone needs to be a hero. -Amit Kalantri
Someone who has got something of his own only understands the pain than anyone without his own stand and pain got anything under the sun. -Anuj Somany
Sometimes a hero is unbelievably good for so many but terribly bad for someone else. -Amit Kalantri
Sometimes an act of common sense is indistinguishable from an act of genius. -Amit Kalantri
Sometimes change was good. Sometimes it was even exactly what you needed. -Jenny O'Connell
Sometimes even the most successful people feel empty and incomplete; because they are not heroes yet. -Amit Kalantri
Sometimes I do face failures, but I don't like failures. -Amit Kalantri
Sometimes life gives us challenges. Must learn to overcome them one by one. -Ariadna Athanasopulos
Sometimes life isn't what you think it should be or want it to be. Sometimes life is just life and it goes on even without you. The key is to make the most out of it while you can. -Jean Williams
Sometimes people may anger you, but realise that they are stealing your energy.  Someone can only steal your energy if YOU allow them to. -Steven Aitchison
Sometimes Satan isn't busy- we're just being lazy. -Bradley Vinson
Sometimes the air is so thick with your judgment that its clouds obstruct your vision. -Sally Hanan
Sometimes the further away the target, the less you have to try to get there. -Charles F. Glassman
Sometimes the hardest one to see . . .is the one standing right before you. -Lenore Wolfe
Sometimes the only reason for us to be somewhere else is to see things from a different perspective. -Leila Summers
Sometimes the things that are felt the most are expressed between two souls over the distance and over time...where no words abide. And others may speak freely, live with one another freely, express themselves freely– just like everyone else, but then there is you... you have no words for proof of reassurance, no tokens of professed love, but you have something. Something worth keeping. -C. JoyBell C.
Sometimes there is a world war between heart and your mind. -Maulik Shah
Sometimes things will not go as planned, but don't lose hope. Stay focused on whatever you are trying to accomplish. There will be a breakthrough soon. Understand that all things take time. You may not be there yet, but you're on the right path towards success. -Amaka Imani Nkosazana
Sometimes walking away is the only way to win. – Never waste your time trying to explain yourself to people who have proven that they are committed to misunderstanding you. In other words, don’t define your intelligence by the number of arguments you have won, but by the number of times you have said, “This needless nonsense is not worth my time... -Mr. Nevergiveup
Sometimes we need to feel bad to know what it's like to feel good... -Nitra Gipson
Sometimes what seems so right turns out wrong and what seems so wrong turns out right. What do I call this phenomenon? Life. -Charles F. Glassman
sometimes you care and love people but they didn't realize it. they realize it, when you stop caring or loving them but then, everything is meaningless -Qasim Habib
Sometimes you just don't know what's going to happen, exactly. And that's because sometimes you just don't have control over circumstances in your life. The amazing thing is that— it is during these times that we free-fall through the sky! All we have is the breath in our lungs right here and right now and it's just exhilarating! And it takes humility to accept that we might not have everything we want in our hands at the moment— but that what we do have is good, is worth keeping. Even if something isn't everything, yet, it can be worth everything, right now! You just have to spread your arms in the air and start gliding! -C. JoyBell C.
Sometimes you know you have something, but your subconscious doesn't realize it. That is when you just need to get used to life's little unexpected occurances. -Svetlana Sonday
Sometimes, we are so attached to our way of life that we turn down wonderful opportunities simply because don't know what to do with it. -Paulo Coelho
Somewhere, deep within me, beyond the passion, beyond the beauty of the night, that little spark of Daily magic ignited in me again, began burning in a place that had gone dark and untended, that had yearned to be bright and warm. I felt it now, something old, something new, something complete. Perhaps it had been in there in me all along, the belief that there is a plan and a purpose, that God whispers into every life, some things that are beyond the scope of the mind, and can only be felt with the heart and the spirit.  Those dreams, the dreams that are dreamed *for* us, not by us, are the truest of all. -Lisa Wingate
Speciesism is morally objectionable because, like racism, sexism, and heterosexism, it links personhood with an irrelevant criterion. Those who reject speciesism are committed to rejecting racism, sexism, heterosexism, and other forms of discrimination as well. -Gary L. Francione
Spending time with people without ambition is a self-destruction. -Amen Muffler
Spirit world in dire need of your happiness. -Paulo Coelho
Spread LOVE and KINDNESS wherever you go. Then you can be sure you are never far from it! -Molly Friedenfeld
Sreča pride z dobro presojo, dobra presoja pride z izkušnjami in izkušnje pridejo s slabo presojo. -Robin S. Sharma
Stand tall and face YOUR truth. Speak boldly and be confident in what you say. Don't just dream, but take the steps to get where you want to be. Stay motivated, determined, and focused because YOU are worth it! Giving up is NOT an option. Keep your eyes on what matters and what's truly important. -Stephanie Lahart
Star in the sky is useless to the world, Star on the stage makes the difference to the world. -Amit Kalantri
Staring at the light of another blinds the view of our own. -Charles F. Glassman
Start from Raw.... As even Finished Goods... 'the Perfect' are incomplete and impossible without Raw Material. -Mayank Sharma
Start where you are. Use what you have.  Do what you can. –Arthur Ashe
Start your day with a smile; end it with a wish for a better tomorrow. -Sami Abouzid
Starting and profitably running a business is not just some achievement, it is heroism. -Amit Kalantri
Starting at the bottom is not about humiliation. It's about humility—a realistic assessment of where you are in the learning curve. -Maria Shriver
Statements of ordinary people are ignored like poor freebies, statements of great people are accepted like profound philosophy. -Amit Kalantri
Stay focus and you will achieve your goal. -Rodugsoy Pinoy
Stay focus on what God has assigned me to do. Keep my mind on what I am doing/ -John C. Maxwell
Stay HIGH on AWESOMENESS so reality cannot destroy you! -Comic Strip Mama
Staying in alignment with truth will always illuminate the path of another soul’s journey. -Molly Friedenfeld
Stop being a slave to your past and you become the master of your future. -Stephen Richards
Stop categorizing and labeling! This is your way to avoid the unknown but brings the risk to avoid the new! -Rossana Condoleo
Stop giving meaningless praise and start giving meaningful action. -Steve Maraboli
Stop living the life with possibilities and probabilities, live the life with certainties. -Amit Kalantri
Stop struggling to be what you already are rather develop what you are or what you have -Akubuiro Chidera
Stop thinking of yourself as a victim. You were a target that is now no longer being hit. -Thomas Sheridan
Stop worshiping the bad in boys and start recognizing the good in men -Kerry E. Wagner
Strange is our situation here on Earth. Each of us comes for a short visit, not knowing why, yet sometimes seeming to divine a purpose. From the standpoint of daily life, however, there is one thing we do know: that man is here for the sake of other men - above all for those upon whose smiles and well-being our own happiness depends. -Albert Einstein
Stretch yourself a bit to know the difference between humans and heroes. -Amit Kalantri
Strike the shepherd and the sheep will scatter -Robert Greene
Strive not to be a success, but rather to be of value. –Albert Einstein
Strong isn't about not being afraid, Caitlin.  It's about facing what you're scared of. -Lindsay J. Pryor
Succeeding is a choice. Not faith nor fate. -Chiemezie Anyaeji
Success always hugs you in private, but failure slaps you in the public... -sahil banga
Success comes from a thousand little things done well, rarely from a silver bullet, even though we'd all like to believe that as our actions betray." - L. R. W. Lee, Andy Smithson: Blast of the Dragon's Fury -L.R.W. Lee
Success for you is a RECIPE that ONLY YOU KNOW the ingredients for.So to you I say ,COOK UP the success that ONLY YOU know how to make and allow the world to see YOUR CREATION! -Jon-Robert Holden
Success is not about never falling, but about rising every time you fall -Michelle Cohen Corasanti
Success is the ability to change some one's perception of life. -Zeeshan Raza
Success isn't a result of spontaneous combustion. You have to set yourself on fire. -Arnold H. Glasow
Success seems to be largely a matter of hanging on after others have let go. -William Feather
Successful companies are built by investing lare amount of money and hundreds of litres of sweat. -Amit Kalantri
Successful companies are built by investing large amount of money and hundreds of litres of sweat. -Amit Kalantri
Such is my relationship with God: on my gigantic canvass of life, I am the one throwing all of the brightly-colored paints, creating genuine splatters, authentic whirlpools of color, beautiful patterns, wonderful streaks and stains and wild accents; God is the one with the paintbrush who stands beside my canvass filling all the intricate and amazing details in between the whirlpools and the streaks! We're happy together! -C. JoyBell C.
Sun will rise, night will fade, Roses shall bloom, birds will flock, Winds ready to dance, lotus secretly smiles, This is a promise, morning shall ever rise. -Harshada Pathare
Sure, genetics do play a role in alcholism. You're more likely to be an alcoholic if one or both of your parents are also alcoholics. But that's just one part of the equation; the other part is your behavior. You can't become an alcoholic if you never take a drink. So if you know you're predisposed to addiction because of your family history, then just don't get started, and you'll never find yourself on that path.  Same with any other type of 'family curse.' If you parents smoke, don't pick up a cigarette. If your parents are obese, work hard to exercise and eat right so you don't follow in their foosteps. But some people find it easier to play the victim. They do whatever bad habits they want to because they think they have a built-in defense - "I grew up this way. -Gaby Rodriguez
surgery can help to remove a damaged organ but only meditation and quiet time can remove emotions like anger and fear to calm and soothe a disturbed mind -Teresa Spelman
Surround yourself with the dreamers and the doers, the believers and the thinkers, but most of all, surround yourself with those who see the greatness within you, even when you don't see it yourself. -Edmund S. Lee
System fails when people with ability don't have authority and people with authority don't have ability. -Amit Kalantri
Take a moment, right now, and consider the enormity of activity going on inside of you – from the billions of cells to the even more billions of microscopic organisms. And in that same moment consider the enormity of activity in the oceans, the forests, the jungles, the earth below your feet, right now. And before you take your next breath, consider what might be going on in the outer regions of the universe. Finally, ask yourself, am I really in a position to discount possibilities beyond the limits of my conscious experience? -Charles F. Glassman
Take care of your manners as seriously as your money. -Amit Kalantri
Take God's word literally for what is written - nothing less or nothing more. -Valencia Mackie
Take off my clothes and there becomes a man.  Take off my skin and there becomes my bones.  Break all my bones and there becomes my heart.  Smash my heart and there becomes my soul.  And that you cannot take.  And what is my soul?...It is everything that make a man.  It is everything that makes this man. -Carew Papritz
Take pride in your achievments, not in the gifts you were fortunate to be born with. -David Seller
Take the beautifully wild pieces of your life and shape them into the manicured works of art you want your life to become.  That is your lifescape -Jaha Knight
Take the first step in faith, you don't have to see the whole staircase, just take the first step. -Martin Luther King Jr.
Take the first step.  No more, no less, and the next will be revealed. -Clement Watt
Take time to smell the roses but be careful of the bees. -Tyler Perry
Take up one idea. Make that one idea your life - think of it, dream of it, live on that idea. Let the brain, muscles, nerves, every part of your body, be full of that idea, and just leave every other idea alone. This is the way to success. -Swami Vivekananda , Ramakrishna Paramhans, Sarda Devi
Taking action is the best source of inspiration. -Amit Kalantri
Taking actions will fulfill your dreams and wishes, not the prayers and blessings. -Amit Kalantri
Taking care of yourself, taking time for yourself &amp; rewarding yourself is NOT selfish. It’s important &amp; absolutely necessary! -Comic Strip Mama
Taking personal accountability is a beautiful thing because it gives us complete control of our destinies. -Heather Schuck
Taliban stands for student; own a pen not gun. -Vinita Kinra
Talk shit, get hit. -Ernest Hemingway
Talking to strangers is very panic fear, to be fearless and good communicator in long term try talking to strangers with courage like you already know them. -Amit Kalantri
TanganNya tidak pernah terlalu pendek untuk menjangkau kita...kupingNya tidak pernah terlalu bising sehingga tidak bisa mendengar seruan kita...&amp; mataNya tidak pernah berada terlalu jauh sehingga tidak bisa memperhatikan kita... Tapi,seringkali hati kita yg terlalu kecil untuk menyadari keberadaanNya...&amp; pikiran kita yg terlalu sempit untuk mengakui kekuasaanNya atas semua masalah kita... *nite all..yesaya 55:8 -Ferawati
Tankopis je nalik ispruženom kažiprstu polegao preko bele kože na leđima Naska H., išarane pravopisnim greškama pegica i mladeža. -Aleksandar Sekulov
Targets are achieved sooner out of need, than out of greed. -Amit Kalantri
Teach but never try to change people because sometimes they change back. -Tyler Perry
Teach thy tongue to say, “I do not know,” and thous shalt progress. –Maimonides
Tell the facts even if the person doesn't want to hear them, if they don't like the facts than they can change them. -Trudy Shourt
Temporary extreme fear while saying the truth is easy to overcome than the perpetual fear of the unspoken truth. -Amit Kalantri
That agony, that pain, that struggle, that rejection takes you to the place of grasping your dreams. -Euginia Herlihy
That moment when you are standing at the edge of a life decision may be terrifying, but if you don't jump in - you'll never know! -Maggie Pajak
That's enough crying about the problems, let's begin killing the problems. -Amit Kalantri
That's the paradox: the only time most people feel alive is when they're suffering, when something overwhelms their ordinary, careful armour, and the naked child is flung out onto the world. That's why the things that are worst to undergo are best to remember. But when that child gets buried away under their adaptive and protective shells—he becomes one of the walking dead, a monster. -Ted Hughes
That's the thing about pain. It demand to be felt. -John Green
The ability to forget is a blessing, just like memory is. -Marwane Caber
The absence of a muse can be even more inspirational than its presence -ALAgrApHY
The absolute worst reason to do something is because everyone else is doing it – individuality is not a curse, its a boon, and don’t let anyone ever tell you otherwise. -M.P. Sharma
The age measured from the date of birth is just a number, The mental age always makes the difference -Ramy El-Mahdy
The amount of time you spend pondering over our problems, can be best spent resolving them. -Abdulazeez Henry Musa
The battles that count aren't the ones for gold medals. The struggles within yourself–the invisible battles inside all of us–that's where it's at. –Jesse Owens
The beauty in correcting our own mistakes; rather than attempting to correct the mistakes in others, is that working upon our own flaws improves us. But working upon the flaws of others not only leaves us unimproved; it actually leaves us being less than we were prior to making those assessments. I believe that the moral of this natural occurrence, is that we are all born to find and fix our own shortcomings; rather than find and fix the shortcomings in others. And if all people were to do this, then we would be a race of creatures looking inward, in order to bring out something better. Now think of what a beautiful race that would be. -C. JoyBell C.
The best and the most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched- they must be felt with the heart. -Helen Keller
The best are always an inspiration for the rest Always give praise to the best  The best will always give you praise Just because you are the best  Just because you are an inspiration for the rest -Lekiesha
The best donation is giving hope -Mohammed Sekouty
The best kind of day is a writing day -Buffy Andrews
The best love in the world, is the love of a man. The love of a man who came from your womb, the love of your son! I don't have a daughter, but maybe the love of a daughter is the best, too. I am first and foremost me, but right after that, I am a mother. The best thing that I can ever be, is me. But the best gift that I will ever have, is being a mother. -C. JoyBell C.
The best remedy for those who are frightened, lonely and unhappy is to go outside, somewhere they can be alone, alone with the sky, nature and God. For then and only then can you feel that everything is as it should be... -Anne Frank
The best revenge is massive success. –Frank Sinatra
The best thing to learn from any government is that it does not get affacted by what other people talk or think about it. -Amit Kalantri
The best time to plant a tree was 20 years ago. The second best time is now. –Chinese Proverb
The best way to predict your future is to create it. -Peter F. Drucker
The best way to solve a problem is to prevent it. -chibisa charles
The brightest star in the night sky is the one closest to us; try to keep getting closer to your goal to shine even brighter. -Vinita Kinra
The Buddha encouraged people to "know for yourselves that certain things are unwholesome and wrong. And when you do, then give them up. And when you know for yourselves that certain things are wholesome and good, then accept them and follow them." The message is always to examine and see for yourself. When you see for yourself what is true-and that's really the only way that you can genuinely know anything-then embrace it. Until then, just suspend judgment and criticism. -Steve Hagen
The calling of an author is more than just to entertain, but also to share ones experiences with the world. -M.J. Stoddard
The challenge of life is regretless decision making, relentless pursuit  of vision with faith, forgiving others, enduring pain with a smile &amp; achieving goals with an extra MILE -Sujit Lalwani
The character is like the foundation and the reputation is like the building structure. If the foundation is built really strong, then the skyscraper is going to be durable. -Anuj Somany
The choices one makes, not one's blood, determine one's destiny - John Steinbeck -Laxmi Hariharan
The concept of 'home' is not just where one resides, but where the heart resides; in the purest depths of the soul.♥ -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
The conception of each star was at the point of no return; of a desperate soul struggling to master the winds! -C. JoyBell C.
The counting starts from zero, similary the success. -Amit Kalantri
The coward says in his heart “There is no love.” Because, standing in the shadows of the big, grand, and powerful existence of love, his small spirit is left feeling even smaller and less significant. And so he chooses to deny the existence of love altogether. Because he is too small to have it. -C. JoyBell C.
The creation of a thousand forests is in one acorn -Ralph Waldo Emerson
The creative mind seeks chance and accident while everyone else seeks control and order. Rod Judkins ‘Change Your Mind -Rod Judkins
The danger of venturing into uncharted waters is not nearly as dangerous as staying on shore, waiting for your boat to come in. -Charles F. Glassman
The day of perfection is not scheduled on earth. -Naty Matos
The day we put an end to believing in hope will be the day we stop existing, for without hope, we are nothing. -K.M. Parr
The days come and go like muffled and veiled figures sent from a distant friendly party but they say nothing.And if we do not use the gifts they bring, they carry them silently away -Ralph Waldo Emerson
The difference between me and other people is that they all walk around with onion skins wrapped around them. Pre-meditations, pretentions, the faces that they present to the world, the faces that they present to themselves.. onion skins that come in layer after layer. They're on the inside of all that. And I... I am the inside of the onion skin walking around. I am only me. -C. JoyBell C.
The difference between success and failure is measured by how many times you can try…ONE MORE TIME. -Rodger Halston
The difference between the impossible and the possible lies in a person's determination. -Tommy Lasorda
The difference between us and Jesus Christ is that He had to do it perfectly so that we wouldn’t have to. -Kassi Pontious
The difference between what we do and what we are capable of doing would suffice to solve most of the world's problems. -Ghandi
The doors to your dreams are not always visible, and the only way to see them is to create them. -Steven Aitchison
The downfall of the attempts of governments and leaders to unite mankind is found in this- in the wrong message that we should see everyone as the same. This is the root of the failure of harmony. Because the truth is, we should not all see everyone as the same! We are not the same! We are made of different colours and we have different cultures. We are all different! But the key to this door is to look at these differences, respect these differences, learn from and about these differences, and grow in and with these differences. We are all different. We are not the same. But that's beautiful. And that's okay.In the quest for unity and peace, we cannot blind ourselves and expect to be all the same. Because in this, we all have an underlying belief that everyone should be the same as us at some point. We are not on a journey to become the same or to be the same. But we are on a journey to see that in all of our differences, that is what makes us beautiful as a human race, and if we are ever to grow, we ought to learn and always learn some more. -C. JoyBell C.
The dream giver/vision giver will see you through the brutal storms and He'll bring the rainbow in your life. -Euginia Herlihy
The dream will outlive the dreamer so dream big. -Tyler Perry
The Ego, The Thief that Steals Happiness from Our Hearts -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
The enemy puts full effort into silencing only the greatest voices. -Lenita Reeves
The Fact That You Have The Ability To Stand On Stage And Sing While You’re Crying Is So Brave. -Demi Lovato
The facts of life is coming to terms with the reality. -Abdulazeez Henry Musa
The fastest and easiest way to accomplish any task is to do it with minimum breaks and pauses. -Amit Kalantri
The fault, dear Brutus, is not in our stars, but in our stars, that we are underlinings. -John Green
The fear of being alone is a great obstacle to attracting the relationship that is right for you. -Charles F. Glassman
The first step to success it's to imagine it -Pete Hautman
The full moon was rising, looking huge and pale, the black spots appearing like a wise man smiling. The moon followed me while houses, cars, lands and trees disappeared blindly onto the tracks. It seemed like a very slow moon, considering the landscapes beneath it were constantly disappearing. -Prerna Varma
The function of a heart is to keep the body alive, I genuinely believe it is mind which takes care of everything else. -Amit Kalantri
The funny thing about a smile is that once you wear a smile, the darkness lightens and one does not feel frightened or sad any more. -Deepak Menon
The future belongs not to the biggest or the strongest, rather to those who are willing to adapt. -Al Hanzal
The Futures Bright, Wear Your Sunglasses -Ian Somerhalder
The glass is neither half empty, nor half full. The glass is just a glass and it's content can perpetually change with your perception. -Jennifer Sodini
The Glory Is Always Hidden Between The Lines Of the Story -Sujit Lalwani
The good is the Enemy of the best. Until you depart from the good, you cannot enter God's best for your life. -Pedro Okoro
The grass may be greener on the other side but the the water bill is higher. -Tyler Perry
The great idea is the one that is either saleable or is worthy of imitation. -Amit Kalantri
The great strength she had used in the old days to conquer and subdue, to win her will and to defend her way, seemed now a power but to protect the suffering and uphold the weak, and this she did, not alone in hovels but in the brilliant court and world of fashion, for there she found suffering and weakness also, all the more bitter and sorrowful since it dared not cry aloud. -Frances Hodgson Burnett
the greatest asset one may be able to possess is a great mind -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
the greatest man is he who is part of himself -Mpho Leteng
The greatest thing about dreams is they don’t expire. They can lay dormant for years and when you pull them out and dust them off, they shine like new. -Casi McLean
The greatest thing you will ever give to the world is your committment to leave what you find in better condition than the way you found it. Leave a single light in a place where there was once darkness so those coming behind you may see further and begin where you left. -Tonny K. Brown
The heart is sometimes tainted with the songs of yesterday.  Sing a new song today. -Steven Aitchison
The heart should never be completely locked, or you may regret the opportunities you had to let amazing people into your life -Steven Aitchison
The highest mountain inspires me for I know... I can do all things through Christ Who strengthens me! -Catissa Chapman
the holiest place on earth is where an ancient hatred has become apresent love. -Helen Shucman
The image you currently have of yourself is as high as you can go.... -Stephen Richards
The imagination of creative thought can be a crazy place,this giving reason to write it down to try and make sense of it all. -Helen  Ingram
The importance of knowing for certain that you have been saved cannot be understated. We do not know how many days, hours, or minutes God has granted us here to have an opportunity to make a choice. -Kimberly McRae
The incomprehension is when the thing happens without knowing the reasons. -Adele Mandez
THE INITIAL STEP  IN INDIVIDUAL TRANSFORMATION REQUIRES THAT YOU  ALLOW YOURSELF TO BE  HONEST, OPEN, &amp; VUNERABLE TO ADMIT YOUR SHORTCOMINGS; LOOK AT THE PATH YOU’VE TRAVELED; ACKNOWLEDGE ,THAT UNFAVORABLE EVENTS QUITE POSSIBLY WERE THE CONSECUENSE OF YOUR POOR CHOICES;  DEVELOPE  A STRATEGY TO GET BACK ON TRACK WITH A WELL ALLUMINATED  PATHWAY FOR REASONABLY ACHIEVABLE SUCCESS, WHATEVER WAY YOU DEFINE IT;  AND  KNOWING WHAT IS REQUIRED: POSSESING THE COURAGE,  WILLINGNESS, &amp; DESIRE TO IMPLEMENT POSITIVE CHANGE; CONSTANTLY &amp; CONSISTENTLY FOREVER CHALLENGING YOURS ELF TO STRIVE FOR GREATNESS. -TA Guimont
THE INITIAL STEP IN INDIVIDUAL TRANSFORMATION REQUIRES THAT YOU ALLOW YOURSELF TO BE HONEST, OPEN &amp; VUNERABLE TO ADMIT YOUR SHORTCOMINGS; LOOK AT THE PATH YOU’VE TRAVELED; ACKNOWLEDGE, THAT UNFAVORABLE EVENTS QUITE POSSIBLY WERE A CONSEQUENSE OF YOUR POOR CHOICES.  DEVELOPE A STRATEGY TO GET BACK ON TRACK WITH A WELL ALLUMINATED PATHWAY FOR REASONABLY ACHIEVABLE SUCCESS, WHATEVER WAY YOU DEFINE IT; AND KNOWING WHAT IS REQUIRED: POSSESING THE COURAGE, WILLINGNESS &amp; DESIRE TO IMPLEMENT POSITIVE CHANGE; CONSTANTLY &amp; CONSISTENTLY FOREVER CHALLENGING YOURSELF TO STRIVE FOR GREATNESS. -TA Guimont
The innate longing within every soul is to awaken from the spirit's slumber and then to journey home. -Patsie Smith
The journey of growth, search for the secret has always been within, the simpler we make it, the better it gets. -The Letters Of Gratitude
The joy of The Lord really is strength. -Tyler Perry
The jump is so frightening between where I am and where I want to be... because of all I may become I will close my eyes and leap! -Mary Anne Radmacher
The kindness sent from one compassionate soul to another during the time of loss of one held so dear allows the sorrow-filled heart to open wide, filling the space of emptiness that grief may have created with a renewed sense of peace, compassion, and love. -Molly Friedenfeld
The knowledge of secrets is a very enticing ship, a very tempting voyage, and one thinks that the highest attainment in life is to find out hidden truths, to seek out what is truth, to know what are all lies; to uncover, to discover and to rediscover, to dig up, to expose, to reveal... But secrets can go on forever, for an eternity! For as vast as the universe is, so are the secrets therein! And one can lose, because of that thought that in the secrets, everything is to be gained! But I can see, that all the knowledge of hidden things, all the knowledge in the universe, is not nearly as valuable and as worthy as the innocence of one's soul. And we are not directed unto good things through our ability to scavenge or to hunt or to decipher or to sail! Or to fly! But we are directed unto good things, through sovereign providence! He is more worthy- the innocent soul who has a simple faith in what he believes in- than the one who has found out all the dark secrets about what the other man has put his faith in! And it is far more profitable for a man to be healthy, to have a long, long life, loved ones that are blessed with these blessings all the same, much love and happiness and safety! It is far more profitable for a man to be able to remain innocent and have love and be healthy and to be able to watch his loved ones in good health and in good love, than for a man to uncover all the secrets of the universe! A single love, a single faith, a single trust, and one hope- these are far, far better things to aspire to have! And this– this is the biggest secret! -C. JoyBell C.
The leader acknowledges and eradicates the weeds in the garden, but keeps vision on the beauty they are creating and not on the weeds they are destroying -Christopher Babson
The longer you live, the more dreams you should have to keep you occupied. -Alice Bag
The Lord has no body now on earth but yours, no hands now but yours, no feet now but yours. Yours are the eyes through which His compassion looks out to the world. Yours are the feet with which He is to go about doing good. Yours are the hands with which he is to bless His people. -Teresa Ávila
The major problem of the world is, most of the people are unjustifiably angry and very few are loving. -Amit Kalantri
The majority of people have successfully alienated themselves from change; they tediously arrange their lives into a familiar pattern, they give themselves to normalcy, they are proud if they are able to follow in auspicious footsteps set before them, they take pride in always coloring inside the lines and they feel secure if they belong to a batch of others who are like them. Now, if familiar patterns bore you, if normalcy passes before you unnoticed, if you want to create your own footsteps in the earth and leave your own handprints on the skies, if you are the one who doesn't mind the lines in the coloring book as much as others do, and perchance you do not cling to a flock for you to identify with, then you must be ready for adversity. If you are something extraordinary, you are going to always shock others and while they go about existing in their mundaneness which they call success, you're going to be flying around crazy in their skies and that scares them. People are afraid of change, afraid of being different, afraid of doing things and thinking things that aren't a part of their checkerboard game of a life. They only know the pieces and the moves in their games, and that's it. You're always going to find them in the place that you think you're going to find them in, and every time they think about you, you're going to give them a heart attack. -C. JoyBell C.
The man is product of his thoughts; he becomes what he thinks -Mahatma Gandhi
The man who says I can't is the man that says I wont -Benton Marcum
The mandarins of culture—what do they do to teach the common folk to read? It's no good writing down lists of books for farmers and compiling five-foot shelves; you've got to go out and visit the people yourself—take the books to them, talk to the teachers and bully the editors of country newspapers and farm magazines and tell the children stories—and then little by little you begin to get good books circulating in the veins of the nation. It's a great work, mind you! -Christopher Moley
The masses live their lives as defined by terms given by society. For example: this is what it means to be married, this is what it means to be in a relationship, this is what it means to be dating, this is what it means to have a mutual understanding, sighs, this is what it means to be serious, this is what it means to be casual, this is what it means to be complicated, this is what it means to be Facebook official. These are all terms given by society. These are all invisible (and not so invisible) lines, drawn by society. These are are not God-lines. These are not borders created by highly enlightened individuals. These are not terms defined by you during moments of highly elevated consciousness. No. These are only shits. A pure soul, completely whole and void of constriction, will look out into the world with untainted eyes and say: "Where is the one whom my soul recognizes?" And you look for the one whom your soul is sired to, whom your soul recognizes, whom your soul loves. There are no laws, there are no lines, there are no borders. There is no shit. You are committed to the call of your soul, to the power that calls you beyond all the cloaks and the traps and the smallness created by small hands. -C. JoyBell C.
The master-word is Work, a little one, as I have said, but fraught with momentous sequences if you can but write it on the tablets of your hearts, and bind it upon your foreheads. -Abraham Verghese
the matured understands mistakes as a necessary growth path to maturity -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
the meaning of life is to FIND YOUR GIFT.  the purpose of life is to GIVE IT AWAY. -William Shakespeare
The might of the majority is not always right because to sense alright everything that is of a great insight, everyone needs to have a farsighted vision in their eyesight. And the universal fact is that there are only a few visionaries and the rest of them are just ordinary. -Anuj Somany
The mind is a wonderful servant, but a terrible master. -Robin S. Sharma
The mind is everything. What you think you become.  –Buddha
The mind is more sensible than heart, if you are sure listen to your heart, if you are confuse listen to your mind. -Amit Kalantri
The moment we stop trying, we decline in success. -Shaizy - Shah Sheraz
The moon is your reminder that God is never-changing, and you can always depend on Him to hear your prayers. -Tessa Emily Hall
The more I did it―the more it owned me. It made things matter. It put a spine into my spineless life and that spine spread, into backbone, ribs, collarbone, neck held high. It was something. Don't say it wasn't. -Megan Abbott
The More I resist the more I need to change.ins -Renee Wiggins
The more time you spend thinking, the less time you spend doing. The less time you spend doing, the more you watch others do. This formula never equals success. -Beatrice McClearn
The most adventurous journey to embark on; is the journey to yourself, the most exciting thing to discover; is who you really are, the most treasured pieces that you can find; are all the pieces of you, the most special portrait you can recognize; is the portrait of your soul. -C. JoyBell C.
The most amazing thing is that all my sorrows, all of my darkest moments, are becoming my gifts. -Anna White
The most annoying pain is perceived when a man is living without a purpose. -Amit Kalantri
The most common way people give up their power is by thinking they don't have any - -Alice Waters
The most common way people give up their power is by thinking they don't have any. –Alice Walker
The most dangerous irony is, people are angry with others because of their own incompetence. -Amit Kalantri
The most difficult thing is the decision to act, the rest is merely tenacity. –Amelia Earhart
The most gratifying action plan that one can conceive  is one that others deem unattainable only to be proven wrong. -Mark W. Boyer
The most important thing in life is to learn how to give out love, and let it come in. -Morrie Schwartz.
The most important thing you ever did was learn how to survive. Do not let anyone make you feel like you shouldn't have - like you deserved to be in that camp. -Amanda Bracken
The most risky liability of your life is 'the unspoken truth'. -Amit Kalantri
The most time consuming process in the world is probably "thinking". -Amit Kalantri
The most unlucky generation is the one which couldn't produce a hero to look upto. -Amit Kalantri
The most valuable people in the world are "Visionary People". -Amit Kalantri
The notion that we should promote “happy” or “humane” exploitation as “baby steps” ignores that welfare reforms do not result in providing significantly greater protection for animal interests; in fact, most of the time, animal welfare reforms do nothing more than make animal exploitation more economically productive by focusing on practices, such as gestation crates, the electrical stunning of chickens, or veal crates, that are economically inefficient in any event. Welfare reforms make animal exploitation more profitable by eliminating practices that are economically vulnerable. For the most part, those changes would happen anyway and in the absence of animal welfare campaigns precisely because they do rectify inefficiencies in the production process. And welfare reforms make the public more comfortable about animal exploitation. The “happy” meat/animal products movement is clear proof of that.  We would never advocate for “humane” or "happy” human slavery, rape, genocide, etc. So, if we believe that animals matter morally and that they have an interest not only in not suffering but in continuing to exist, we should not be putting our time and energy into advocating for “humane” or “happy” animal exploitation. -Gary L. Francione
The old adage that people only want what they can’t have or what they can’t tame— is totally primitive. A being of higher origins will know instinctively that life on earth is a series of chances, moments and concepts. That’s really all that you have. So when you find one of these things and it makes you burn, or it makes you feel peace inside, or it makes you look forwards and backwards and here all at the same time— that’s when you know to hold onto it. And you hold onto it with every fiber of your being. Because it’s in the holding on of these chances and moments and concepts that life is lived. Every other kind of living is only in vitro. I don’t care what psychologists say today about how the human mind works. Because one day they will reach this pinnacle and they will see what I see and they will look upon the old ways as primitive. As long and gone. We do not wish to have what we can’t have. We wish to burn in whatever flame we have stepped into. -C. JoyBell C.
The one ironclad rule is that I have to try. I have to walk into my writing room and pick up my pen every weekday morning. -Anne Tyler
The one struggling against the odds and getting defeated is a Loser. And this Loser with persistent determination turns a Winner one day.... -Saurabh Dudeja
The ONE thing that is most certain in life is CHANGE ;) -Michael
The one think I owe  to people is to act as happy as I can  be around them -Cherif Sy
The one who is born of the earth, dreams of the sky. The one who is born of the sky, dreams of the earth. -C. JoyBell C.
The only certainty in life is that it is uncertain. -Charles F. Glassman
The only impossible dreams are the ones unclaimed. -Julia Bellrock
The only measurement I understand is perfection. -Amit Kalantri
The only people for me are the ones who spill things, the ones who drop their cups sometimes, the ones who get dirty hands and messy hair, the ones who can go barefoot if they feel like it, the people who forget things, and can laugh at themselves every day... -C. JoyBell C.
The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be. –Ralph Waldo Emerson
The only prescription for morality is this: Remember that every woman could have been your mother, every girl could be your daughter. Remember that every man could have been your father, every boy could be your son. When it comes to matters of the heart, that's all that needs to be kept in mind, always, at all times. Whatever form of hurt you cause, will echo in your children one day. Whatever form of judgments you make, must be held up against the condition of your father or your mother. When this is done— one sees that there is no room to judge and that there is no room to hurt, another. -C. JoyBell C.
The only thing that keeps us from a place of joy is an illusion, the illusion of fear. -Molly Friedenfeld
The only thing that will ever make me fall in love is: if I fall in love. -C. JoyBell C.
The only thing worse than regretting the things you've done is regretting the things you didn't do. -Samantha Leahy
The only thing wrong with trying to please everyone is that there's always at least one person who will remain unhappy. You. -Elizabeth Parker
The only way that we can live, is if we grow. The only way that we can grow is if we change. The only way that we can change is if we learn. The only way we can learn is if we are exposed. And the only way that we can become exposed is if we throw ourselves out into the open. Do it. Throw yourself. -C. JoyBell C.
The only way to do great work is to love what you do. –Steve Jobs
The past could never be hidden [we must embrace] it with new hope and new dreams so that both past and present form one unified trunk that continues to shelter our people -Judy Croome
The past does not define me, it ignites me. The past is not a piece of me, it has placed me. -Ricky Maye
The past has no power to stop you from being present now. Only your grievance about the past can do that. What is grievance? The baggage of old thought and emotion. -Lao Tzu
The pen is mightier than the sword, for by the sword are mortal battles waged, but by the pen entire cultures swayed, eternal societies arrayed, and souls of men saved. -Ilyan Kei Lavanway
The people that surround us mirror who we are. -The Letters Of Gratitude
The person in life that you will always be with the most, is yourself. Because even when you are with others, you are still with yourself, too! When you wake up in the morning, you are with yourself, laying in bed at night you are with yourself, walking down the street in the sunlight you are with yourself.What kind of person do you want to walk down the street with? What kind of person do you want to wake up in the morning with? What kind of person do you want to see at the end of the day before you fall asleep? Because that person is yourself, and it's your responsibility to be that person you want to be with. I know I want to spend my life with a person who knows how to let things go, who's not full of hate, who's able to smile and be carefree. So that's who I have to be. -C. JoyBell C.
The person who says it cannot be done should not interrupt the person who is doing it. –Chinese Proverb
The person who sends out positive thoughts activates the world around him positively and draws back to himself positive results. -Dormaine G.
The position of a hero is not for the comparision, it is a reference point -Amit Kalantri
The power is in the authenticity. JP Rattie
The power of the Will in a man, is favoured by the Heavens. The man who sets his Heart and Word onto something, and says "I will" no matter what obstacle is placed in his way— joins the ranks of the demi-gods. All else remain in mortality and are soon forgotten. -C. JoyBell C.
The primary feature of women is not a 'beauty', it's a 'mystery'. -Amit Kalantri
The Prince is the only option to a better living. His arm is reliable and dependable. Get to Him, stay glued and remain on Top! -Jaachynma N.E. Agu
The problem about cutting out the best of your heart and giving it to people, is that 1. It hurts to do that; and 2. You never know if they are going to throw it away or not. But then you should still do it. Because any other way is cowardice. At the end of the day, it's about being brave and we are only haunted by the ghosts that we trap within ourselves; we are not haunted by the ghosts that we let out. We are haunted by the ghosts that we cover and hide. So you let those ghosts out in that best piece of your heart that you give to someone. And if the other person throws it away? Or doesn't want it to begin with? Someone else will come along one day, cut out from his/her heart that exact same jagged shape that you cut out of your own heart, and make their piece of heart fit into the rest of yours. Wait for that person. And you can fill their missing piece with your soul. -C. JoyBell C.
The problem with thinking that you are the absolute best, is that it leaves no room for you to become any better and while you live life thinking that you're the best, truth is a lot of people around you are already better and becoming even more better. -C. JoyBell C.
The purest joys are available to all of us, and they're unrelated to status, recognition, or material desires. -Adam Braun
The quality of a person’s life is the sum total of the character, good or not so good, of the people whom he has inspired and motivated, directly and indirectly, with his living standard and lifestyle. -Anuj Somany
The question isn't who is going to let me; it's who is going to stop me. –Ayn Rand
The rainbow is the pot of gold to those who observe. -Thomas F. Shubnell
The real rich people doesn't have bank accounts, they have treasures. -Amit Kalantri
The rewards  of tomorrow are safely hidden in the belief of never quitting and not giving up on yourself today -Johnnie Dent Jr.
The rights paradigm, which, as I interpret it, morally requires the abolition of animal exploitation and requires veganism as a matter of fundamental justice, is radically different from the welfarist paradigm, which, in theory focuses on reducing suffering, and, in reality, focuses on tidying up animal exploitation at its economically inefficient edges. In science, those who subscribe to one paradigm are often unable to understand and engage those who subscribe to another paradigm precisely because the theoretical language that they use is not compatible. I think that the situation is similar in the context of the debate between animal rights and animal welfare. And that is why welfarists simply cannot understand or accept the slavery analogy. -Gary L. Francione
The road to success is littered with failures, but the lessons learned are crucial in plotting your course to success! -Kristi Loucks
The root of all true greatness, is humility. -C. JoyBell C.
The sacred stillness of your brilliant heart has as the myriad wonders masqueraded. But if you knew this secret from the start, then you'd have quit this Game before you played it. -Eric Micha'el Leventhal
The same way the world needs sunshine and rain so too we need smiles and tears. Because the same way the rain makes things grow our tears are what make us grow -David Seller
The search for happiness is one of the few actions in which human beings absolutely agree upon, though they may not agree on what it implies or how to find it. This quest for satisfaction emphasizes the creation of physical and mental boundaries that we would like to “privatize” for our welfare and security, trying to keep them unchanged in appearance and actions. That quest is ultimately insatiable and eventually results in more suffering and dissatisfaction -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
The search for happiness is one of the few actions in which human beings agree absolutely, though we may not agree in what it is and how to find it.” Ironically, a substantial part of humanity’s suffering arises from this discrepancy in the search for happiness. -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
The secret to life, more or less, is to think more about the future and less about the past. King Hare: The Kingdom Leporidae
The shudder of awe is humanity’s highest faculty, even though this world is forever altering values. -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
The simplest of tasks can create the happiest of moments. -Briar Kit Esme
The single most powerful element of youth is that you don't have the life experiences to know what can't be done. -Adam Braun
The sky is the limit! -Ari Joseph
The spirit of the world in dire need of happiness -coelho, paulo
The spouses of authors ought to really read their better halves books. What is found amidst those pages may enlighten them to knowing a side of their partner that can only be seen on the written page. -Sai Marie Johnson
The staunch belief on an invisible Almighty is the sole relief for a soul at the time of despair. -Anuj Somany
The storm stops at the door.  Love reigns, peace dwells. -Thomas S. Monson
The sum of our relationship with God enables us to take the next step, climb the next mountain, and do the next part of our assignment. -Katy Kauffman
The Sumerian cuneiform wrote honest history, with no pen, but after the pen was invented, history was corrupted -author Dr.Mohammed Abad Alrazak
The sun shall always rise upon a new day and there shall always be a rose garden within me. Yes, there is a part of me that is broken, but my broken soil gives way to my wild roses. -C. JoyBell C.
The support of our Soul and the joy that it bestows is sufficient to our need and carries us forward. -Genevieve Gerard
The Swimmer's Advantage: 1)The goal is measured first by seeing; The distance is accomplished by the strategy of believing that the same set of repetitious acts will get them there. 2)Even when the elements around you are overwhelming, have the confidence to keep your head the above water.  3) Though at times you may not even see it, faith is knowing that the shore is always straight ahead.  4) By consistently reaching out over and over, you are bound to be rewarded by touching something worth more than when you started. -Johnnie Dent Jr.
The Swimmer's Advantage: 1)Your goal is measured first by seeing; The distance is accomplished by the strategy of believing that the same set of repetitious acts will get you there. 2)Even when the elements around you are overwhelming, have the confidence to keep your head above the water.  3) Though at times you may not even see it, faith is knowing that the shore is always straight ahead.  4) By consistently reaching out over and over, you are bound to be rewarded by touching something worth more than when you started. -Johnnie Dent Jr.
The task of modern man is not to find his inner self, but to create himself. -Rod Judkins
The temporal heart resonates at whispers From a Truth overarching Of whose countenance Timeless Intellect yearns vainly to fathom -Ashim Shanker
The thing about being a serious musician, or at least trying to be. You soon find out it's a lifestyle, and takes up every part of your days. It's A LOT of work. And sometimes life gets in the way. But you use what life taught you on that day, and put it into your art. -Scott McGoldrick
The thing about learning how to fight is that— some of us are not born with that desire. They say some are born fighters; but they don't usually point out that others just aren't. Some of us are forced by life to take up arms and fight. Many of us are. The art lies in knowing when to wield those arms and when to put them down. I don't think it's a matter of pretending to be ideally unharmed by life and untouched by darkness; because that is hypocrisy. Rather, I think it is a matter of being true to your truth and learning when to fight and learning when to be soft. Hopefully, our soft moments in life will largely outweigh, outrank, and outrun our fighting. -C. JoyBell C.
The thing about life is, you’ve got to somehow make it through the day. Don’t wait for the beautiful evening. Go on with your life. Of course, the beautiful evening will come. In fact, she’s on her way. And she’s coming to you as fast as she can. And dude, she’s beautiful. -Thisuri Wanniarachchi
The tide was a poem that only time could create, and I watched it stream and brim and makes its steady dash homeward, to the ocean. -Pat Conroy
The time for a person to instantly interact with his own soul, inspect his own mind and introspect with his own heart to identify his true quality of life is when too many people are too happy with him and he, too, is too much happy with them. -Anuj Somany
The Timeline of a Life being Long or Short, is Computed on the Benchmark of How You Live It... -Saurabh Dudeja
The tiny seed knew that in order to grow, it needed to be dropped in dirt, covered in darkness, struggle to reach the light. -Sandra Kring
The tone of voice changes the meaning of the word no matter if the definition stays the same -T.R.B. aka Truthly Speaking
The trick at every turn was to endure the test of living for as long as possible.  The odds of survival were punishingly slim, for the world was naught by a school of calamity and an endless burning furnace of tribulation.  But those who survived the world shaped it--even as the world, simultaneously, shaped them. -Elizabeth Gilbert
The tricky part about discovering our giftedness is that it may be in an area that feels unexpected. -Meg Meeker
The true mind can weather all the lies and illusions without being lost. The true heart can touch the poison of hatred without being harmed. -Avatar The Last Airbender
The truth came to me-a great revelation, showing me that I have a child to the Jones whole and perfect mind, created to express the health that God with. -Myrtle Filmore
The truth is .. I'm okay with people not liking me. I'm not okay with them pretending that they do. Keep it real. Everybody ain't for everybody. -Nakia R. Laushaul
The two most important days in your life are the day you are born and the day you find out why. –Mark Twain
The two toughest lessons to learn In life are “LET GO” &amp; “LETs GO..! -Sujit Lalwani
The unhappiest people in this world, are those who care the most about what other people think. -C. JoyBell C.
The universe is limit! -Angela Williamson
The Universe is Listening ~ Give it a Shout OUT! -Heather L. Tapia
The universe is neither centered on earth nor the sun.  It is centered on God. -Alfred Noyes
The universe is not more beautiful than your pure thoughts-enlighten the world around you, the rest is complementary... -Vedang Sati
The unthankful heart… discovers no mercies; but let the thankful heart sweep through the day and, as the magnet finds the iron, so it will find, in every hour, some heavenly blessings! — Henry Ward Beecher -Henry Ward Beecher
The value of a thing lies in it lack -Udeke Charles
The waves smash against rocks, boulder thunders upon bolder. Granite men grind one another, leaving their clean sand to floor the ocean. The alternative would be for the republic to breed up a race of men who could work together without growing violent: men more interested in getting somewhere than having their own way."  Haniel Long: Homestead 1892: Pittsburgh Memoranda. -Haniel Long
The way I see it, our natural human instinct is to fight or flee that which we perceive to be dangerous. Although this mechanism evolved to protect us, it serves as the single greatest limiting process to our growth. To put this process in perspective and not let it rule my life, I expect the unexpected; make the unfamiliar familiar; make the unknown known; make the uncomfortable comfortable; believe the unbelievable. -Charles F. Glassman
The way of the miracle-worker is to see all human behavior as one two things: either love, or a call for love. -Marianne Williamson
The way to get rid of darkness is with light; the way to overcome cold is with heat; the way to overcome the negative thought is to substitute the good thought. Affirm the good, and the bad will vanish." - The power of your subconcious mind -Joseph Murphy
The weakest are from deeply within the strongest of all natures -Jase Wolf
The wide awake man seizes opportunities or makes them, and thus those who are widest awake usually come to the front. -Charles H. Spurgeon
The will to live is as strong as the will to love and be loved. -Tyler Perry
The wisdom of LIFE eludes even the best... For those who pass the test Life is a fest,While, its forever,  A battle for the rest.. -Sujit Lalwani
The world can be made beautiful again by viewing it as a battlefield. When we have defined and isolated the evil things, the colors come back into everything else. When evil things have become evil, good things, in a blazing apocalypse, become good. There are some men who are dreary because they do not believe in God; but there are many others who are dreary because they do not believe in the devil. -G.K. Chesterton
The world is before you, and you need not take it or leave it as it was when you came in. -James Baldwin
The world of romance and business works on this principle - You may be rejected several times, but not everyone will reject you. -Amit Kalantri
The world should have been in Technicolour, but seemed more like black and white. -Kenneth Oppel
The world would sooner bury a live rat than it would a dead lion -Agona Apell
the worst subsistence humanism promotes lies in refugee of denigration on mere inventions for their own brothers -Abdul Rehman
The Yorubas have a saying, here, my translation in English--a poor fool is a bigger fool rich. In other words, money only allows and enables you to be more of who you are. My bigger translation? You don't jump essence, you jump environs! -Dew Platt
Theories might inspire you, but experiments will advance you. -Amit Kalantri
Ther is nothing called a great quote, rather the one which makes your heart to take a dip in river Ganges. -Srikanth Kosuru
There are blue diamonds born to the world and given to those who only want glass crystals. There are blue roses born to the world yet given to those who only want daisies. Blue diamond, don't cry because they want glass crystals. Blue rose, don't bleed because they see only the daisies. You were formed in the bedroom of the gods, you were conceived in the garden of the eternal! -C. JoyBell C.
There are different kinds of judgment-making. Naturally, when we meet people, we form judgments based upon how we were taught to see the world and other people (how we were raised, what we've experienced and etc.) The first kind of judgment-making is the more commonplace thing: to judge and to write that judgment in stone. The second kind of judgment-making is the kind that I do: to judge but then to write those judgments in the sand near the shoreline where the waves lap onto, that way, if I am wrong, the waves of truth may easily wash away any judgments I have made and thus I can be malleable and shaped easily by truth rather than by preconceived notions. The second kind of judgment is crucial to life, because it allows us to appreciate people and circumstances to the fullest. It allows us to live. -C. JoyBell C.
There are gigantic trees that have grown tall into the winds and the clouds over the thousands of years of their lives, their tops are rustled and tossed by the mists of the atmosphere! Then there are the short trees that don't live for long, they are young with no deep roots and only a few annual rings to tell their stories.The tall, ancient trees sway in the realm of freedom while the short young trees cannot even raise their branches into that direction of the sky! Now, you are the bird who needs a tree to live in; if you choose to live in the tree which thrives in the realm of freedom, that doesn't mean you are not committed to that tree. You are still committed to your tree, but together you and your tree live in freedom. Freedom is not the absence of commitment. If you are the bird who chooses to fly around amongst the short trees and live in them, that's because your wings are too short to make it any higher and your vision too near to see any further into the clouds. And if you move from one short tree to the next short tree, that doesn't mean you are free, you are still down there below, freedom is still nowhere near you. -C. JoyBell C.
There are individuals, who unfortunately are built with an immense amount of negativity. People will always tell you to run away from these types and when you follow that advice, you’ll be surprised to find yourself running into the same negativity in new people, and that scenario to be repeated again and again and again. Why? Well that’s only because it is in darkness that our light may shine it’s brightest. The more difficult the battle, the more important the victory. It’s easy to bring life forth from life; but to bring life forth from dry bones is truly a magical miracle. Those lights who have learned to shine in the deepest of darkness, are those lights that shine the strongest, the biggest, the hardest, the brightest. See the negativity in your life as a training ground and learn to love those who embody that darkness, because without them— you wouldn’t have gained any victories! Victories are gained through battles. This is the essence of the commandment “love your enemy.” There is no real enemy, for even the darkness is there to mold you into all that you may become. -C. JoyBell C.
There are many rivers that we cross in our lifetime, unfortunately some of those rivers just don't have bridges. -John R. Gouin
There are no boring jobs, only boring men. -Amit Kalantri
There are no limits, except for those we impose upon ourselves. -Dr. Walter Bishop
There are no one else able to conquered you except your own self. S. IKom Afriani L. S
There are no rules to creativity. -Laura Jaworski
There are no traffic jams along the extra mile -Roger Staubach
There are no traffic jams along the extra mile. –Roger Staubach
There are persons who seem to overcome obstacles and by character and perseverance to have risen to the top. But we have no record of the number of able persons who fall by the wayside, persons who, with encouragement and opportunity, mike make great contributions. -Mary Narnett Gilson
There are powers far beyond us, plans far beyond what we could have ever thought of, visions far more vast than what we can ever see on our own with our own eyes, there are horizons long gone beyond our own horizons. This is courage- to throw away what is our own that is limited and to thrust ourselves into the hands of these higher powers- God and Destiny.To do this is to abide in the realm of the eternal, to walk in the path of the everlasting to follow in the footprints of God and demi-gods. The hardest part for man is the letting go. For some reason, he thinks himself big enough to know and to see what's good for him. But in the letting go........is found freedom. In the letting go........ is found the flight! -C. JoyBell C.
There are so many bad people in the world. They'll treat you badly, they'll haggle and undermine your worth. They'll calculate what they can get without thinking about what to give. That's the world. Very seldom, you'll find someone who will not undermine and haggle your worth, who will take risks for you, who will think about what they can give to you and how they can make you happy. So you see, the rule goes like this— when you find such a person, you don't let go of them. You stay with them and they stay with you. -C. JoyBell C.
There are some animal advocates who say that to maintain that veganism is the moral baseline is objectionable because it is “judgmental,” or constitutes a judgment that veganism is morally preferable to vegetarianism and a condemnation that vegetarians (or other consumers of animal products) are “bad” people. Yes to the first part; no to the second. There is no coherent distinction between flesh and other animal products. They are all the same and we cannot justify consuming any of them. To say that you do not eat flesh but that you eat dairy or eggs or whatever, or that you don’t wear fur but you wear leather or wool, is like saying that you eat the meat from spotted cows but not from brown cows; it makers no sense whatsoever. The supposed “line” between meat and everything else is just a fantasy–an arbitrary distinction that is made to enable some exploitation to be segmented off and regarded as “better” or as morally acceptable. This is not a condemnation of vegetarians who are not vegans; it is, however, a plea to those people to recognize their actions do not conform with a moral principle that they claim to accept and that all animal products are the result of imposing suffering and death on sentient beings. It is not a matter of judging individuals; it is, however, a matter of judging practices and institutions. And that is a necessary component of ethical living. -Gary L. Francione
There are still some wonderful people left in this world! They are diamonds in the rough, but they're around! You'll find them when you fall down– they're the ones who pick you up, who don't judge, and you had to fall down to see them! When you get up again, remember who your true friends are! -C. JoyBell C.
There are things that I love – when mankind works together – helps each other – learns from each other – teaches each other – cries for one another – laughs with one another – builds with one another – heals one another – entertains one another – worships with one another. The unity of mankind … there is nothing so glorious. -Gerard de Marigny
There are things to be obtained by law and things to be obtained by claw -Agona Apell
There are those who hold first rankers and there are those who are heroes. -Amit Kalantri
There are times when the world around you becomes so quiet, so silent in the midst of your achievements. No wows, no congrats absolutely zilch. You just have to learn to keep it together, move forward and never stop  believing in yourself, never stop loving yourself and the things you love to do that made you the person you are right now. Be proud of yourself. -Euginia Herlihy
There are too many windbags in this world. Speak only when you are competent in a subject - It produces dignity." - L. R. W. Lee Andy Smithson: Blast of the Dragon's Fury -L.R.W. Lee
There are two things we should always be 1. raw and 2. ready. When you are raw, you are always ready and when you are ready you usually realize that you are raw. Waiting for perfection is not an answer, one cannot say "I will be ready when I am perfect" because then you will never be ready, rather one must say "I am raw and I am ready just like this right now, how and who I am. -C. JoyBell C.
There comes a time in life when everything you have know, tolerated and loved is suddenly shattered, all you can do is breathe" Maureen Momm -Catie Hartsfield
There has to be more to life. Sure, bad stuff happens, but what about all the good stuff? -Tessa Emily Hall
There is a higher form of hierarchy and that is the hierarchy of the spirit. When I stand in front of a person, I stand in front of a soul and I have met magnificent souls in bodies possessing no money, as well as parched and shallow souls in bodies bathed in riches. In the same light, I have met magnificent souls in bodies bathed in wealth, as well as parched and shallow souls in bodies that are impoverished. I am tired of people busying their minds with hierarchy based upon money, because this form of hierarchy is primitive; meanwhile there is an altogether higher form of hierarchy that is of the soul. As you judge man and woman based upon their riches, I laugh at your primitive form of judgment! When I stand in front of a human, I stand in front of a soul. -C. JoyBell C.
There is a lot of criticism around you. Don't pay attention to what they say or think...As long as you are gratified for what you do, what do you care what other people think? -Vedang Sati
There is a magnificent, beautiful, wonderful painting in front of you! It is intricate, detailed, a painstaking labor of devotion and love! The colors are like no other, they swim and leap, they trickle and embellish! And yet you choose to fixate your eyes on the small fly which has landed on it! Why do you do such a thing? -C. JoyBell C.
There is a relationship between the eye contacts we make and the perceptions that we create in our heads, a relationship between the sound of another's voice and the emotions that we feel in our hearts, a relationship between our movements in space all around us and the magnetic pulls we can create between others and ourselves. All of these things (and more) make up the magic of every ordinary day and if we are able to live in this magic, to feel and to dwell in it, we will find ourselves living with magic every day. These are the white spaces in life, the spaces in between the written lines, the cracks in which the sunlight filters into. Some of us swim in the overflowing of the wine glass of life, we stand and blink our eyes in the sunlight reaching unseen places, we know where to find the white spaces, we live in magic. -C. JoyBell C.
There is a sacrifice behind every success and every achievement. -Euginia Herlihy
There is a very thin line between a believer, an evangelist and a fanatic. God, please guide me against imposing my beliefs on others and help me realise when needed to serve as an example to humanity. God, as I am not done with learning, please remind me always that regardless of our religious backgrounds we are all from one God. Amen. -Gloria D. Gonsalves
There is always a choice. No choice is still a choice. -Chiemezie Anyaeji
There is always a TRUTH to be revealed in any situation where your emotions have shifted. -Molly Friedenfeld
There is both joy and suffering on planet Earth because this beautiful world is a world of duality - a world of opposites. There is an opposite side to everything. -Rhonda Byrne
There is enough knowledge in the books to explain the existing, your knowledge must inspire what is possible. -Amit Kalantri
There is great power in our words, because they are thoughts to which we have given additional energy by speaking them aloud so another person can know them. -Molly Friedenfeld
There is more competition to achieve a job, but very less competition to achieve the glory. -Amit Kalantri
There is no "one" way to be a perfect leader, but there are a million ways to be a good one. -Mark W. Boyer
there is no gift or asset that is so precious than to have another 24hours to prove how worthy or not our existence under the sun is. leave a distinctive footprint each day -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
There is no happiness without hard work -Joanne Lipman and Melanie Kupchynsky
There is no playing safe with me any longer. I only take huge risks. I know this means I can lose big time, but so long as there is a chance that I will win big time, I will take it -Sahndra Fon Dufe
There is no power like that of prevailing prayer - of Abraham pleading for Sodom, Jacob wrestling in the stillness of the night, Moses standing in the breach, Hannah intoxicated with sorrow, David heartbroken with remorse and grief, Jesus in sweat and blood. Add to this list from the records of the church your personal observation and experience, and always there is cost of passion unto blood.  Such prayer prevails. It turns ordinary mortals into men of power. It brings power. It brings fire. It brings rain. It brings life. It brings God. -Samuel Chadwick
There is no rest in the heart of God until He knows that you are at resh in His grace. -Lloyd John Ogilvie
There is no such thing as a "broken family." Family is family, and is not determined by marriage certificates, divorce papers, and adoption documents. Families are made in the heart. The only time family becomes null is when those ties in the heart are cut. If you cut those ties, those people are not your family. If you make those ties, those people are your family. And if you hate those ties, those people will still be your family because whatever you hate will always be with you. -C. JoyBell C.
There is no such thing as a problem without a gift for you in its hands. -Richard Bach
There is no there---there is only here. -Florence Scovel Shinn
There is no waste of time, just a person's haste to show his taste at the test of the time. -Anuj Somany
There is no way to peace, peace is the only way -Mahatma Gandhi
There is nothing wrong with feeling cold in Alaska at -70 degrees. It's when you feel nothing at all that it times to panic -Sergeant Major
There is only one way to avoid criticism: do nothing, say nothing, and be nothing. –Aristotle
There is so much beauty in different women – thin, big, normal, tall, short, medium, long hair, short hair, etc. Only narrow-mindedness can define it all in one woman. -Gloria D. Gonsalves
There is so much good in the worst of us, And so much bad in the best of us, That it hardly behooves any of us To talk about the rest of us. -Edward Wallis Hoch
There is some kind of a sweet innocence in being human- in not having to be just happy or just sad- in the nature of being able to be both broken and whole, at the same time. -C. JoyBell C.
There is something beautiful about all scars of whatever nature. A scar means the hurt is over, the wound is closed and healed, done with. -Harry Crews
There is something simply beautiful and simply innocent, in being human. It is just so innocent and beautiful. I love it. -C. JoyBell C.
There is that low level existing before reaching to the peak. -Ezekiel Mosoatsi
There is this certain rawness of soul that puts the polished ones on edge. Some of us just step out and the sunlight illuminates our bones, nerves, veins, cells! And that's just it, we're just like that! Then the others are tinted, polished, honed and well-contemplated; when they see you walk in and they can see all of your bones, even the tiniest ones, illuminated and outlined by the sunlight, it makes them feel shaded-in, it makes them feel hidden, it makes them turn their faces away. The way you bleed yourself all over the lines just makes it too uncomfortable for them, I guess. -C. JoyBell C.
There seems to be a mountain of obstacles preventing people from being where their hearts want to be. It is so painful to watch and experience. The astonishing thing is that the battle for survival has become so "normal" that few people really believe that it can be different...Oh how important is discipline, community, prayer, silence, caring presence, simple listening, adoration, and deep, lating faithful friendship. We all want it so much, and still the powers suggesting that all of that is fantasy are enormous. But we have to replace the battle for power with the battle to create space for the spirit. -Henri J.M. Nouwen
There was an enjoyment to being alive, he felt, that because of an underlying meaninglessness–like how a person alone for too long cannot feel comfortable when with others; cannot neglect that underlying the feeling of belongingness is the certainty, really, of loneliness, and nothingness, and so experiences life in that hurried, worthless way one experiences a mistake–he could no longer get at. -Tao Lin
There was no escaping what he had realized as he fought for warmth in the night. With or without him,the moon and the wind would go on, rising and falling. The land would keep stretching ahead until it hit the sea. People would keep dying. It made no difference if Harold walked, or trembled, or stayed at home. -Rachel Joyce
There was no lasting happiness ...You just need to be grateful when it comes ...  There was no eternal sadness ...You just need to be patient until it goes So...whatever happens, life must go on .. Just live and love your life ....because we are not immortal .. # andry_lavigne -andry lavigne
There were millions of different infinities and they weren’t only measured in time, but in people.  And in each one, I could find a reason to matter forever. -Mackie Burt
There will be a few times in your life when all your instincts will tell you to do something, something that defies logic, upsets your plans, and may seem crazy to others. When that happens, you do it. Listen to your instincts and ignore everything else. Ignore logic, ignore the odds, ignore the complications, and just go for it. -Judith McNaught
There will be haters, there will be doubters, there will be non-believers, and then there will be you proving them wrong. -Unknown 21
There will be rough nights but joy really does come in the morning. -Tyler Perry
There will never be complete satisfaction in the life, satisfaction is an illusion, there is only heroism. -Amit Kalantri
There's a lot of talk these days about giving children self-esteem. It's not something you can give; it's something they have to build. -Randy Pausch
There's a very positive relationship between people's ability to accomplish any task and the time they're willing to spend on it. -Joyce Brothers
There's always gonna be someone who doesn't like you. -Ariana Grande Butera
There's no bonus to seeing life through a dirty lens, even if it feels more real. -Sally Hanan
There's no heaven on earth. God would have to guide her through the problems. -Jennifer Hudson Taylor
there's no need to worry about your future as long as you holding tight your aims and do your best to make it come true.. -Adit Yomi Pratama Rajaya
There's no room for anything but joy and fear, and joy ruled the house. Fear lived in the shack out back! -Stephen King
There's nothing worse than the one that got away.  It haunts you for weeks like a bad dream, eats away at your psyche like a termite on softened wood. -Bruce   Littlefield
there's only one truth! -Felix Y. Siauw
There's only so far we can step backward in one day -Leisenring
There's room at the top because so few are willing to pay the extra price to get there. -Richie Norton
There's some good in this world and it's worth fighting for. -J.R.R. Tolkien
There's something about the flower that grows through the rocks, the pavement; through logs and stone or brick walls... all roses are beautiful; but the rose that emerges unexpectedly through the asphalt has a beauty of soul. The flower that reaches through the brokenness of the wall has a beauty of spirit. You stop to look and not only to look but to cherish! Somewhere along its journey, it decided that it would reach for what was unseen, keep going in the direction of something that wasn't felt, it decided that it would be. That it would become. And it did. And there is something irreplaceable about that. -C. JoyBell C.
There's that day when you realize that everything that happened before that one person found you, probably happened to prepare you and to prepare everything, for that person's arrival. It's not that everything suddenly "makes sense" but it's more that you understand why this didn't work and that didn't work and you fell into this ditch and you broke a certain bone somewhere. It's so they'd find you. Or so that you'd find them. So you'd find each other. -C. JoyBell C.
Therefore, reincarnation is an experience of the Ego, co-created by its ignorance, by not realizing that what reincarnates in the universe is God (Love) through his Sons, in an infinite multidimensional experience! (If you understand this, you already passed the final exam -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
There’s beauty in letting go. It doesn’t have to be so painful. -Tessa Emily Hall
There’s nothing you can’t do if you want it bad enough. -Danielle Sibarium
There’s nothing you could do to make me any more or less gay, Dad. It’s who I am.” “It’s not who you are. It’s part of who you are, but it’s not who you are. You’re so much more than just that, and I’m proud of you. All of you." ~ Lucas' Father -Madison  Parker
They chose to be different.  And in doing so, they proved that through struggle, sacrifice and service, staggering personal transformation is possible. -Adam Braun
They copied my product, they copied my strategies yet they failed miserably in the business, because they couldn't copy my professionalism. -Amit Kalantri
They don't have to know the real you for you to keep being that amazing you! Don't let someone's negative spirit disrupt or corrupt yours. Be you for...you. God is the one that you want to see who you really are. -Marala Scott
They say a good love is one that sits you down, gives you a drink of water, and pats you on top of the head. But I say a good love is one that casts you into the wind, sets you ablaze, makes you burn through the skies and ignite the night like a phoenix; the kind that cuts you loose like a wildfire and you can't stop running simply because you keep on burning everything that you touch! I say that's a good love; one that burns and flies, and you run with it! -C. JoyBell C.
They say that life is about balance. That it trades one sorrow for one joy and so forth until it finds some kind of harmony. Well, I want none of it. I've never been as dead as I was when I was balanced. I don't want life to be contained. I want it unbound, inspired. Alive. -Ghalib Shiraz Dhalla
They say two wrongs do not make a right  But when someone gets it wrong and you don’t correct him, it’s also not right Keep your game tight And don’t just fight any fight, always fight a good fight -Rhymesonny
They would hit a man in the water, if they were hungry, even if the man had no smell of fish blood nor of fish slime on him. “Ay,” the old man said. “Galanos. Come on galanos. -Ernest Hemingway
They, the selfish ones, are like spiritual lame people who use other beings as crutches to walk on the path of life. And they are the Blind of Spirit who never find Love, because they do not know how to love and do not let themselves be loved -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
Things end. People leave. And you know what? Life goes on. Besides, if bad things didn't happen, how would you be able to feel the good ones? -Elizabeth Scott
Think about your dreams. Think of every detail of what you want to manifest. Imagine every person included in your plans. Sense all the emotions that you want to happen when your dreams come true. Visualize where will you be when your dreams already happened. Breathe the air where you want to manifest it. Dream. Imagine. Believe. There's no more truer than this. It is what it is. -Happy Positivity
Think outside the square. Think for yourself don't just follow the herd. Think multidisciplinary! Problems by definition, cross many academic disciplines. -Lucas Remmerswaal
Think, dream and expect great things. For would you rather be correct in your perception? Or would you rather be exceptional in your life? -Christopher Babson
Thinking before taking actions is useful only if you are going to take action, otherwise you are wasting time and insulting your mind. -Amit Kalantri
Thinking is no more or no less than asking questions. To improve your thinking, improve the quality of the questions you ask. -Stephanie Mbida
Thinking minds doesn't get bored. -Amit Kalantri
Thinking something does not make it true. Wanting something does not make it real. -Michelle Hodkin
This generation of Nigerians and indeed the future generation have no country other than Nigeria, we shall stay and salvage it together! -Gen. Muhammadu Buhari
This is a time when all of God's people need to keep their eyes and their Bibles wide open. We must ask God for discernment as never before. -David Jeremiah
This is heaven my child. -Santosh Kalwar
This is the key to life: To expect everything to be given to you from above, yet to be genuinely surprised and forever grateful, when they are. Expecting all good things to be yours, while not knowing how to take anything for granted. If there may be a key in life, this is the key. -C. JoyBell C.
This is what made the difference, they used social networking for entertainment and I used it for business. -Amit Kalantri
This is your moment now. Go for it. LIVE. Choose to be happy. Choose the life you always wanted. Never settle for anything nor less than any good. You deserve to be happy. You deserve to enjoy this life. For God sake, enjoy living your life to the fullest. -Happy Positivity
This rose of pearl-coated infinity transforms the diseased slums of a broken heart into a palace made of psalms and gold. -Aberjhani
This world and everything in it is only temporary; eternity is out there, we swim in it. And within our temporary bodies we carry inside of us eternity. There are but atoms separating us from the everlasting. Merely atoms. -C. JoyBell C.
This world can’t be all that bad. Sure, bad stuff happens—but there’s good hidden in every bad situation. You just have to find it. -Tessa Emily Hall
This world is not a wonderful place where unfortunately many evil things happen; but this world is a terrible place where fortunately many miracles and other wonderful things happen. -C. JoyBell C.
Those not chasing their dreams should stay out of the way of those who are. -Tim Fargo
Those that yield are not always weak -Jacqueline Carey
Those who see the impossible as unattainable are destined to reside in mediocrity -Mark W Boyer Devlyn Lycurg
Though life may not always go the way you please, remember to always see the forest through the trees. -Jennifer Sodini
Thought and passion = successful manifesting of wishes... -Stephen Richards
Thought I wanted overnight success, until I achieved it through hard work and the refusal to back down! What you earn, you keep. -A.M. Hudson
Thoughts close more doors then they open. This causes limitation.  Action opens more doors then it closes. This results in liberation.  I suggest spending less time on trying to change thoughts and more time on the action steps you will take to prove your current thoughts wrong. Once you take consistent, habitual action the thoughts change, spontaneously. -Charles F. Glassman
Thoughts frame your portrait, action paints it. -Charles F. Glassman
Thoughts make sense not really with the beautiful rhyming on the words part,but with their real meaning touching a beautiful person's heart. -Anuj Somany
Three words for a writer: Make me care. -Buffy Andrews
Through being fired I was given the perfect circumstances to finally answer my calling and live my dream, and I remain grateful to this day for that television network firing me. Without them, I would have refused the call to follow my dream, and I would have missed living the most exciting and fulfilling journey of my life. -Rhonda Byrne
Through depression and many other dark low emotions, our Light dims and our immune system declines along with it. White blood cells are the physical Light of our body. Colors can be used to heal, restore and to uplift us. -Jacqueline Ripstein
Through the trials and tribulations of life come the openness to receive greatness. -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
Throughout your life, there is a voice only you can hear. A voice which mythologists label "the call." A call to the value of your life. The choice of risk and individual bliss over the known and secure. You may choose not to hear your spirit. You may prefer to build a life within the compound, to avoid risk. It is possible to find happiness within a familiar box, a life of comfort and control. Or, you may choose to be open to new experiences, to leave the limits of your conditioning, to hear the call. Then you must act. If you never hear it perhaps nothing is lost. If you hear it and ignore it, your life is lost. -Jennifer James
Thus is the nature of love: that you must use it! A love unused is not love! If it is something that sits on the shelf that you don't know what to do with, it is not true to the nature of love! Use love! -C. JoyBell C.
Tidak ada niat baik yang boleh dicapai dengan cara buruk, dan sebaliknya tidak ada niat buruk yang berubah baik meski dilakukan dengan cara-cara baik. -Tere Liye
Tidak ada yang lebih menipu daripada kerendahan hati. Seringkali itu hanya menjadi ungkapan semata, dan terkadang justru disampaikan untuk menyombongkan diri secara diam-diam. -Jane Austen
Tidak semua yang kita inginkan harus terjadi seketika. Kita tidak hidup di dunia dongeng. -Tere Liye
Till the time u dont value urslf , the world wont take a step ahead ! Thinking matters ! -Suchet chaturvedi
Time bows to authentic commitment, and it stretches to accommodate it. -Will Hewett
Time changes all things; there is no reason why language should escape this universal law -Ferdinand de Saussure
Time is too short in this one life, to be able to do everything,  but it definitely is long enough at least to be able to develop the  will to do anything &amp; everything... -Sujit Lalwani
Time Never waits for anyone, Everybody waits for time -Stanly Stephen
Time of difficulty test our faith, our fortitude and our strenght. During these times, the level of our imaan becomes manifest -Yasmin Mogahed
Time...you might not notice it but stay alert because today and tomorrow ll never be the same, so be strong and Vigilant in every chance you get -Otto M Monama
To achieve peace, it is crucial to eliminate unnecessary bureaucracy that prevents peace processes from advancing. -Widad Akrawi
To ascend you must rise above, and I believe in the idea of keeping your “feet in the clouds and your head in the stars”. -Jennifer Sodini
To assess the quality of thoughts of people, don't listen to their words, but watch their actions. -Amit Kalantri
To be bold is to be filled with magick, genius and power... -Stephen Richards
To be immortal and then die -Jean-Luc Godard
To be nervous doesn't mean you are a failure or a wimp, simply shows the reality of the journey you are embarking. -Euginia Herlihy
To be selfless, you would give charity anonymously, walj softly on the earth, and look out for others-even total strangers-before you look out for yourself. For the Arab mind, the self is an obstacle, an impediment, in humanity's quest foe real progress. -Tahir Shah
to be successful, you have to be out there, you have to hit the ground running -Richard Branson
To buy a cake... to howl at the moon... to know true happiness... I am happy. -C. JoyBell C.
To change one's life: 1. Start immediately, 2. Do it flamboyantly, 3. No exceptions. -William James
To create a new business that makes money, and more significantly, employs others, and more significantly, gives a product to a customer that improves their life, is our greatest challenge, our greatest opportunity, and the greatest gift, far greater than any charity that we can give our fellow person. -Paul Zane Pilzer
To find what you seek in the road of life,  the best proverb of all is that which says: "Leave no stone unturned. -Edward Bulwer-Lytton
To forgive is the highest, most beautiful form of love. In return, you will receive untold peace and happiness -Robert Muller
To get see food, You need a fishing rod. To get love food, You need a loving heart. -James Josue
To keep your conscience at peace and your respect at high, don't follow those orders which make no sense. -Amit Kalantri
To know a species, look at its fears. To know yourself, look at your fears. Fear in itself is not important, but fear stands there and points you in the direction of things that are important. Don't be afraid of your fears, they're not there to scare you; they're there to let you know that something is worth it. -C. JoyBell C.
To live is to change, and to change often is to become more perfect. -John Henry Newman
To live life on your own terms, you've got to understand that you're going to get it wrong sometimes, but you'll have power of knowing that you are giving it everything you've got and blazing your own trail. -Steven Aitchison
To live without philosophizing is in truth the same as keeping the eyes closed without attempting to open them. -René Descartes
To make a change, you must be: willing to commit, willing to change, willing to have an open mind, and willing to take action! -Tae Yun Kim
To me, beauty is about being comfortable in your own skin. -Ellen DeGeneres
To me, empathy and compassion are among the bravest of emotions ... and faith, the bravest of convictions. -Gerard de Marigny
To me, the word wisdom means ancient knowledge.  It’s the kind of knowledge you not only see but feel when you look into the eyes of an elephant or stop for a moment to marvel at the deep wrinkles on its skin, both of which I believe contain the truths learned from each intentional step their feet and those of their ancestors have placed upon the earth. -Molly Friedenfeld
To perform you need practice, to practice you need passion. -Amit Kalantri
To prepare for the mountains develop mind, body, will and spirit as strong as a sword, soft as a pillow and fluid as water. -Jeffrey Rasley
To say that a being who is sentient has no interest in continuing to live is like saying that a being with eyes has no interest in continuing to see. Death—however “humane”—is a harm for humans and nonhumans alike. -Gary L. Francione
To Succeed, you must reach for the stars, and let your imagination find its own path -Tahir Shah
To the issues of friendship, love, business and war, "surprise" is the optimistic solution. -Amit Kalantri
To the world you may be one person but to one person you may be the world. -Bill Wilson
To think outside the box, first you need to know what YOU &amp; OTHERS are thinking inside. -Yuikan Shirik
To those who are given much, much is expected. -Maya Angelou
To walk in Time, perhaps, as men walk on long roads... to see the lie of old and even forgotten lands, to behold ancient men walking, and to hear their languages as they spoke them, in the days before the days, when tongues of forgotten lineage were heard in kingdoms long fallen by the shores of the Atlantic." -- J.R.R. Tolkien: The Lost Road -J.R.R. Tolkien
To walk quietly until the miracle in everything speaks is poetry, whether we write it down or not. -Mark Nepo
To your parents you are still that innocent baby, and sometimes even you will need your father's hand and your mother's lap. -Amit Kalantri
Today I am leading because yesterday I was reading. -Amit Kalantri
Today I will find something beautiful. Delicate pink blossoms on a cherry tree. The dove resting near the lemon buds. Sunbeams smiling from sky to earth. Smiling on me. "Creating" in BREATHE IN -Eileen Granfors
Today is a good day. Tomorrow will be a good day too. The next day will be even better. Why? ...Why not? It is what you make it. -Love The Stacks Bookstore
Today is my last day as a human, tomorrow I am going to be a hero. -Amit Kalantri
Today is the day you have gone away and today is also the day I have died. Lets mourn for me, her and my love. -Crash
Today they are mocking at you; tomorrow they will be mocked at by themselves. -Vinita Kinra
Tomorrow has not invited you yet, so LIVE for today! Tomorrow is near, yet so far away. Choose this day to smile, laugh, love unconditionally, and be happy within. -Stephanie Lahart
Tomorrow is always hiding -Johnnie Dent Jr.
Tongues in trees, books in running brooks, sermons in stones, and good in everything. -William Shakespeare
Tonight I saw Jesus with the eyes on my face. He looks half lion and half man. But not more like a lion and not more like a man, rather the same, I have never seen anything like the face of Jesus before, %100 one thing but %100 another thing: a lion man!” “Where did you see Him at?” “On the surface of my blanket as I lay in bed. He was suddenly drawn onto it, like a sketch, and that same moment I knew He was showing His face to me, finally.” “Why do you think He did that?” “I think He thought it was about time. -C. JoyBell C.
Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our fears. –Les Brown
Too many of us spend too much time worrying about how long we are going to live rather than focusing on how we live. People cannot live forever, but memories can. Remember that with every breath and your life will change. -Comic Strip Mama
Too many people are missing their destiny a year at a time because they're too scared to think in decades!"  (p. 127) -Pete Greig
Tranquility is a Choice. So is Anxiety. The entire world around us may be in Turmoil. But if we want to be Peaceful within, WE CAN.-RVM -Rvm
Transient guests are we. -Hideyuki Kikuchi
Transition and change - guaranteed to cause anxiety. That anxiety shows itself in physical and behavioral ways, but also with thoughts (sometimes really crazy ones). This is the (primitive/automatic) brain's way of keeping us safe from the danger of change. We end up getting so involved with the feeling and thoughts of anxiety, we get distracted from the "danger". If we trust the anxiety then our primitive brain has succeeded in "protecting" us from the danger. I suggest not believing, trusting, or taking direction from the anxiety and continue your pursuits forward. Then, you will be amazed at your ability to attract and reveal your true capabilities, your light, your magic. -Charles F. Glassman
Travel Moulds A Man,People Mould His Wisdom And Experiences Mould His LIFE...! -Sujit Lalwani
Treat a sick man with the medicine and a sad man with the music. -Amit Kalantri
Treat your advices like your money, don't give it to others unless they ask for it. -Amit Kalantri
Treat your clients with high professionalism and they will no more negotiate with you. -Amit Kalantri
Triumph belongs to thought. Change your thinking and you change your life! You become new! -J.P. Vaswani
True beauty is not related to what color your hair is or what color your eyes are. True beauty is about who you are as a human being, your principles, your moral compass. -Ellen DeGeneres
True beauty, the kind that doesn't fade or wash off, takes time. It takes incredible endurance. It is the slow drip that creates the stalactite, the shaking of the Earth that creates mountains, the constant pounding of the waves that breaks up the rocks and smooths the rough edges. And from the violence, the furor, the raging of the winds, the roaring of the waters, something better emerges, something that would have otherwise never existed. And so we endure. We have faith that there is purpose. We hope for things we can't see. We believe there are lessons in loss, power in love, and that we have within us the potential for a beauty so magnificent, our bodies can't contain it. -Amy Harmon
True friends are always together in spirit." Lucy Maud Montgomery -Award Winning Author Dianna Bellerose
True happiness is to enjoy the present, without anxious dependence upon the future, not to amuse ourselves with either hopes or fears but to rest satisfied with what we have, which is sufficient, for he that is so wants nothing. The greatest blessings of mankind are within us and within our reach. A wise man is content with his lot, whatever it may be, without wishing for what he has not. -Seneca
True happiness isn't something that is achieved only once and continues; it is something we must strive for again and again. -Terry Lander
True humanity demands that every human should be loved equally, but if that's not possible for you then at least love whoever you wants to but respect everyone. -Amit Kalantri
True kindness is an anchor that drops deep into the heart and you feel it while it’s dropping. Meanwhile, untrue kindness is merely a condition of the face. -C. JoyBell C.
True love can come more than once. -Tyler Perry
True peace and happiness can be found when the human mind is attuned to the Universal mind.(consciousness) -Dev Samudre.
True success cannot be achieved until you have experienced failure -Brian A. Leslie
True worship can only take place when we agree to God sitting not only on His throne in the center of the universe, but on the throne that stands in the center of our heart. -Robert Colman
Trust at the most basic level is nothing other than someone having faith in us, and the belief that we will do the right thing.  Is that not a compliment of the highest order? -Sherri Lynea Gerek
TRUST YOUR FEELINGS BEFORE YOU TRUST ANYONE ELSE. YOUR FEELINGS ARE YOUR DIVINE GUIDANCE. IF ANYTHING MAKES YOU FEEL GOOD, THEN DO IT. IF YOU DO NOT GET A GOOD FEELING, THEN IT IS NOT FOR YOU. -Premlatha Rajkumar
Truth   *  I had a long heart-to-heart talk  with a politician  and a 14 month old baby  the baby spoke more truth   than the politician  _________________  2014(c)rassool jibraeel snyman  "The Poetic Assassin -rassool jibraeel snyman
Truth demands progress and change, and is always for the benefit of all souls—even if you must travel through a difficult learning process or make a shift as a result of facing the truth. -Molly Friedenfeld
TRUTH serves a great purpose for all that want to see. It will help uncover your life’s mission in order to reveal what your soul wants you to be. -Molly Friedenfeld
Truth will allow you to keep your eyes on the road and never have to look back to see if the lie you told is following you. -Kassi Pontious
Try it before you doubt it, because it might just be for you -Rayvon L. Browne
Try to strengthen your steps, move a little bit faster towards your dream. -Euginia Herlihy
Tuhanku Yang Maha Lembut, ... Maafkanlah aku yang sering kesal dan memarahi diriku sendiri yang tak kunjung selesai membuat kesalahan. Aku tahu, sulit bagiku untuk berlaku sepenuhnya damai, jika hatiku masih menyembunyikan sedikit keburukan. Tuhan, tenagailah ketegasanku untuk kembali ke kesucian jiwaku, agar aku mematang dengan anggun. Aamiin -Mario Teguh
Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn't do than by the ones you did do, so throw off the bowlines, sail away from safe harbor, catch the trade winds in your sails.  Explore, Dream, Discover. –Mark Twain
Two kinds of people have many friends, one with bank balance and other with boldness. -Amit Kalantri
Two roads diverged in a wood, and I—I took the one less traveled by, And that has made all the difference.  –Robert Frost
Two steps forward...one step back...I've always hated that old cliche too...I believe that we should all be able to dance through life and only change the tempo now and then. -Isabelle Rowan
U may not be perfect in an aspect but try as much as possible to be efficient in per aspect. -Bukoye micheal
uhanku Yang Maha Penyayang, Engkau memerintahkan agar aku memuliakan orang tua dan keluargaku, ...dan agar aku memungkinkan pencapaian impian hati mereka. Aku tahu bahwa aku tak mungkin menyembunyikan dari pengetahuan Mu, tentang kerinduan hatiku untuk mampu melakukan yang Kau perintahkan itu. Tuhan, aku mohon Engkau membuka tabir yang selama ini menutupi rezekiku. Mampukanlah aku membahagiakan keluargaku. Aamiin -Mario Teguh
Un pedazo de roca no es más que polvo endurecido, hasta que se revela su historia.  Un ser  humano no es más que un puñado de células, hasta que descubre su alma... -Mauricio Chaves Mesén
Unfortunately, life is unfair and not all babies are brought into the world with the same amount of anticipation and affection, as others. No matter what anyone says; we are really not all given an equal start at life. And so what must children be made up of, to come into a world like this one? Children must be made up of silk. They must be brought up with a serenity in their skin but a bulletproof strength in their souls. This is the new breed of children. Ones that are soft to the touch but are truly unbreakable. And unbreakable in a beautiful way; not in a lost way. -C. JoyBell C.
University can teach you skill and give you opportunity, but it can't teach you sense, nor give you understanding. Sense and understanding are produced within one's soul. -C. JoyBell C.
until the stone becomes soft, it cannot attach itself to the wall. -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
until we assign a time bound purposeful task to each day, each day we wake up would be regarded as a free day;free days are however fee days which we shall pay later -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Until we see the 'this- advantage' in the disadvantage we shall always be looking at the disadvantages in life. life does not present us with disadvantages, it gives us 'this- advantages' to take. It is only because of excuses and low courage that we regard 'this advantages' as disadvantages -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
use fear; don't fear fear -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Use your youth to do something useful or unique or ultimate. -Amit Kalantri
Usually the opposite of what we fear is our greatest fear. -Charles F. Glassman
Usually when someone is angry we hear their angry words. Instead, try hearing the unspoken, “I am scared, I am frustrated, I am insecure, I am vulnerable, I am threatened. -Charles F. Glassman
Vanity occurs when we think we are invincible. Death occurs to tell us we are not. -Vinita Kinra
Veganism is an act of nonviolent defiance. It is our statement that we reject the notion that animals are things and that we regard sentient nonhumans as moral persons with the fundamental moral right not to be treated as the property or resources of humans. -Gary L. Francione
Veganism is not a "sacrifice." It is a joy. -Gary L. Francione
Veganism is not about giving anything up or losing anything; it is about gaining the peace within yourself that comes from embracing nonviolence and refusing to participate in the exploitation of the vulnerable -Gary L. Francione
Vegetarian is better; vegan is the best — A cow says. -Vinita Kinra
Victory is possible. Genuine healing can occur if we're willing to allow the Father to set us free. -Charles F. Stanley
waktu kita di bumi ini sakral adanya, dan kita seharusnya merayakan setiap detiknya -Paulo Coelho
Walau tak ada yang sempurna, hidup ini indah begini adanya. Filosofi Kopi -Dee
Walk forward on your path; don't look back. Walking forward puts you closer to your goals. Looking backwards steals what's in front of you. Isaiah M. Liverman
Walk in kindness toward the Earth and every living being. Without kindness and compassion for all of Mother Nature’s creatures, there can be no true joy; no internal peace, no happiness. Happiness flows from caring for all sentient beings as if they were your own family, because in essence they are. We are all connected to each other and to the Earth. -Sylvia Dolson
Wanderess, Wanderess, weave us a story of seduction and ruse. Heroic be the Wanderess, the world be her muse.' ...I jot this phrase of invocation in my old leather-bound notebook on a bright, cold morning at the Café **** in Paris, and with it I’m inspired to take the reader back to the time I first met and became acquainted with the girl I call The Wanderess—as well as a famous adventurer named Saul, the Son of Solarus. -Roman Payne
Wandering is never waste, dear boy,' he said. 'While you wander you will find much to wonder about, and wonder is the first step to creation. -Pearl S. Buck
Wanna know the fastest way to unhappiness? Spend your time judging other people's reasons for happiness! That way, you'll quickly lose your own! The next time you look back at yourself (when you've taken a break from judging others) you'll think "Oh! Where did MY happiness go?" because you were too busy thinking that gay people shouldn't be happy... or, you know, something like that. -C. JoyBell C.
Want to change the world? Upset the status quo? This takes more than run-of-the-mill relationships. You need to make people dream the same dream that you do. -Guy Kawasaki
Wanting help, I reached out to serve.  Seeking happiness, I smiled and offered comfort.  Yearning for love, I showed love.  And now I understand.  My life was never about me, it was always about you. -Richelle E. Goodrich
Warren Buffett chuckled and said to me "I hope it's not my bad habits" Good Habits once established are just as hard to break as bad habits and bad habits are easier to abandon today than tomorrow. So what are you going to do about it? -Lucas Remmerswaal
Watch me go. Watch me. Because you said i couldn't. Because you thought I wouldn't. Go on, cry now. Cry. -Kellie Elmore
Watch out for each other. Love everyone and forgive everyone, including yourself. Forgive your anger. Forgive your guilt. Your shame. Your sadness. Embrace and open up your love, your joy, your truth, and most especially your heart. -Jim Henson
We all have cracks and tears and shattered glass within our souls. Some have more than others. We do not wish to seek one who has none; but we wish to find the one who can say "look at me, look at this." We wish to find the one who sees every bit of broken glass and who will put those pieces into the palms of our hands and say "please keep them." And we wish to be that kind of person, too. This is how it should be. -C. JoyBell C.
We All Have Light In our Lives, You Just Need To Find The Switch. -Official Barbie Michelle
We all have something redeemable in us, no matter how small." - Laura Armstrong, A Human Element -Donna Galanti
We all judge. But when I realize that judgmental thoughts and actions are merely my primitive nature trying to "protect" me from being one-upped or making sure I am not one-upped, it makes it easier to laugh at my silliness. � -Charles F. Glassman
We all must do what we have to do to get where we need to be. Ultimately, you make that final decision yourself. -Mark Boyer
We all program our gadgets- computers, mobiles; but we don't program our Mind in such a way that we can REJOICE and BE HAPPY. -Rvm
We all take a different path to the same place.  Why we took the path we did will always be a mystery. -Michael R. Krozer
We all were courageous in  the starting moments, few of us stayed courageous till the final moments and the world called them successful men. -Amit Kalantri
We are all equal in the fact that we are all different. We are all the same in the fact that we will never be the same. We are united by the reality that all colours and all cultures are distinct &amp; individual. We are harmonious in the reality that we are all held to this earth by the same gravity. We don't share blood, but we share the air that keeps us alive. I will not blind myself and say that my black brother is not different from me. I will not blind myself and say that my brown sister is not different from me. But my black brother is he as much as I am me. But my brown sister is she as much as I am me. -C. JoyBell C.
We are all need to be creative in life because we are running an endless race and we need to bring something new, fresh and something enticing on the table. -Euginia Herlihy
We are but one of many ideas against a greater imagination. -James C. Emlund
we are constantly searching from being afraid of finding Thanos Grigoriou
We are like those oysters in many ways...Irritants, or foreign objects, infiltrate our lives in the form of bad choices, jealousy, fear, deep loss, and countless other challenges I could name. We choose how to handle things that come, either by rallying our strength and faith and finding a way to go on, or by giving into the pressure and giving up.  When we choose to stand up inside and protect our spirits, our hearts, and the essence of who we are, we produce a substance similar to what the oyster produces to form the layers of the pearl. In us, it's called character, integrity, grace, courage, and the ability to love ourselves and others, with no strings attached. -Stacy Hawkins Adams
We are limited by knowledge, not by courage. -Amit Kalantri
We are much better able to evaluate someone else's behavior than we are our own. -Alan E. Nelson
We are no longer in an age of needing to be approved and edited by larger companies before we are allowed to share our creations.  This is the era of Do-It-Yourself.  Research, investigate and try.  You owe it to yourself, to your art and to the Creator to find a way to share that which you are and that which can help, aid, inspire and encourage others.   Go for it and prepare to win, because you get what you prepare for. -Lyra Mae Butterfly
we are not leaving anyone behind we have to stick togheter in order to stay safe. -Allan Frewin Jones
We are not perfect. We are here to learn. Earth is one big classroom and God is our heavenly guidance counselor and teacher. -Molly Friedenfeld
We are social beings and confidence is framed by our interactions in the social world. It's rather difficult to be confident or shy on a desert island with no one to share your coconuts! -Gary Wood
we are thankful to have someone who really accept the bad things about us, and sometimes we hurt them but they never give up on us. -aina aller
We are the authors of our destinies. No one can see the vision any clearer, believe in and work any harder to make it a reality more than the visionary. -Nike Campbell-Fatoki
We are the ones we've been waiting for. -Colin Beavan
We are the pioneers of the world; the advance-guard sent on through the wilderness of untried things... -Herman Melville
we attract what is happening in our lives -Rhonda Byrne
We attract what we are prepared to receive. -Charles F. Glassman
We become what we think about. –Earl Nightingale
We believe in ordinary acts of bravery, in the courage that drives one person to stand up for another. -Veronica Roth
We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light. –Plato
We can no more justify using nonhumans as human resources than we can justify human slavery. Animal use and slavery have at least one important point in common: both institutions treat sentient beings exclusively as resources of others. That cannot be justified with respect to humans; it cannot be justified with respect to nonhumans—however “humanely” we treat them. -Gary L. Francione
We can not escape tragic roads. It is like grasping at the sun &amp; trying to catch air. We must take one step at-a-time. Keep going. -Ace Antonio Hall
We can reach untainted experiential freedom, by living in the moment as it is—without contemplation. Here we find the possibility of freedom—of just being—living as our authentic self. We are our true nature. We are one and whole. -Jacqueline Simon Gunn
We can remove the veil that shrouds our understanding and made us forget who we truly are. When we understand the core self and live from the core self, the myth of separation, concepts of separation, color, religion, class, intelligence…all these fade away.  We are not our color.  We are not our religion.  We are not our sexual preference.  We are human beings.  We are spiritual beings. -Cassandra Blizzard
We can't be afraid of change. You may feel very secure in the pond that you are in, but if you never venture out of it, you will never know that there is such a thing as an ocean, a sea. Holding onto something that is good for you now, may be the very reason why you don't have something better. -C. JoyBell C.
We cannot face up to what lies ahead, without facing up to what lies within. -Eleesha
We cannot help where we are born or how we are raised," Tel Hesani said. "But we can reject the twisted beliefs of those around us if we need to. Our loved ones and elders don't always know what is best. A man should listen to his heart and make his own decisions about what is wrong and what is right. -Darren Shan
We do not need to eat animals, wear animals, or use animals for entertainment purposes, and our only defense of these uses is our pleasure, amusement, and convenience. -Gary L. Francione
We don't like security rules and laws, but without them men will be animals, perhaps the most dangerous animals. -Amit Kalantri
We doubt in others, what is in fact in ourselves. The skeletons in your own closet are the things that scare you the most about others; people who come from a background of lying are suspicious of lying in others and so on and so forth. The most trusting of people, are not people who have never been betrayed or who have never felt pain; but the most trusting of people are those who in themselves do not find those things worthy of that blame. We see the world through the eyes of the condition of our own souls. -C. JoyBell C.
We fight not for glory nor for wealth nor honours; but only and alone we fight for freedom, which no good man surrenders but with his life. -Bernard De Linton
We follow the codes not because they bring gain, but because we loathe the people we would otherwise become. -Brandon Sanderson
We got teeth of  a man but appetite of a lion! -Vinita Kinra
We have soul contracts with every person in our lives to live in the vibration of truth. -Molly Friedenfeld
We have the Noble Desire to help others and benefit the world, without expecting any return or recognition. What makes us great is not our knowledge, skill, money, or power. What makes us great is not our knowledge, skill, money, or power. What makes us truly great is this noble desire, this passion that transcends all separation, goes beyond one's limitations, and wants to hug others and embrace the whole world. This is not something that we need to learn, because we already have it. It just needs to be acknowledged and awakened. -Ilchi Lee
We have to allow ourselves to be loved by the people who really love us, the people who really matter. Too much of the time, we are blinded by our own pursuits of people to love us, people that don't even matter, while all that time we waste and the people who do love us have to stand on the sidewalk and watch us beg in the streets! It's time to put an end to this. It's time for us to let ourselves be loved. -C. JoyBell C.
We have to Build Bridges of Peace Instead of building Walls of Wars. -Widad Akrawi
we hear  brilliant and great suggestions when failure comes our way -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
we hear the most brilliant ideas and suggestions we failure comes our way -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
We live in a world where your mistakes are usually seen over the right things you have done. -Irene Candungan
We make choices every day, some of them good, some of them bad. And if we are strong enough, we live with the consequences. -David Gemmell
we may always find a great and a beautiful city in the world for ourselves but the most precious and finest city to live in is our mind; a positive mind and a per second positive thoughts -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
we may have a better reflection of ourselves in the mirror depending on how thick the opaque substance behind it is; the lighter the substance, the poorer the image; the thicker the substance,the better the image. -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
We may have done what the devil said we did, but we are NOT who the devil says we are! -April Cofield Essix
We must balance conspicuous consumption with conscious capitalism. –Kevin Kruse
We must become the change we want to see. -Mahatma Gandhi
We must believe that we are gifted for something, and that this thing, at whatever cost, must be attained. –Marie Curie
We must not be defined by what we do, but we must be what and who we are, then only happen to do what we do! -C. JoyBell C.
We preach and practice brotherhood — not only of man but of all living beings — not on Sundays only but on all the days of the week. We believe in the law of universal justice — that our present condition is the result of our past actions and that we are not subjected to the freaks of an irresponsible governor, who is prosecutor and judge at the same time; we depend for our salvation on our own acts and deeds and not on the sacrificial death of an attorney. -Virchand Gandhi
We should always be clear that animal exploitation is wrong because it involves speciesism. And speciesism is wrong because, like racism, sexism, homophobia, anti-semitism, classism, and all other forms of human discrimination, speciesism involves violence inflicted on members of the moral community where that infliction of violence cannot be morally justified. But that means that those of us who oppose speciesism necessarily oppose discrimination against humans. It makes no sense to say that speciesism is wrong because it is like racism (or any other form of discrimination) but that we do not have a position about racism. We do. We should be opposed to it and we should always be clear about that. -Gary L. Francione
We should never be afraid of tears It washes our eyes, clears our vision and takes away our fears We should learn from the experiences that brought those tears So we can enjoy, the rest of our years -Rhymesonny
We should never present flesh as somehow morally distinguishable from dairy. To the extent it is morally wrong to eat flesh, it is as morally wrong — and possibly more morally wrong — to consume dairy -Gary L. Francione
We write and rewrite to construct the best, in life we make our life and when we commit mistakes we try again so we could be the best -Abaton Maynard Paul
We're all born with a unique gift, and it's up to us to find and exploit that gift. -Ikish Mullens
We're never called on to do what hurts. We just do what hurts out of ignorance and habit. Once we see what we're doing, we can stop. -Steve Hagen
We've all received our share of good fortune, so that's my definition of much. A single blessing is all the bounty in the world, and if you've been blessed at all you're meant to pass some of that on. You're meant to set a positive example. That's our responsibility" (20) - Denzel Washington, "So that We Might Follow -Denzel Washington
Weeping on loss only eats up your potential.... -Fawad
Well if God wanted a broken spirit out of me, He would get His wish. At this point in my life the only thing I could do was look up. -Michelle Sutton
What a grim feeling it is to come across a written line so exceptionally inspiring that your first reaction is, 'Criminy, why didn't I ever think to write that!' -Richelle E. Goodrich
What a lover’s heart knows let no man’s brain dispute. -Aberjhani
What do you say to a man that by his own admission has now soul? Why would you say anything? -Cormac McCarthy
What He said He would do He always did, and the things we already see fulfilled in His Word simply remind us that what He said about the future will take place just as surely. -David Jeremiah
What if it was easy? -Anabelle Valenzuela-Alarcon
What if man is not really a scoundrel, man in general, I mean, the whole race of mankind-then all the rest is prejudice, simply artificial terrors and there are no barriers and it's all as it should be. -Fyodor Dostoyevsky
What if the actual sin was that despite the fact of knowing how cruel and unfair this world is; we still bring children to life? -Sandra Chami Kassis
What if you already are the person you wish you were but you just don't know it yet? -Debra Formo
What if you could pick one day of your life, and everything would stop changing, every day would be similar and comparable to that one day, you'd always have the same people with you? If you could do that, would you do it? Would you pick that day and make that choice? We crave for things to stop changing, we wish that things would never change. But if we got what we wanted, there are so many things that are better, that we would never, ever know about. Sure, things would stay the same as that one wonderful day, but then there would be nothing else out there, ever. So can you remember the very first day when everything really did begin to change? Is there a thing that can remind you? Mine is a blue rose, and that's when everything began to change because that's the day I began to believe in things I never believed in before; the day I found three blue roses. Think about your first day of change, can you remember all the new heights you've soared since that day? All the new people? All the better things and times? Would you throw all of that time away? I wouldn't. Instead, I want to finally accept all the things that I couldn't change, which led to me being right here, right now. Maybe we all carry around inside us one day we wish we could keep forever, something we wished never did change. It's time to let go of that day, and soar. -C. JoyBell C.
What if... all the rules and ways we lay down in our heads, don't even exist at all? What if we only believe that they're there, because we want to think that they're there? All the formalities of morality and the decisions that we see ourselves making in order to be better (or the best)... what if we think we've got it all under control— but we don't? What if the path for you, is one that you would never dare take because you never saw yourself going that way? And then what if you realized that one day— would you take the path for you? Or would you choose to believe in your rules and your reasons? Your moralities and your hopes? What if your own hope, and your own morality— are going the other way? -C. JoyBell C.
What is a Miracle? It is something that was once thought Impossible but became Possible with FAITH.  -Rvm
What is the glory in repeating whta others have done? -Rick Riordan
What multiplies is only up to us. Whether it is kindness that multiplies; or unkindness. Whether it is goodwill that multiplies; or bad intentions. Whether it is love that multiplies; or fear. Whether it is truth that multiplies; or doubt. What multiplies in our own minds, in our relationships with other people, in our relationship with our perspectives about the rest of the world, in our relationship with God, in our outlooks and in our hearts— it’s all up to us. The power of multiplication is in our own hands. What you magnify upon will in fact become your reality. -C. JoyBell C.
What seas what shores what grey rocks and what islands What water lapping the bow And scent of pine and the woodthrush singing through the fog What images return O my daughter -T.S. Eliot
What some say is a lost cause makes it worth even more to fight for."  date: 2007 ;) -Meagan Ray
What tickles the soul, makes all the world well again -Leandra J. Kalsy
What we can change is our perceptions, which have the effect of changing everything. -Donna Quesada
What we gain in the world, we lose in the world, forgotten in death. We must rather fancy what we brought into the world, for therein lives our story, our legend. -Palle Oswald
What would you do in life if you knew you could not fail?  What would you deeply regret never risking? -Mike Rabe
What you believe you can receive if you doubt it you will do without it. -JoCecelia Shinn
What you do today is CRUCIAL, because you are trading your life for it! -Canaan Mashonganyika
What you read when you don't have to will determine what you will be when you can't help it. -Oscar Wilde
What you think upon grows."  Emmet Fox -Nancy S. Kyme
What you wear don't make who you are but your self esteem makes what you wear royal -Akubuiro Chidera
What's money? A man is a success if he gets up in the morning and goes to bed at night and in between does what he wants to do. –Bob Dylan
Whatever begun with planning, ends in a victory. -Amit Kalantri
Whatever the mind of man can conceive and believe it can achieve. -Napoleon Hill
Whatever the mind of man can conceive and believe, it can achieve. –Napoleon Hill
Whatever you are looking for is also looking for you. You see, don't only look. Be available and ready when it shows up -Sahndra Fon Dufe
Whatever you can do, or dream you can, begin it.  Boldness has genius, power and magic in it. –Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
Whatever your difficulty, whatever your hardship in life: Dance and make the song you sing your prayer. Sing it courageously, and with each step strengthen yourself with the knowledge and wisdom of your elders, so that whatever next happens, you can survive and not lose your rhythm. -Red Haircrow
When a man is at peace he is a man, when angry he is an animal. -Amit Kalantri
when a man sacrifices , its like a sunny day , and trough the sun comes rain -emmanuella
When all help is stopped, when your loved ones started doubting your competence, when failure seems almost confirmed, but no matter what, if you make one more attempt, that final  step will fetch you the victory. -Amit Kalantri
When all is said and done all anyone has left is their integrity at their core... Don't give that away too. -Solange nicole
When all the chips are down, always look on to God. -Abdulazeez Henry Musa
When angels visit us, we do not hear the rustle of wings, nor feel the feathery touch of the breast of a dove; but we know their presence by the love they create in our hearts. -Mary Baker Eddy
when distress comes your way, pause and ponder -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
when distress comes your ways, pause and ponder -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
When dreams become words to share with others - amazing things can happen. -Richard Hackett Jr.
When efforts to live happily start with TEARS and end with CRY. Assemble a part from tears and a part from cry and make it-TRY. -Chandan Sharma
When every woman goes within, nurtures her true self and lives her passion, the whole world shifts. -Tonya Sheridan
When everything seems to be going against you, remember that the airplane takes off against the wind, not with it. –Henry Ford
When faced with a problem, we have two options: solve it or wish for it to go away. If you don’t solve it, it will never go away. -Vinita Kinra
When God throws something your way, catch it! -Chriscinthia Blount
When I let go of what I am, I become what I might be. –Lao Tzu
When I remove the layers that say I can't, I discover a burning ember that says I should, I can, and I will. -Charles F. Glassman
When I remove the layers that say I can’t, I discover a burning ember that says I should, I can, and I will. -Charles F. Glassman
When I saw the kouros for the first time," he said, "I felt as though there was a glass between me and the work. -Malcolm Gladwell
When I see an evil person, I cannot believe that once he was an innocent and sweet baby. -Amit Kalantri
When I stand before God at the end of my life, I would hope that I would not have a single bit of talent left and could say, I used everything you gave me. –Erma Bombeck
When I stopped believing that alcohol had an power over me, it no longer did. -Atalina M Homan
When I stopped believing that alcohol had any power over me, it no longer did. -Atalina M Homan
When I was 5 years old, my mother always told me that happiness was the key to life.  When I went to school, they asked me what I wanted to be when I grew up.  I wrote down ‘happy'.  They told me I didn't understand the assignment, and I told them they didn't understand life. –John Lennon
When I was a little girl, everything in the world fell into either of these two categories: wrong or right. Black or white. Now that I am an adult, I have put childish things aside and now I know that some things fall into wrong and some things fall into right. Some things are categorized as black and some things are categorized as white. But most things in the world aren't either! Most things in the world aren't black, aren't white, aren't wrong, aren't right, but most of everything is just different. And now I know that there's nothing wrong with different, and that we can let things be different, we don't have to try and make them black or white, we can just let them be grey. And when I was a child, I thought that God was the God who only saw black and white. Now that I am no longer a child, I can see, that God is the God who can see the black and the white and the grey, too, and He dances on the grey! Grey is okay. -C. JoyBell C.
When I was in Piazza di Spagna, in Rome, I watched (along with others) how many locals came to drink water from the fountain there. The people beside me said to each other "Oh my goodness, how disgusting, people just drink water from anywhere," while the whole time, I was thinking "Oh my goodness, how wonderful, people can drink water from anywhere." We can be in the exact same place, looking at the exact same thing, but see that thing in a completely different way. You can go around the world, and go to all the beautiful places, but never be happy, because happiness is something that you bring inside of you, it is not where you are or what you are looking at, but it is how you are and how you look at. -C. JoyBell C.
When I was little and running on the race track at school, I always stopped and waited for all the other kids so we could run together even though I knew (and everybody else knew) that I could run much faster than all of them! I pretended to read slowly so I could "wait" for everyone else who couldn't read as fast as I could! When my friends were short I pretended that I was short too and if my friend was sad I pretended to be unhappy. I could go on and on about all the ways I have limited myself, my whole life, by "waiting" for people. And the only thing that I've ever received in return is people thinking that they are faster than me, people thinking that they can make me feel bad about myself just because I let them and people thinking that I have to do whatever they say I should do. My mother used to teach me "Cinderella is a perfect example to be" but I have learned that Cinderella can go fuck herself, I'm not waiting for anybody, anymore! I'm going to run as fast as I can, fly as high as I can, I am going to soar and if you want you can come with me! But I'm not waiting for you anymore. -C. JoyBell C.
When I write fiction, I struggle to decide the fate of two people created by my mind and spend countless hours to give them a happy ending. God, the Almighty has created infinite human beings till date and runs all our lives with such ease. He is the BEST WRITER of all. -Shahla Khan
When in the throes of our desolation, it is difficult to hope. But when it is time, we walk the corridors of our heart, retrieving the shattered threads of once-believed dreams. -Gwendolyn M. Plano
When it comes to creating things, I compete with nature not with men. -Amit Kalantri
When it comes to dreams, one may falter, but the only way to fail is to abandon them. -NBC Dracula
When it comes to the education of our young, this privilege should only be given to those whose visions are solely in the uplifting benefit of the child. There is no room for the ego in the education of children! Children should not be looked after, nor educated, by those who have not made a sacrifice within their hearts, laying down their own personal agenda and dreams, for the total ascension of the child. Even if you are to educate the children simply sitting under a tree; if you have the vision and the heart of a sage, those children will grow to be mighty men and women under your watch! And even if you wine and dine the children, putting them up in a palace; if you do not have the vision and the selfless heart of a sage, all you do is in utter vanity! -C. JoyBell C.
When it get's tough, keep moving &amp; when you stop moving, get tough -Derek Anthony Reid
When life gives you lemons ~ write about 'em! -Kimmie Easley
When life gives you lemons, throw them at people. HARD. -Thomas J. Montemarano
When life hits you down, you have a choice make it- You either stay down and feel sorry for yourself or get up and believe in your self. -Tilicia Haridat
When life moves you, move with it; do not place roadblocks of judgment or fear. Your fear and judgment are roadblocks on the easy path that life has chosen for you. Fear is an illusion and it is bondage. When you understand that all is good; you can live in Freedom. -Premlatha Rajkumar
When life takes away, something of greater value is always given in return. -Michael J. Fox
When men feel like “family”, where the blood and genetic inheritance that unites them is the force of Love, the qualities that for so long have been inhibited by ignorance, fear and anger manifest in them spontaneously. Selfishness then vanishes with the sensation of being a part of, and not apart from. -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
When one door of happiness closes, another opens, but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one that has been opened for us. –Helen Keller
When one fall, there's an assurance from Law of Gravity that HE will rise. Don't quit, don't throw a towel just yet. Stand up, dust off then continue to try again. You are beautiful, if your mirror disagree - just change it or wipe the dust from your mirror coz you were made in the image and likeness of God -Kwanele Booi
When our time is up we can only take with us what we have learned and experienced in our development in creating for ourselves and others. "By helping others we help ourselves -Harmon okinyo
When people cry,it does not mean they're weak..they are even stronger for letting people see there weakness.. -Arriene
When people hurt your feelings, keep remembering these words: "In years to come, will it matter?" Time heals almost everything. Give yourself time.....And what other people think of you is none of your business...it’s in their head to give them brain damage and not yours.....my secret of Longevity. -peekey
When someone wants to give you a “piece of their mind,” ask them to give you “peace from their heart” instead. -Molly Friedenfeld
When something can be read without effort, great effort has gone into its writing. -Enrique Jardiel Poncela
When the demons start coming out— that's when you're nearing the light! It's hard for cockroaches to stay put without all the shadows. So in that case, keep on going! -C. JoyBell C.
When the flames of life are gnawing away at your butt, run faster, quicker, and harder than you've ever run before, because I guarantee it that life will condition you, harder than any trainer ever will. When you state to yourself with the utter most believe, “I will achieve this,” than you are on the path, and this is when life throws obstacles left, right, straight on and which other way, but keep going. Because you will make it -Mark  Donnelly
When the mind is open, an open heart often follows, and this creates room for acceptance of our differences.  Acceptance, like Arthur and the bumblebee side by side living their life purpose in total harmony with one another.  Acceptance and harmony:  two elegant principles to build on.  Would you agree? -Sherri Lynea Gerek
When the Self learns to observe the Universe through the eyes of the Spirit, it perceives only Love -Ivan Figueroa-Otero
When the truth is dispensed it is for the good of all, always. -Molly Friedenfeld
When there is nothing left to give somone in need, we give them what we do have. We give them Divine Love, faith, and friendship. This is always enough to see anyone through anything. This, my friends, is how we save the world. (pg.99 of A Journey In to Divine Love) -C.Michelle Gonzalez
when there's a change in your life , that means your going forward -Mohieddine Cheouichi
When things go bad, don't go with them. -Elvis Presley
When things happen involved thought &amp; feelings, ask Allah to protect and show us the real path. -A.E.
When truthful knowledge is dispensed, soul growth is accomplished every time, for all parties involved, in every situation. -Molly Friedenfeld
When two or more hearts unite, anything is possible. -Molly Friedenfeld
when we conceive an idea, we don't just look anymore but we see. People without a well defined vision look; men with a focused purpose look and they see. -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
When we face our fear of death and slow down our busy lives, we come to realize our relationships are precious, a part of life’s foundation. Knowing this fact helps us to understand that death’s true purpose is to teach us how to live. -Molly Friedenfeld
When we find out Who He (Jesus) is, then we find out who we are and it forever settles what we believe. -Yvette R. Dempster
When we give away at least 10 percent of everything that we earn, in essence we perform an act of purification, cleansing all of the negative energy that our money carries. We remove just a small portion – the 10 percent of the earnings that represent and will create obstacles and challenges in our lives. # -Celso Cukierkorn
When we live our life as if it is an open book, we are free in body, mind, and spirit and allow anyone to read from our pages. -Molly Friedenfeld
When we procrastinate, we also put a hold on happiness. -Charles F. Glassman
When we stop fighting against death, we are able to wake up to our lives. -Daniel Gottlieb
When we tap into our creativity, we experience a sense of strength and well-being. -JuliaCameron
When we worry about someone we send them a secret message – I don’t believe in you. When we worry about our life, we send ourselves a secret message – I don’t believe in me. -Charles F. Glassman
When we worship, we ascend, when we ascend we gain revelation from God. -Chuck D. Pierce
When wealth flees, untrue friends follow. -Thomas F. Shubnell
When you are a grown up your brothers become your neighbors and your unconditional brotherhood become your conditional neighborhood. -Amit Kalantri
When you are a real queen, there is absolutely no reason to try and make people believe that you are one. Because you just are. Life is lived with grace, courage, and serenity. If you must dedicate any amount of time and mental ability to making anyone believe that you are one; you're not! -C. JoyBell C.
When you are angry try your best to go to sleep, it keeps you away from speaking, writing and thinking while you are angry. -Amit Kalantri
When you are at your lowest, look up! -Alisha Broughton
When you are feeling bad keep smile. -Hieronymus Jonina
When you are hungry, you should eat. When you are thirsty you should drink. When you are sad you should laugh. -Vinita Kinra
When you are like the tree, there is oneness with the Earth, Sun and Moon, but still steadfast in your purpose. -Michelle Cruz-Rosado
When you are lonely for a while don't get restless, if you had born alone, you are going to die alone then for sometime you can certainly live alone. -Amit Kalantri
When you are where wild bears live you learn to pay attention to the rhythm of the land and yourself. Bears not only make the habitat rich, they enrich us just by being. -Linda Jo Hunter
When you believe in yourself with a passion then success can be spontaneous. -Stephen Richards
When you believe something so strongly in your heart, never accept no for an answer! Keep pushing forward and prepare for that moment when someone tells you Yes! -Augusta DeJuan Hathaway
When you carry resentment towards another, you are effectively strengthening your relationship with that person.  Let go of the resentment and you break the ties that bind you. -Steven Aitchison
When you change the way you look at things, the things you look at change. Wayne Dyer
When you don't ask for advice, but get it anyway, it has more to do with the needs and wants of the giver than you the receiver. -Charles F. Glassman
When you don't know what the answer is, you know *Who* the answer is. -Larry Burkett
When you doubt your ability to make a difference just remember you are alive for a reason. -Austin Wright
When you fell like your not loved remeber that I am here for you and I do care for you;You just have to remeber that you are not alone<3 -Nalizha
When you go through a hard period, When everything seems to oppose you, ... When you feel you cannot even bear one more minute, NEVER GIVE UP! Because it is the time and place that the course will divert! -Rumi
when you have no spirit to seize the day, find it behind the music, between the flowing leaves, beneath the sun rays, and just within yourself. Talk to yourself, be the best friend for yourself, and do not hesitate to ask God help -Maria Magdalena
When you Know Better, You Do Better -Tyreen King-Maddox
When you let go of past pain, believe in yourself, and follow your dreams—you can find true happiness! -Casi McLean
When you live in reaction you give your power away. Then you get to experience what you gave your power to. -N. Smith
When you look for a man- what you want to look for is a man with the heart of a poor boy and the mind of a conqueror. -C. JoyBell C.
when you look in the mirror and dont like what you see you can find out first hand what its like to be me -Gerard Way
When you make the decision to give something to a person who has nothing, that something has just become their everything. -Mark W Boyer
When you make the dream of your heart a treasure of heaven, it holds an eternal value. -Deborah Brodie
When you offend the offender, people don’t even see the offense as offensive but God does -Rhymesonny
When you see and know that your wellspring is an Eternal Source, and not other people around you, or your past experiences, not even your life story, that is when you are able to truly give to others, without running out and without feeling empty. Because I see God in everything that I touch and feel and think and because I believe that He sees me in everything, too, hence I am able to give to others without thinking of myself as limited source. What I have doesn't come from others, it doesn’t come from my life story and it doesn’t come from a box. What I have comes from a wellspring, an Eternal Source. The good news is that it never runs out, there is plenty for all and for everyone. -C. JoyBell C.
When you stand and share your story in an empowering way, your story will heal you and your story will heal somebody else. -Iyanla Vanzant
when you start finding a good everywhere than you should count yourself among the greatest people . -Neel sirohi
When you stop looking over your shoulder, you shall see that the future is way nicer than the past. -Sylvia L'Namira
When you surround yourself with positive people who are making a difference in the world, you start to believe anything is possible. -Steven Aitchison
When you take the step towards your dreams you will be met with fears because you have never traveled this way before. As you go, you will discover that you had nothing to fear. Through overcoming your fears you give those that follow you hope that if they pursue their dreams, they will achieve their dreams. -E'yen A. Gardner
When you trust your inner guidance and begin moving in the direction of your dreams (aligned with your individual gifts) you will be cloaked in an armor bestowed upon you by your guardian angel. -Charles F. Glassman
When you wake up with a smile on your face, you know you have done something right in your life. -Jean Williams
When you want something, he entire universe conspires to help you achieve it. -Paulo Coelho
When you want your message to be heard, always speak from your heart. -Molly Friedenfeld
When you work extremely hard to get 1, God gives you 10; otherwise He gives you none. -Vinita Kinra
When your footsteps and thoughts carry you down the same path your heart and soul are directing you, you will know without a doubt that you are headed in the right direction. -Molly Friedenfeld
When your heart is in your dream no request is too extreme Jiminy Cricket
When your youth is about to enter in old age it shouldn't wonder, what happened? it must say, well done. -Amit Kalantri
Whenever your foundation is laid in God, there will be nothing that can shake it, no matter how strong the storm is. -Angelo M. Swinson
Where are they written?"  "In the world around us. Merely be attentive to what happens in your life, and you will discover where, every moment of the day, He hides His words and His will. Seek to do as He asks: this alone is the reason you are in the world."  "If I discover it, I'll write it on clay tablets." "Do so. But write them, above all, in your heart; there they can neither burned nor destroyed, and you will take them wherever you go. -Paulo Coelho
Where are you?" he asked. "I'm right here" she said. "I know, but it feels like one percent of you is somewhere else, where is that one percent?" he said. "I don't know....I think I'm always like that..." she answered. "I like that." "You do?" "Yes, because that way, I have to always look for the one percent to find it. -C. JoyBell C.
Where ignorance prevails, there an opportunity exists. -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Where other men blindly follow the truth, Remember, nothing is true. Where other men are limited by morality or law, Remember, everything is permitted. We work in the dark to serve the light. We are assassins. -Assassins creed
Whereever you end up;" Jack whispered into my ear."I wish you clear skies. Always -Wendy Mass
Wherever you are lacking, your obedience in working on that before your mate comes is vital. -Angelo M. Swinson
Whether it be training, dieting, working out, or work ethic, for every great excuse "Not" to do something, there are 100 "better" reasons for you to do it. -Mark W. Boyer
Whether you believe you can or believe you can’t, you are absolutely right. -Henry Ford
Whether you believe you can or you can't you are usually right" Henry Ford I add: "Make people believe that they can" ♥ Jégwan Kaaber Henry Ford  Jégwan Kaaber
Whether you think you can or you think you can't, you're right. –Henry Ford
Whether you think you're right or you think you're wrong.  You're right." "If you think in pictures, write.  If you think in words, paint. -Krista Kedrick
While reason steers a man, it is faith alone that moves him -Agona Apell
While the alchemist of old sought to turn lead into gold, the modern alchemist has a more noble dream: to turn men from rot to rock -Agona Apell
Who you are at 20 will not be who you are at 40 and if it is, SOMETHING IS WRONG! -Tyler Perry
Whoever loves much, does much... -Thomas à Kempis
Why can you see the stars at night, but not the light... -A. Witness
why cant dreams be realty and realty be dreams. -MR-S
Why do I and everyone I love pick people who treat us like we're nothing"; - "We accept the love we think we deserve, -Stephen Chbosky
Why do I write? Because I like telling stories and I don't like repeating myself (insert chuckle here). -Najeev Raj Nadarajah
Why do we always begin to think about people when they die? I think we should think about people while they're still alive! That way, they can know that we're thinking about them! I always tell people when I'm thinking about them, or that I thought about them, or that I have been thinking about them and it almost always scares them away, but so what, I am practicing the art of life and if that is frightening to them then maybe they need to start living while they're still alive! -C. JoyBell C.
Why does a human body become deceased? The reason is that as long as the human body is not free from suffering, mind cannot be happy.  If a man lacks enthusiasm, either his body or mind is in a deceased condition....  Now what saps the enthusiasm in man?  If there is no enthusiasm, life becomes drudgery - a mere burden to be dragged. Nothing can be achieved if there is no enthusiasm.  The main reason for this lack of enthusiasm on the part of a man is that an individual looses the hope of getting an opportunity to elevate himself.  Hopelessness leads to lack of enthusiasm.  The mind in such cases becomes deceased....  When is enthusiasm created?  When one breaths an atmosphere where one is sure of getting the legitimate reward for one's labor, only then one feels enriched by enthusiasm and inspiration. -B.R. Ambedkar
Why waste a brand new day with your thoughts of yesterday -Steven Aitchison
Why worry knowing there is no greater love than giving your life to save another, tears drop each moment I see the light. My life my life oh what a great love what other name is there to replace thee but love for it cools you when your hot and strengthens when your weak,, and you ask me,  why can't i hate, kill still or lie ahahah you're amaze me great love, after you've swallowed me !! -Frank Ziworitin
Winners lose much more often than losers. So if you keep losing but you're still trying, keep it up! You're on the right track, -Matthew Keith Groves
Winners of some competition are not heroes, heroes are not found in the competition, heroes win much more severe battles than competition to become heroes. -Amit Kalantri
Winning isn't everything, but wanting to win is. –Vince Lombardi
With my ninth mind I resurrect my first and dance slow to the music of my soul made new. -Aberjhani
With some money in your pocket you walk confidently, you talk confidently and you work confidently. -Amit Kalantri
With true love you can win one person, with true passion you can win the world. -Amit Kalantri
With your Christmas-Day-will-never-arrive-soon enough salivations, you anticipate the moment when, like voracious  cub lions, you’ll rip open the  wrapping paper and feast off your every delicious present. -Carew Papritz
Without Purpose, LIVING is downgraded to Breathing a boring routine of inhaling oxygen - waiting to exhale -Fela Durotoye
Without the dark, we’d never see the stars. There also would be no use for the moon if there was never a night. -Tessa Emily Hall
Womanist 1. From womanish. (Opp. of “girlish,” i.e., frivolous, irresponsible, not serious.) A black feminist or feminist of color. From the black folk expression of mothers to female children, “You acting womanish,” i.e., like a woman. Usually referring to outrageous, audacious, courageous or willful behavior. Wanting to know more and in greater depth than is considered “good” for one. Interested in grown-up doings. Acting grown up. Being grown up. Interchangeable with another black folk expression: “You trying to be grown.” Responsible. In charge. Serious. 2. Also: A woman who loves other women, sexually and/or nonsexually. Appreciates and prefers women’s culture, women’s emotional flexibility (values tears as natural counterbalance of laughter), and women’s strength. Sometimes loves individual men, sexually and/or nonsexually. Committed to survival and wholeness of entire people, male and female. Not a separatist, except periodically, for health. Traditionally uni-versalist, as in: “Mama, why are we brown, pink, and yellow, and our cousins are white, beige, and black?” Ans.: “Well, you know the colored race is just like a flower garden, with every color flower represented.” Traditionally capable, as in: “Mama, I’m walking to Canada and I’m taking you and a bunch of other slaves with me.” Reply: “It wouldn’t be the first time.” 3. Loves music. Loves dance. Loves the moon. Loves the Spirit. Loves love and food and roundness. Loves struggle. Loves the Folk. Loves herself. Regardless. -Alice Walker
Women often wonder, "How do I know if I am on the right track?" The answer is simple. If you are being true to yourself, you are on the right track. -Tonya Sheridan
word is like a sword; you should be wise when to use it or it'll kill and ruin everything you did in your past, you're doing at this time, and you're gonna do in  the future -A Thaselia
Words of love cast from thy lips reach another heart at lightning speed. -Molly Friedenfeld
Work, home, or play we should all aspire to inspire everyday. -Mark W. Boyer
World can run without money and currencies but not without business and trade. -Amit Kalantri
Worlds 75% or more than that population doesn't know their real capabilities. Which they are born with. If anyway they realize it then this world become a great place to live. -Shailesh Bhokare
Worrying and Stressing is useless simply because whatever GOD has for you is for you. Let GOD happen. -Sabrina Newby
Worship the work not the God, because work is God. -Amit Kalantri
Worth as I use it here is immeasurable, not as in mathematics towards infinity. But that it can not be measured. There are no measurable parameters for it! Certainly not a material-communal measurable parameter for it! Such, it is what the being holds that cannot and should never be traded. When it is there, every essence of your being knows it, and takes commands from it that will be able to override any personal or imposed sense of value. -Dew Platt
Wouldn't it suffice just to refer to decent people? It is true that they form a minority. More than that, they always will remain a minority. And yet I see therein the very challenge to join the minority. For the world is in a bad state, but everything will become still worse unless each of us does his best. So, let us be alert-alert in a twofold sense: Since Auschwitz we know what man is capable of. And since Hiroshima we know what is at stake. -Viktor E. Frankl
Write because you love to write. -Cindi Lee
Write the book you want to read -Austin Kleon
Write what pleases you. If you please others in the process it's a bonus.                       ROY A HIGGINS -Roy A. Higgins
Write your heart out, give it your all, and proceed to make emotions crawl over the place for the power that is your book. -Karlie Calderon
Writers get to construct a magical world that readers can visit in thought and extend their stay with imagination. -Sandra Alex
X is for X-mas Concentrate your energies, your thoughts and your capital. Put all your eggs in one basket and then watch that basket, then all your Christmases can come at once! -Lucas Remmerswaal
Yang membelenggu kita bukan kekuatan-kekuatan luar, entah itu negara agresor, industrialis global, kapitalis tamak, merek ternama atau Hollywood, tapi justru jiwa yang sempit, pikiran yang kerdil, dan imajinasi yang pendek. -Radhar Panca Dahana
Ye'll never best your fears until ye face them -Susanna Kearsley
Yes, God is real. -Tyler Perry
Yes, my dear," he said reaching his hand to her cheek from where he sat. "But, it only takes one success to erase all the failures. When an opportunity presents itself, the only true failure takes place if one doesn't try at all. My wings weren't ready to fly this time, but, next time, you'll see. They all will see. -Stephen Reid Andrews
Yesterday I was sad, today I am happy! Yesterday I had a problem, today I still have the same problem! But today I changed the way I look at it! -C. JoyBell C.
Yesterday was history, today is challenging, and tomorrow will be destination -Kaw Moo
You always supposed to have that i'm number 1 mentality,don't let anyone make you feel like you is number 2 when they not even worth being number 1 !!! -jojo1980
You and I have been created with a DNA that drives us to want to live a life with good experiences, forces us to human growth and leads us to the contribution of something beyond our understanding. -Yovanny Alfonso
You are a co-creator of your own life, live your life on purpose. -Michelle S. Fondin
You are beautiful, but you are empty. One could not die for you. To be sure, an ordinary passerby would think that my rose looked just like you --- the rose that belongs to me. But in herself alone she is more important than all the hundreds of you other roses: because it is she that I have watered; because it is she that I have put under the glass globe; because it is she that I have sheltered behind the screen; because it is for her that I have killed the caterpillars; because it is she that I have listened to, when she grumbled, or bloated, or even sometimes when she said nothing. Because she is my rose. -Antoine de Saint-Exupéry
You are blessed today not because God loves you most but, God just want to bless someone through you. so just be careful you might probably be holding onto someones blessings. Remember you are just servant/messenger of God. -wisdom kavi
You are brilliant. Low-self-esteem will never haunt you again. Be all that you can be. Know your purpose! Every trial will turn into a victory. You must speak that thing into existence and never give up. -Alisha Broughton
You are more ready and able to grasp at opportunity when your hands are empty. -Christy  Hall
You are never too old to dream, keep dreaming like never before and you're never too young to dream, so young people go for it don't hesitate; dream again and again. -Euginia Herlihy
You are not the problem but fashion designers, who are limiting themselves creatively. -Gloria D. Gonsalves
You are only strange if you change who you are for somebody else, then you are a stranger to yourself. -Shane Phillips
You are the one and only solution for your problem. -Shailesh Bhokare
You are what you believe in. You become that which you believe you can become -Bhagavad Gita
You are what you believe in. You become that which you believe you can become. -The Bhagavad Gita
You are what you share. -C.W. Leadbeater
YOU ARE WHO AND WHAT YOU DECIDE YOU ARE— NOTHING MORE, NOTHING LESS. -Christopher Babson
You are worth more than a number... -Jo Allott
You are worthy of your wildest dreams. -Nicole Guillaume
you are you when you are true -Yasmine Butts
You become more divine as you become more creative. All the religions of the world have said God is the creator. I don’t know whether he is the creator or not, but one thing I know: the more creative you become, the more godly you become. When your creativity comes to a climax, when your whole life becomes creative, you live in God. So he must be the creator because people who have been creative have been closest to him. Love what you do. Be meditative while you are doing it – whatsoever it is -Osho
You become what you believe. –Oprah Winfrey
You can anticipate from life exactly what you put into it. You can't go planting apple seeds and expect them to produce oranges. -Mark W. Boyer
You can be the most beautiful person in the world and everybody sees light and rainbows when they look at you, but if you yourself don't know it, all of that doesn't even matter. Every second that you spend on doubting your worth, every moment that you use to criticize yourself; is a second of your life wasted, is a moment of your life thrown away. It's not like you have forever, so don't waste any of your seconds, don't throw even one of your moments away. -C. JoyBell C.
You can capture this body of mine, take away my freedom and enslave me.   You may even have the power to capture my soul and sentence me to the realm of eternal darkness.   But my dreams you cannot touch.  They are my will―the very essence of who I am.   In them I laugh.   In them I cry.   In them I love.   And in them…….I live. My dreams  are untouchable and unceasing. -Richelle E. Goodrich
You can frame up your life however you like; it's the lens that you see through that will bring you sight -Sonya Withrow
You can get a thousand no's from people, and only one "yes" from God. -Tyler Perry
You can learn something from everything and everybody, especially the elderly. -Tyler Perry
You can never cross the ocean until you have the courage to lose sight of the shore. –Christopher Columbus
You can not have empty or neutral mind, as long as you work the mind will contain dreams, if you stop working it will contain regrets. -Amit Kalantri
You can run away from yourself so often, and so much, just because the broken pieces of you cut your feet too deeply if you stay around for too long. But then what if someone were to come along and pick up those pieces for you? Then you wouldn't have to run away from yourself anymore. You could stop running. If someone sees you as something worth staying with— maybe you'll stay with yourself, too. -C. JoyBell C.
You can see the whole entire world in the eyes of a person who knows how to simply stand there and take all of it into him but then you can look into the eyes of someone else and the whole entire world goes away and all that's left is you. -C. JoyBell C.
You can survive without artistry, but you cannot live without artistry. -Amit Kalantri
You can take my life, but you'll never break me.   So bring me your worst... And I will definitely give you mine. -Sherrilyn Kenyon
You can talk with someone for years, everyday, and still, it won't mean as much as what you can have when you sit in front of someone, not saying a word, yet you feel that person with your heart, you feel like you have known the person for forever.... connections are made with the heart, not the tongue. -C. JoyBell C.
You can't be sad when Daisy is around, she won't let you. -Maryam Faresh
You can't fall if you don't climb.  But there's no joy in living your whole life on the ground. –Unknown
You can't make a fan of everyone. Stay true to your story, characters, music, art or whatever it is you do and fuck everyone else who doesn't like it. Life isn't perfect. -Ann Marie Frohoff
You can't substitute material things for love or for gentleness or for tenderness or for a sense of comradeship -Mitch Albom
You can't test courage cautiously.” (Annie Dillard) -Marcia Quinn Noren
You can't understand where someone's going unless you understand where they've been. -Jerry B. Jenkins
You can't use up creativity.  The more you use, the more you have. –Maya Angelou
You cannot afford to gamble your youth only for fun. -Amit Kalantri
You cannot charge large If your brand is just like a tyre in a garage Build your brand, enlarge and take charge  If your brand is always dead as a smart phone battery, start now…. recharge -Rhymesonny
you cannot get all your desires assuming the hidden secret standing somewhere scrutinizing your soul. -denmwen
You cannot live a nonviolent life as long as you are consuming violence. Please consider going vegan. -Gary L. Francione
You cannot negotiate art. -Amit Kalantri
You cannot truly love yourself if you are constantly surrounded by clutter, chaos and bitterness. The time has come for you to de-clutter your mind and your environment. -Winsome Campbell-Green
You control whether you are happy. It's all your narrative and you can change it if you choose to." - L. R. W. Lee Andy Smithson: Blast of the Dragon's Fury -L.R.W. Lee
You don't have to slay a dragon to be perceived a hero - smiling at someone at the right moment might also do the trick. -Jury Nel
You don't need a million dollar to start a business.  You just need a simple idea to make Billions -Mushfiqur Rahman
You don't need anybody's permission to prove yourself, just prove yourself. -Amit Kalantri
You don't need to go back in time to be awesome; you just have to start right now. Regretting that you didn't start earlier is a great distraction from moving on your dream today, and the reality is that today is earlier than tomorrow. -Jon Acuff
You don't need to understand what the world is, just let your life flow with it and become something -Jayson Engay
You don't need to wish harder, you need to work harder. -Amit Kalantri
You forgive the person or situation not because what the person did was right, but you forgive to save yourself the suffering, heartache, and feelings of revenge. The pain that you focus on will never give you peace of mind and the more you bind your emotions to the pain, the more of it you will create in your life. So being angry and revengeful does not affect the person you are angry with. Instead, it destroys your life. Thus, you forgive to keep yourself in well being. Carrying hatred and anger is like carrying garbage wherever you go, it will stink your life. -Premlatha Rajkumar
You get something, if you do something -Yaya Nurcahyadin
You get that one chance; and damn it, you’ve got to take it! If there’s one lesson I know I will take with me for eternity, its that there are those things that might happen only once, those chances that come walking down the street, strolling out of a café; if you don’t let go and take them, they really could get away! We can get so washed out with a mindset of entitlement– the universe will do everything for us to ensure our happiness– that we forget why we came here! We came here to grab, to take, to give, to have! Not to wait! Nobody came here to wait! So, what makes anyone think that destiny will keep on knocking over and over again? It could, but what if it doesn’t? You go and you take the chance that you get; even if it makes you look stupid, insane, or whorish! Because it just might not come back again. You could wait a lifetime to see if it will...but I don’t think you should. -C. JoyBell C.
You give away your power when you don't forgive. -Tyler Perry
You gotta Stand for Something, Even If U Stand Alone -Backstreet Boys
You have dreams to fulfil! You have goals to reach! You have missions to accomplish! -Euginia Herlihy
You have everything when you embrace the full circle of life. -Kathryn V. White
You have given intelligence to find one solution, and imagination to find ten. -Amit Kalantri
You have gone through enough theory, now it's time to take actions. -Amit Kalantri
You have two choices: To live an unconscious life, or to be conscious of your magnificence. -Cloris Kylie
You have worked too long in the life, now its time for heroism. -Amit Kalantri
You have your God, I have my guts. -Amit Kalantri
You is kind,  you is smart,  you is important. -Kathryn Stockett
You just go a little crazy, you know. Sometimes. And why? Well only because your soul is just too big for you, it flies away somehow. -C. JoyBell C.
You know you’re not perfect and that’s good. Perfect is boring. You have a lot to offer. A lot more to experience and so many things to learn. There are more pages to fill up so act your age. -Happy Positivity
You know, we can quote the written Word all day to our friends, but nothing will touch them like our own hunger and love for the Word himself. It is not dutiful love that attracts but love freely lavished from a heart familiar with the gardens of heaven. -Amy Layne Litzelman
You may be disappointed if you fail, but you are doomed if you don't try. –Beverly Sills
You may be safe, but I am free.' Take advantage of the freedom that comes with your youth.  Inhale life, exhale fire, and embrace the late, sleepless nights, because that's when the magic happens- when everyone else is asleep and you're awake thinking about the world as it is, and the world as it would be.  Make the most of those moments," I said forcefully. "And in the coming years people will tell you that you're too young to change the world.  I'm here to tell you, that's fucking bullshit. -Adam Braun
You may be the only person left who believes in you, but it's enough.  It takes just one star to pierce a universe of darkness.  Never give up. -Richelle E. Goodrich
You may delay your ambition, but never forget your ambition. -Amit Kalantri
You may not appreciate the presence of good health, but you will definitely regret the absence of good health, because health is happiness. -Amit Kalantri
You may not be the person with high IQ, but you can be the person with highest hard work. -Amit Kalantri
You might hate a successful person, but you can not hate a true hero. -Amit Kalantri
You might want more time in your life to attempt the things you like to do, and not just perform the things you have to do. -Carew Papritz
You miss 100% of the shots you don't take. –Wayne Gretzky
You must embrace change before change erases you. -Rob Liano
You must go to the school or to the books or on the field because knowledge doesn't come to you, you must go to the knowledge. -Amit Kalantri
You must risk placing real emotion at the center of your work. Write straight into the emotional center of things. Write toward vulnerability. Tell the truth as you understand it. If you're a writer, you have a moral obligation to do this. -Anne Lamott
You mustn't be afraid to sparkle a little brighter darling . -Kirsten Kuehn
You naturally begin to center more and more on the spiritual part of your being. You do this not by reaching for the Spirit, but by letting go of the rest. -Michael A. Singer
You need a team for war, not for negotiation. -Amit Kalantri
You need not to love everyone, but you need to be polite with everyone, people will appreciate your politeness more than your love, because politeness is sweeter than love. -Amit Kalantri
You need to ask yourself " How much do you want" before you start your online business. -Satyendra Pandey
You need to trust To surrender To ask for guidance Go within for the answers They're within you You have the answers All you need do is ask -Karen Hackel
You never leave your partner! Especially in a fire! -Jennifer Dion
You path is only as limited as your imagination will allow. -Ikish Mullens
You really will reap what you sew. -Tyler Perry
You take your life in your own hands, and what happens? A terrible thing, no one to blame. –Erica Jong
You think that it’s not magic that keeps you alive? Just ‘cause you understand the mechanics of how something works, doesn’t make it any less of a miracle. Which is just another word for magic. We’re all kept alive by magic, Sookie. My magic’s just a little different from yours, that’s all. -Charlaine Harris
You will find that it is necessary to let things go; simply for the reason that they are heavy. So let them go, let go of them. I tie no weights to my ankles. -C. JoyBell C.
You will get your father's wealth one day but not his legacy. -Amit Kalantri
You will have relatively less problems to solve, if you don't confuse problems with inconveniences. -Amit Kalantri
You will miss a normal life while living a successful life, but not as much as the craving for a successful life while you were living a normal life. -Amit Kalantri
You will never be satisfied with anything less than the highest you can attain. -Apoorve Dubey
You will never be too old to dream because God will stop the sun for you to enjoy the fruits of your labour. -Euginia Herlihy
You will never know what your potential is unless you give life 100 percent effort every day. -Mike Rabe
You will never win if you never begin. -Helen Rowland
You win when your determination is more powerful than hurdles; otherwise you lose. -Vinita Kinra
You won't find your soul in a textbook, self-help book, or buy it in a store. Sometimes, it's just a matter of looking past the anger, regret, and envy to see its smiling face. -Charles F. Glassman
You'll never get ahead if your always running behind -Jeremy Coates
You'll never get ahead, if your always running behind... -Jeremy Marcus Coatesoates
You'll never know what you're capable of if you never take the first step and try. -Ikish Mullens
You're alive,  that means you have infinite potential. You can do anything, make anything, dream anything.  If you change the world, the world will change. -Neil Gaiman
You're going to meet many people with domineering personalities: the loud, the obnoxious, those that noisily stake their claims in your territory and everywhere else they set foot on. This is the blueprint of a predator. Predators prey on gentleness, peace, calmness, sweetness and any positivity that they sniff out as weakness. Anything that is happy and at peace they mistake for weakness. It's not your job to change these people, but it's your job to show them that your peace and gentleness do not equate to weakness. I have always appeared to be fragile and delicate but the thing is, I am not fragile and I am not delicate. I am very gentle but I can show you that the gentle also possess a poison. I compare myself to silk. People mistake silk to be weak but a silk handkerchief can protect the wearer from a gunshot. There are many people who will want to befriend you if you fit the description of what they think is weak; predators want to have friends that they can dominate over because that makes them feel strong and important. The truth is that predators have no strength and no courage. It is you who are strong, and it is you who has courage. I have lost many a friend over the fact that when they attempt to rip me, they can't. They accuse me of being deceiving; I am not deceiving, I am just made of silk. It is they who are stupid and wrongly take gentleness and fairness for weakness. There are many more predators in this world, so I want you to be made of silk. You are silk. -C. JoyBell C.
You're never losing when you're learning ! -Knowledge Notes
You're only human. You live once and life is wonderful so eat the damn red velvet cupcake! -Emma Stone
You're so good at what you do, keep pushing, success is on the table at all times! -Sereda Aleta Dailey
You've already got everything you need to succeed right in-front of your tits -Runa Magnus
You've got this life and while you've got it, you'd better kiss like you only have one moment, try to hold someone's hand like you will never get another chance to, look into people's eyes like they're the last you'll ever see, watch someone sleeping like there's no time left, jump if you feel like jumping, run if you feel like running, play music in your head when there is none, and eat cake like it's the only one left in the world! -C. JoyBell C.
Your abilities are not enough to fulfill your wishes, so work considering your wishes and not your abilities. -Amit Kalantri
Your actions create an "energy vortex" that draws in the necessary ingredients for your venture. -Chris Prentiss
Your beginning never dictates your destnation. -Tyler Perry
Your birth was no mistake or mishap, and your life is no fluke of nature. Your parents may not have planned you, but God did. He was not at all surprised by your birth. In fact, he expected it. -Rick Warren
Your clothes should be as important as your skin. -Amit Kalantri
Your courage will be tested during the adversity as well as during the change. -Amit Kalantri
Your destiny, you are judge, -Jamsai jarintron
Your environment will eat your goals and plans for breakfast. -Steve Pavlina
Your eyes are not really windows through which you look out into the world. Your eyes are cameras that send electronic images of the world into you. -Michael A. Singer
Your gift can make room for you. -Tyler Perry
your glory determines your haters -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Your God wants you to be fulfilled—to be happy. -Michael    Hutchison
Your grandmother once told me that the problems we face in life are windows, from which we can view the beauty of the solutions that await our discovery. -Peggy M. McAloon
Your greatest weapon is your MIND! Lock and load it with the greatest ammunition; EDUCATION. And protect it with your best defense; GOD. -Marck E. Estemil
Your growth is A reflection of your hard work! --Praveen chelumalla
Your heart is the correspondent of your soul. It knows the grooves of joy. -Karen Ruimy
Your heart is the size of an ocean.  Go find yourself in its hidden depths. -Rumi
Your inner Belly Dancer...is your inner sensuality, your highest feminity, your great esteemed self made more apparent. -Leandra J. Kalsy
Your joy can be the impetus that motivates others to find their way to joy. -Molly Friedenfeld
Your life is a reflection of your thoughts.  Think well. -Danielle Pierre
Your life is not a result of your potential, skills or desires,  but of your consistent expectations and actions, which largely flow from your values and beliefs. -Christopher Babson
Your life oppositions will position or disposition you in the best or worst way depending how you position or disposition your oppositions. -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Your life should be a story you are excited to tell. -Adam Braun
Your life today is, for the most part, a manifestation of the stories you told yourself in the past. -Christopher Babson
Your memories don't possess you, you possess your memories. -Guy T. Simpson Jr.
Your money is just a condition to get my business, your professionalism is the price. -Amit Kalantri
Your path in life will lead you to places you have never dreamed of. You have to believe in yourself. -Peggy M. McAloon
Your personality should be described in poem not in paragraph. -Amit Kalantri
Your position may be highly powerful, but you will be a hero only when you are highly respected. -Amit Kalantri
your relevance in an environment may be determined by your acts there -Ernest Agyemang Yeboah
Your right actions might hurt someone, so if required apologize for your right actions, but don't stop taking right actions. -Amit Kalantri
Your shyness alone will bring you more emotional and material losses than all of your other negative attributes. -Amit Kalantri
Your situation can only be changed by you; see it and have it -Uzoma Kelechi
Your smile is your logo, your personality is your business card, how you leave others feeling after having an experience with you becomes your trademark. -Jay Danzie
your soul does not understand the words, the soul understands our feelings. Rachida Zidane
Your soul is a precious gift from an imaginative loving Source that endlessly breathes life. -Dashama Konah Gordon
Your success and happiness lie in you. -Helen Keller
Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life. –Steve Jobs
Your time is way too valuable to be wasting on people that can't accept who you are. -Turcois Ominek
Your twenties are the time to both accept and fight your way into the person you're destined to become. -Adam Braun
Your wishes doesn't come true, because there is someone else who is wishing harder and trying harder for the same wish. -Amit Kalantri
Your world of poverty can be recreated to that of affluence simply by speaking the Prince's language. -Jaachynma N.E. Agu
Your youth is certainly finished and old age has definitely arrived if you feel that you are losing enthusiasm, excitement and energy towards your dreams and goals. -Amit Kalantri
Yours are the only shoes made to walk your journey. -Charles F. Glassman
Youth is the most suitable age to enjoy the life completely or to work diligently for the life, what you decide makes your rest of the life ordinary or legendary respectively. -Amit Kalantri
You’re not alone. You’re never alone. Use creativity to change what world you’re in at this moment. -E.E. Charlton-Trujillo
Z is for Zany! Master the Zany habit of thinking backwards. it will help you become a really great thinker! -Lucas Remmerswaal
Do... or do not. There is no try. -Yoda
Happiness often sneaks in through a door you didn't know you left open. -John Barrymore
What would you do if you knew you could not fail? -Anonymous
